1', 'P0100', 'P0100 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Mass Air Flow (MAF) Circuit Malfunction', 'Basically this means that there is a problem with the Mass Air Flow (MAF)  sensor or circuit. Other MAF sensor circuit DTC trouble codes are P0101, P0102, P0103, and P0104.', 'You will likely not notice any serious drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a general decrease in power or sluggishness.', '', 'A code P0100 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The MAF may be disconnected, or a wiring connection may be bad  The MAF sensor may be faulty', '  The MAF may be disconnected, or a wiring connection may be bad  The MAF sensor may be faulty', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back. Then   start with the cheapest, easiest repair procedures:  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Unplug and reconnect the MAF wiring harness  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle     specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor', '  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Unplug and reconnect the MAF wiring harness  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle     specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor'
2', 'P0101', 'P0101 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Mass Air Flow (MAF) Circuit Range/Performance Problem', 'The MAF (mass air flow) sensor measures the air entering the engine. The powertrain control module (PCM) uses that reading along with others to ensure proper fuel delivery at any given time.  Basically this P0101 diagnostic trouble code (DTC) means that there is a problem with the Mass Air Flow (MAF)  sensor or circuit. The PCM detects that the actual MAF sensor frequency signal  is not within a predetermined range of the calculated MAF value for more than  4.0 seconds. Other MAF sensor circuit DTC trouble codes are P0100, P0102, P0103, and P0104.This DTC is a generic OBD-II powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may vary depending on the model. ', '', '', '', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back. Then   start with the cheapest, easiest repair procedures:  Inspect for the following conditions:    An incorrectly routed harness--Inspect the harness of the MAF sensor in order      to verify that it is not routed too close to the following components:    - The secondary ignition wires or coils    - Any solenoids    - Any relays  - Any motors      A low minimum air rate through the sensor bore may cause this DTC to set      at idle or during deceleration. Inspect for any vacuum leaks downstream      of the MAF sensor.      A wide open throttle (WOT) acceleration from a stop should cause the MAF        sensor g/s display on the scan tool to increase rapidly. This increase        should be from 6-12 g/s at idle to 230 g/s or more at the time of the        1-2 shift.        If the increase is not observed, inspect for a restriction in the induction        system or the exhaust system.   The barometric pressure (BARO) that is used in order to calculate the predicted     MAF value is initially based on the MAP sensor     at key ON.   When the engine is running the MAP sensor     value is continually updated near WOT. A skewed MAP sensor will cause the     calculated MAF value to be inaccurate. The value shown for the MAP sensor     display varies with the altitude. With the ignition ON and the engine OFF,     103 kPa is the approximate value near sea level. This value will decrease     by approximately 3 kPa for every 305 meters (1,000 feet) of altitude.   A high resistance on the ground circuit of the MAP     sensor can cause this DTC to set.      Any loss of vacuum to the MAP sensor can cause this DTC to set. If you suspect the condition may be related to aftermarket accessories, referto Checking Aftermarket Accessories in Wiring Systems.Source: ChevyAvalancheFanClubP0101 MAF Sensor Repair VideoThis video is not produced by us, it is here as an aid in resolving your P0101 trouble code (DTC).', '  Inspect for the following conditions:    An incorrectly routed harness--Inspect the harness of the MAF sensor in order      to verify that it is not routed too close to the following components:    - The secondary ignition wires or coils    - Any solenoids    - Any relays  - Any motors      A low minimum air rate through the sensor bore may cause this DTC to set      at idle or during deceleration. Inspect for any vacuum leaks downstream      of the MAF sensor.      A wide open throttle (WOT) acceleration from a stop should cause the MAF        sensor g/s display on the scan tool to increase rapidly. This increase        should be from 6-12 g/s at idle to 230 g/s or more at the time of the        1-2 shift.        If the increase is not observed, inspect for a restriction in the induction        system or the exhaust system.   The barometric pressure (BARO) that is used in order to calculate the predicted     MAF value is initially based on the <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor     at key ON.   When the engine is running the <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor     value is continually updated near WOT. A skewed MAP sensor will cause the     calculated MAF value to be inaccurate. The value shown for the MAP sensor     display varies with the altitude. With the ignition ON and the engine OFF,     103 kPa is the approximate value near sea level. This value will decrease     by approximately 3 kPa for every 305 meters (1,000 feet) of altitude.   A high resistance on the ground circuit of the <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP     sensor can cause this DTC to set.      Any loss of vacuum to the MAP sensor can cause this DTC to set.'
3', 'P0102', 'P0102 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Mass Air Flow (MAF) Circuit Low Input', 'Basically this means that there is a problem with the Mass Air Flow (MAF) sensor   or circuit. A more technical description would be that the MAF circuit had lower   than expected voltage (air flow). Other MAF sensor circuit DTC trouble codes are P0100, P0101, P0103, and P0104.', 'You will likely not notice any serious drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a general decrease in power or sluggishness.', '', 'A code P0102 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The MAF may be disconnected, or a wiring connection may be bad  The MAF may be dirty or otherwise contaminated (Note: if you use a reusable     oiled air filter, be careful not to apply too much oil or that can contaminate     the MAF).  The MAF sensor may be faulty  The vehicle computer may be faulty (very rare)', '  The MAF may be disconnected, or a wiring connection may be bad  The MAF may be dirty or otherwise contaminated (Note: if you use a reusable     oiled air filter, be careful not to apply too much oil or that can contaminate     the MAF).  The MAF sensor may be faulty  The vehicle computer may be faulty (very rare)', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back. Then   start with the cheapest, easiest repair procedures:  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Inspect for any air leaks near the MAF sensor.  Take the MAF out and clean it using a spray cleaner such as brake cleaner     or electrical contact cleaner. Be gentle with the sensor.  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle     specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor.', '  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Inspect for any air leaks near the MAF sensor.  Take the MAF out and clean it using a spray cleaner such as brake cleaner     or electrical contact cleaner. Be gentle with the sensor.  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle     specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor.'
4', 'P0103', 'P0103 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Mass Air Flow (MAF) Circuit High Input', 'Basically this means that there is a problem with the Mass Air Flow High (MAF)   sensor or circuit. A more technical description would be that the MAF circuit   had higher than expected voltage (air flow). Other MAF sensor circuit DTC trouble codes are P0100, P0101, P0102, and P0104.', 'You will likely not notice any serious drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a general decrease in power or sluggishness.', '', 'A code P0103 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The MAF may be disconnected, or a wiring connection may be bad  The MAF sensor may be damaged  The vehicle computer may be faulty (very rare)', '  The MAF may be disconnected, or a wiring connection may be bad  The MAF sensor may be damaged  The vehicle computer may be faulty (very rare)', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back. Then   start with the cheapest, easiest repair procedures:  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Inspect for any air leaks near the MAF sensor.  Take the MAF out and clean it using a spray cleaner such as brake cleaner     or electrical contact cleaner. Be gentle with the sensor.  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle     specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor.', '  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Inspect for any air leaks near the MAF sensor.  Take the MAF out and clean it using a spray cleaner such as brake cleaner     or electrical contact cleaner. Be gentle with the sensor.  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle     specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor.'
5', 'P0104', 'P0104 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Mass Air Flow (MAF) Circuit Intermittent', 'Basically this means that there is a problem with the Mass Air Flow High (MAF)  sensor or circuit. A more technical description would be that the MAF is producing  incorrect air flow readings. Other MAF sensor circuit DTC trouble codes are P0100, P0101, P0102, and P0103.', 'You will likely not notice any serious drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a general decrease in power or sluggishness.', '', 'A code P0104 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The mass air flow (MAF) circuit is incomplete (broken / frayed wire, etc.)   There is an air leak in the intake system', '  The mass air flow (MAF) circuit is incomplete (broken / frayed wire, etc.)   There is an air leak in the intake system', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back. Then   start with the cheapest, easiest repair procedures:  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Inspect for any air leaks near the MAF sensor.  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle   specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor.', '  Verify that the Mass Air Flow Sensor wiring is connected properly and that     there are no broken / frayed wires.  Inspect for any air leaks near the MAF sensor.  Check the voltage of the MAF sensor (refer to a repair manual for vehicle   specific information)  Replace the MAF sensor.'
6', 'P0105', 'P0105 - MAP Circuit Malfunction', 'Manifold Absolute Pressure/Barometric Pressure Circuit Malfunction', 'The MAP (Manifold Absolute Pressure) sensor is part of the fuel management system.  It reacts to changes in engine manifold pressure.  The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) monitors the MAP sensor continually to properly run the engine.  Changes in engine load require changes in the amount of fuel injected, and timing of the ignition system, etc.An engine under load has more manifold pressure(or less vacuum) than an engine that is coasting.  As the load changes, the MAP sensor voltage signal to the PCM changes accordingly.  To check the MAP sensor operation, though, the PCM watches other sensors to verify that the MAP sensor is working properly.For example, the PCM compares the TPS (Throttle Position Sensor) signal to the MAP signal to verify the MAP signal isn't &quot;sticking&quot;.  If the PCM doesn't see a MAP sensor change immediately follow a change in the throttle pedal sensor, it knows there is a problem with the MAP sensor and sets P0105.  Or, if the PCM notices that the TPS indicates the engine is under load, but the MAP signal indicates that the engine is &quot;coasting&quot; it, again, knows there is a problem with the MAP sensor or TPS and sets P0105.', 'Symptoms of a P0105 check engine light code may include:  Poor running engine  Engine runs rich  Engine won't idle  Engine backfires through tailpipe  Engine misfire under load or at idle  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  In some extreme cases there may be no symptoms other than MIL illumination', '  Poor running engine  Engine runs rich  Engine won't idle  Engine backfires through tailpipe  Engine misfire under load or at idle  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  In some extreme cases there may be no symptoms other than MIL illumination', 'A P0105 DTC could be caused by:  MAP sensor vacuum hose disconnected or plugged  Bad MAP sensor  Bad TPS  Damaged or problematic MAP sensor connector  Damaged or problematic TPS connector  Damaged wiring  Short to reference voltage on signal circuit of MAP sensor  Loss of ground to MAP sensor or TPS  Open on signal circuit of MAP sensor  Bad PCM ', '  MAP sensor vacuum hose disconnected or plugged  Bad <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor  Bad TPS  Damaged or problematic MAP sensor connector  Damaged or problematic TPS connector  Damaged wiring  Short to reference voltage on signal circuit of <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor  Loss of ground to MAP sensor or TPS  Open on signal circuit of MAP sensor  Bad PCM ', 'Using a scanner or code reader, turn the ignition on and engine OFF; what does the MAP sensor voltage read?  It should be about 4 Volts for sea level.  If you are at a higher altitude, it should decrease about half a volt or so for each 1,000 ft. of altitude (this will vary from model to model)  Or if you have a separate MAF (Mass air flow) sensor on your vehicle, they are usually equipped with a Barometric pressure reading.  If so, the Baro reading should match the MAP reading (they both measure ambient air pressure).  If they're roughly equal, then, check for Freeze Frame data of the MAP sensor (if available).NOTE:  Freeze Frame data is the PCM recording a fault when it happens.  It captures the readings of the various PIDS (parameter identifiers)available to troubleshoot what happened.  It's like a recording of the problem as it happened.  At idle a typical MAP sensor Voltage reading should be about a volt, and at WOT (wide open throttle) it should approach 4.5 to 5 Volts.  As for the TPS, at idle, the voltage reading is about 1 Volt or less.  As the throttle is opened the reading will increase to 4.5 Volts at WOT.  Do the two readings make sense?  For example, if the TPS reading on Freeze Frame data shows 2.5 Volts (indicating partial throttle) does the MAP sensor indicate a reading that isn't at either extreme?  Using the Freeze Frame data (if available) compare the MAP reading to the TPS when the problem occurred.  This can help you identify what happened If you have no access to Freeze Frame data then check if the MAP sensor voltage changes when you apply vacuum to it. You can do this by mouth or a vacuum pump.  The voltage should increase as you apply vacuum.  If the reading doesn't change as you apply vacuum, make sure there are no obstructions in the hose to the sensor.  If the hose is clear, the MAP sensor is usually bad, but it doesn't rule out the following from causing the problem: Does the MAP sensor appear to be stuck at less than .5 Volts?  Then:NOTE:  This code shouldn't set if the MAP is stuck at extremely low voltage, however, I'm adding it in because there's no way to know for certain for which vehicles a low voltage condition may set a P0105.  Inspect the wiring harness and MAP sensor connector.  Repair any damage  Unplug the MAP sensor connector.  Also, at the PCM connector, remove the MAP sensor signal wire and check for continuity to the MAP sensor connector.  If there is infinite resistance, then repair open in MAP signal circuit. If the signal wire has continuity to the MAP sensor connector, then check for 5 volt reference voltage to the connector and a good ground.  If both are present, then re-install all removed wiring and replace the MAP sensor.Does the MAP sensor appear to be stuck at full 4.5 voltage? Then:  Inspect the wiring harness for damage.  Repair as needed  Remove the MAP sensor signal wire from the PCM connector.  With a voltmeter measure the voltage with KEY ON ENGINE OFF.  Is there 4.5 Volts?  If so, unplug the MAP sensor and recheck.  If it is still present, then repair short between the signal wire and 5 volt reference wire.   If unplugging the MAP sensor causes the voltage to disappear, check that the ground is intact.  If it is, then replace the MAP sensor due to internal short.MAP sensor codes include P0106, P0107, P0108 and P0109.', ''
7', 'P0106', 'P0106 - MAP/Barometric Pressure Circuit Range/Performance Problem', 'Manifold Absolute Pressure/Barometric Pressure Circuit Range/Performance   Problem', '', 'The following could be symptomatic of a P0106:   Engine runs rough   Black smoke at tailpipe   Engine will not idle   Poor fuel economy   Engine misses at speed', '   Engine runs rough   Black smoke at tailpipe   Engine will not idle   Poor fuel economy   Engine misses at speed', 'A P0106 could be caused by:   Bad MAP sensor   Water/dirt intrusion affecting MAP sensor     connector   Intermittent open in the reference, ground, or signal wire for the MAP     sensor   Intermittent short in the reference, ground, or signal wire for the MAP     sensor   Ground problem due to corrosion causing intermittent signal problem  A break in the flexible air intake duct between the MAF and the intake manifold   Bad PCM (do not assume the PCM is bad until you've exhausted all other     possibilities)', '   Bad <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor   Water/dirt intrusion affecting <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor     connector   Intermittent open in the reference, ground, or signal wire for the MAP     sensor   Intermittent short in the reference, ground, or signal wire for the MAP     sensor   Ground problem due to corrosion causing intermittent signal problem  A break in the flexible air intake duct between the MAF and the intake manifold   Bad PCM (do not assume the PCM is bad until you've exhausted all other     possibilities)', 'Using a scan tool, watch the MAP sensor value   with the key on, engine off. Compare the BARO reading with the MAP reading.   They should be roughly equal. The voltage for the MAP sensor should read approx.   4.5 volts. Now start the engine and look for a significant drop in the MAP sensor   voltage indicating the MAP sensor is working.If the MAP reading doesn't change perform the following:   With the Key on, engine off, disconnect the vacuum hose from the MAP sensor.     Using a vacuum pump, pull 20 in. of vacuum on the MAP sensor. Does the voltage     drop? It should. If it doesn't inspect the MAP sensor vacuum port and vacuum     hose to manifold for a restriction of some kind. Repair or replace as necessary.  If there are no restrictions, and the value doesn't change with vacuum,     then perform the following: with the Key on and engine off and the MAP sensor     unplugged, check for 5 Volts at the reference wire to the MAP sensor connector     with a Digital Voltmeter. If there is none, check for reference voltage at     the PCM connector. If the reference voltage is present at the PCM connector     but not the MAP connector, check for open or short in the reference wire between     MAP and PCM and retest.  If reference voltage is present, then check for existing ground at the MAP     sensor connector. If it isn't present then repair open/short in the ground     circuit.  If ground is present, then replace MAP sensor.Other  MAP sensor trouble codes include P0105, P0107, P0108 and P0109.', ''
8', 'P0107', 'P0107 - Manifold Absolute Pressure/Barometric Pressure Circuit Low Input', 'Manifold Absolute Pressure/Barometric Pressure Circuit Low Input', '', 'Anytime the MAP sensor signal is low the   vehicle will likely have a very difficult time starting. Other symptoms may   include:   Hard to start   Long cranking times   Sputtering/missing   Blowing black smoke   Poor fuel economy   Dies intermittently   MIL(Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', '   Hard to start   Long cranking times   Sputtering/missing   Blowing black smoke   Poor fuel economy   Dies intermittently   MIL(Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', 'The causes of a low MAP sensor signal circuit (P0107)   could be any of the following:   Bad MAP sensor   Open or short in the signal circuit   Open or short in the 5 Volt reference circuit   Ground circuit open or shorted   Bad PCM', '   Bad <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor   Open or short in the signal circuit   Open or short in the 5 Volt reference circuit   Ground circuit open or shorted   Bad PCM', 'First, using a scan tool with the Key on and engine running, monitor the MAP   sensor voltage. If it is reading less than .5 volts, turn engine off, unplug   the MAP sensor and, using a DVOM (Digital Volt/Ohm Meter) check for 5Volts on   the 5 Volt reference circuit.1. If there is not 5 Volts on the reference circuit, then check for the reference   voltage at the PCM connector. If it is present at the PCM connector but not   the MAP connector, repair the open in the reference circuit between the PCM   and MAP harness connector. If 5 Volt reference is NOT present at the PCM connector,   check powers and grounds of PCM and repair/replace as needed. (NOTE: On Chrysler   products, a shorted Crank sensor, Vehicle speed sensor or any other sensor that   utilizes the 5 Volt reference from the PCM can short out the 5 Volt reference.   To fix simply unplug each sensor one at a time until the 5 Volt reference reappears.   The last sensor unplugged is the shorted sensor.)2. If you have a 5 Volt reference at the MAP connector, jumper the 5 volt reference   circuit to the signal circuit. Now check the MAP voltage on the scan tool. It   should be 4.5 to 5 Volts. If it is, replace MAP sensor. If not, repair open/short   in the signal circuit wiring and re-check.3. If all appears okay, perform a wiggle test. Start engine and manipulate   the harness, connector and tap on the MAP sensor. Note any changes in voltage   or engine speed. Repair connector, harness, or sensor as needed.4. If the wiggle test checks out, use a vacuum pump (or just use your lungs)   to draw a vacuum on the MAP sensor vacuum port. As you add vacuum the voltage   should decrease. With no vacuum, the MAP sensor should read approximately 4.5   volts. If there is no change in MAP sensor reading on the scan tool, replace   MAP sensor.MAP Sensor DTC's: P0105, P0106, P0108 and P0109.', ''
9', 'P0108', 'P0108 - MAP Pressure Circuit High Input', 'Manifold Absolute Pressure/Barometric Pressure Circuit High Input ', 'The MAP (Manifold Absolute Pressure) sensor measures engine manifold negative air pressure. It's usually a three wire sensor: a ground wire, a 5 volt reference wire from the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) to the MAP sensor, and a signal wire that informs the PCM of the MAP sensor voltage reading as it changes.The higher the engine vacuum, the lower the voltage reading. The voltage should range between about 1 volt (at idle) to about 5 volts (WOT wide open throttle).If the PCM sees the voltage reading from the MAP sensor is greater than 5 Volts, or if the voltage reading is higher than what the PCM considers normal under certain circumstances, a P0108 DTC will set. ', 'Symptoms of a P0108 DTC code may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) will likely be on  Engine may run poorly  Engine may not run at all  Fuel mileage may decrease  Presence of black smoke at exhaust', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) will likely be on  Engine may run poorly  Engine may not run at all  Fuel mileage may decrease  Presence of black smoke at exhaust', 'Potential causes of a P0108 code:  Bad MAP sensor  Leak in vacuum supply line to MAP sensor  Engine vacuum leak  Short on signal wire to PCM  Short on reference voltage wire from PCM  Open in ground circuit to MAP  Worn engine causing low vacuum ', '  Bad <a href="/faq/map-sensor.php">MAP sensor  Leak in vacuum supply line to MAP sensor  Engine vacuum leak  Short on signal wire to PCM  Short on reference voltage wire from PCM  Open in ground circuit to MAP  Worn engine causing low vacuum ', 'A good way to diagnose if the MAP sensor is to blame would be to compare the KOEO (key on engine off) MAP sensor reading on a scan tool with the Barometric pressure reading. They should be the same because they both measure atmospheric pressure.If the MAP reading is greater than 0.5 volt off of the BARO reading, then replacing the MAP sensor would likely fix the problem. Otherwise, start the engine and observe the MAP reading at idle. It should normally be about 1.5 volts (varies according to altitude).a. If it is, the problem is likely intermittent. Check all the vacuum hoses for damage and replace as necessary. You can also try wiggle testing the harness and connector to reproduce the problem.b. If the scan tool MAP reading is more than 4.5 volts, check the actual engine vacuum reading with the engine running. If it is less than 15 or 16 in. Hg, then the PCM is probably not seeing enough vacuum (due to a worn engine, perhaps) for a given operating condition (which causes a higher than normal voltage signal to the PCM) and setting the code. Repair the engine vacuum problem and retest.c. But, if the actual engine vacuum reading is 16 in. Hg or more, then unplug the MAP sensor. The scan tool MAP reading should indicate that there is no voltage present. Check that the ground from the PCM is intact and also that the MAP sensor connector and terminals are tight. If the connection is good, then replace the map sensor.d. However if, with KOEO, &amp; the MAP sensor unplugged, the scan tool shows a voltage reading, then there may be a short in the harness to the MAP sensor. Turn the ignition off. At the PCM unplug connector and remove the MAP signal wire from the connector. Re-attach the PCM connector and see if with KOEO, the scan tool MAP reading shows voltage. If it still does, replace the PCM. If not, check for voltage on the signal wire you just removed from the PCM. If there is voltage on the signal wire, find the short in the harness and repair. Other MAP Sensor codes: P0105 - P0106 - P0107 - P0109', ''
10', 'P0110', 'P0110 DTC - IAT Circuit Malfunction', 'Intake Air Temperature Circuit Malfunction ', 'The IAT (Intake Air Temperature) sensor is a thermistor, which basically means it measures air temperature by detecting resistance in the air. It's usually located somewhere in the intake air ductwork, but can be located in the intake manifold on some applications. It is usually a two wire sensor supplied with a 5 volt reference wire (which also acts as a signal wire) from the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) and a ground wire. As air passes over the sensor the resistance changes. This change in resistance affects the 5 Volts supplied to the sensor accordingly. Colder air causes higher resistance and higher signal voltage &amp; warmer air lower resistance and lower signal voltage. The PCM monitors this change in the 5 Volts and calculates air temperature. If the PCM detects a voltage that is out of normal operating range for the sensor, P0110 will set. ', 'There may be no noticeable symptoms other than MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination. However, it could be possible that you may experience poor drivability complaints. ', '', 'Potential causes of the P0110 DTC include:   IAT sensor shifted out of airflow  Bad IAT sensor  Shorted to ground or open on signal circuit to IAT  Open in ground circuit to IAT  Poor connection at IAT (backed out terminals, broken connector locks, etc.)  Bad PCM ', '  IAT sensor shifted out of airflow  Bad IAT sensor  Shorted to ground or open on signal circuit to IAT  Open in ground circuit to IAT  Poor connection at IAT (backed out terminals, broken connector locks, etc.)  Bad PCM ', 'First visually check that the IAT is in place and hasn't been dislodged. As a quick check of the IAT, use a scan tool &amp; check for IAT reading with KOEO (Key on engine off). If the engine is cold, the IAT reading should be the same as the CTS (Coolant temperature sensor) reading. If it shows more than a few degrees variance (for example, if it indicates a temperature extreme like negative 40 deg. or 300 deg. then obviously there's a problem) unplug the IAT and do a resistance test across the two terminals.Each sensor will have different resistances so you'll have to get that info from a repair manual. If the resistance of the IAT sensor isn't within specs, replace the sensor. There should be some resistance, so if it measures infinite resistance, replace the sensor.Having said that, here is a little more diagnostic info if that doesn't take care of it:1. If your KOEO IAT reading is at the high extreme, like 300 deg. (which obviously is inaccurate), disconnect the IAT sensor. If the reading now shows the lowest extreme (-50 or so), then replace the IAT sensor. However, if when unplugging the IAT, the reading doesn't change then turn off the ignition and disconnect the PCM connector. Use a voltmeter to check for continuity between a good ground and the signal wire to the IAT. If there is continuity, then repair short to ground on the signal wire. If there is not continuity, then the PCM may have a problem2. If your KOEO IAT reading is at the low extreme, again disconnect the IAT connector. Check that there is 5 Volts on the signal and the other is grounded.a. If you have 5 volts present and a good ground, jumper the two terminals together. Now the reading on the scanner should be at the high extreme. If it is, replace the IAT sensor. But if it stays low even after you jumper the two wires together, then there may be an open in the wiring harness or a problem with the PCM.b. If you don't have 5 Volts present, then check for reference voltage back at the PCM connector. If it's present there but not at the IAT sensor, repair the open in the signal wire. Other IAT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0095, P0096, P0097, P0098, P0099, P0109, P0111, P0112, P0113, P0114', ''
11', 'P0111', 'P0111 - IAT Circuit Malfunction', 'Intake Air Temperature (IAT) Circuit Range/Performance Problem', 'The IAT (Intake Air Temperature) sensor is a thermistor that varies resistance based upon the temperature of the engine intake air. Usually a two wire sensor. One wire is supplied 5 Volt from the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) and the other is a ground. The PCM monitors the change in the 5 Volt supplied to determine air temperature. When the intake air is cold, the resistance is high, resulting in a high signal voltage.When the intake air is warm, the reistance is low, resulting in a low signal voltage. This code means that the PCM saw a larger-than-normal change in a shorter-than-expected time on the IAT signal circuit. ', 'Since this code is likely pointing to an intermittent problem on the IAT circuit, there may not be any symptoms at present. However, the MIL will likely be on. The car MAY exhibit some drivability problems, but it is more likely that there will be no noticeable symptoms to the driver.', '', 'Potential causes of the P0111 DTC include:   a bad IAT sensor  an open in the signal or ground circuit  a short to ground on the signal circuit  poor connection at sensor or PCM', '  a bad IAT sensor  an open in the signal or ground circuit  a short to ground on the signal circuit  poor connection at sensor or PCM', 'If there are other IAT codes present, diagnose them first. If not, then, using a scan tool verify the IAT voltage with KOEO (Key on engine off).If, on a cold engine it reads the same as the CTS (Coolant temperature sensor), then the problem is intermittent. But if the IAT reading isn't the same as the CTS refer to diagnostic procedure for P0110. If your scan tool has a freeze frame failure records feature, use it to see what the IAT reading was at the time of the failure. If the reading was at negative 30 or so degrees F (indicating it was at the extreme coldest reading), then there was an intermittent high resistance reading on the IAT signal circuit.Check for an open ground on the ground circuit and signal circuit. If they are OK, try raising and lowering the temperature of the IAT sensor artificially. Do this by removing the IAT and putting it in a freezer and then applying heat with a heat gun (be careful not to apply too much heat to the IAT with the heat gun or it'll melt the sensor). Watch the resistance change using an ohmmeter attached to each terminal. It should vary smoothly with no sudden jumps. If the reading jumps suddenly, then repace the IAT sensor.However if the freeze frame reading was at the highest extreme (above 250 deg. F) then there was an intermittent low resistance on the signal circuit. Check for a short to ground on the signal circuit. If it appears OK, then do the above artificial heat test and replace the IAT as necessary. If the problem can't be duplicated, use a voltmeter to watch the signal voltage as you &quot;wiggle&quot; test the wiring harness. Watch for a sudden change in voltage indicating a short or open. Replace IAT as necessary.This is a pretty simple code and it only really looks for extremely short changes that are relatively high in voltage. It's usually the sensor that is bad unless the vehicle is extremely old, in which case there may be harness problems. Other IAT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0095, P0096, P0097, P0098, P0099, P0109, P0110, P0112, P0113, P0114', ''
12', 'P0112', 'P0112 - Intake Air Temperature Circuit Low Input', 'Intake Air Temperature Circuit Low Input', 'The IAT (intake air temperature) sensor simply measures the temperature of air thatis entering the engine.  Intake air temperature is important because the higher theintake air, the higher the combustion temperatures.  High combustion temperaturesresult in increased Nox (Nitrogen oxides) emissions.To keep these higher temps  from causing increased combustion temps, the intake air tubing should be intact,  allowing the engine to "breathe" air that isn't sampled from the engine  compartment.  The IAT measures air temp by using a thermistor, or a thermometer of  sorts.  The thermistor is supplied 5 volts reference voltage from the PCM  (powertrain control module) and a ground.  Usually, when the air temperature is cold  the resistance in the thermistor is high and when the air temperature is warmer, the  resistance decreases.  This change in resistance changes the 5 V reference from the  PCM, thereby informing the PCM of the temperature of incoming air.  If the PCM  notices that the incoming air temp is unusually high, say, 300 degrees, when the  engine temp is still relatively low, it will set a P0112.  ', 'There may be no noticeable symptoms of a P0112 code other than an MIL (MalfunctionIndicator Lamp).  However, a emissions test may reveal higher Nox readings dependingon the type of IAT failure.  Or the engine may ping under load, depending on thetype of IAT failure.', '', 'Usually the P0112 is caused by a bad IAT (internally shorted or open or otherwise damaged), but it could also be:  No reference voltage to the IAT sensor due to an open wire  Excessively high intake air temperatures  Short to ground on signal circuit  Damaged IAT connector  Bad PCM ', '  No reference voltage to the IAT sensor due to an open wire  Excessively high intake air temperatures  Short to ground on signal circuit  Damaged IAT connector  Bad PCM ', 'Hook up your scan tool or code reader and read the IAT reading.  With a cold engine,the IAT should roughly match the coolant reading, since both will read ambienttemperature.  If the IAT is reading excessively high, check the IAT connector fordamage.  If you find none, unplug the IAT sensor and recheck the reading.  It shouldnow read the minimum, around -20 deg.  If it does, then replace the IAT sensor.  But, if the reading is still high, unplug the sensor and check for resistance acrossthe two wiring harness terminals.  If there is infinite resistance, then the PCMitself is bad.  If the resistance isn't infinite, then check and repair the shortto ground on the signal circuit.Other IAT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0095, P0096, P0097, P0098, P0099, P0109, P0110, P0111, P0113, P0114', ''
13', 'P0113', 'P0113 - Intake Air Temperature Circuit High Input', 'Intake Air Temperature Circuit High Input', '', 'There will likely be no symptoms other than illumination of the Malfunction   Indicator Lamp (MIL - Check Engine Light / Service Engine Soon).', '  Rough or low idle  Stalling  Surging  No/little acceleration  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0113 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Internally failed IAT sensor   Faulty connection at IAT sensor   Open in IAT ground circuit or signal circuit   Short to voltage in IAT signal circuit or reference circuit  IAT harness and/or wiring routed too close to high-voltage wiring (e.g.     alternator, spark plug cables, etc.)   Faulty PCM (less likely but not impossible)', '  Internally failed IAT sensor   Faulty connection at IAT sensor   Open in IAT ground circuit or signal circuit   Short to voltage in IAT signal circuit or reference circuit  IAT harness and/or wiring routed too close to high-voltage wiring (e.g.     alternator, spark plug cables, etc.)   Faulty PCM (less likely but not impossible)', 'First, if you have access to a scan tool, is there an IAT reading? If the IAT   reading is logical then the problem is likely intermittent. If the reading is   less than -30 degrees, unplug the connector. Install a jumper wire between the   harness connector signal and ground circuits. The IAT temperature reading on   the scan tool should be maxed out at the high end. For example it should be   280 degrees Farenheit or higher. If it is, the wiring is okay, and it may have   been the connection. If it isn't install the jumper wire between the IAT signal   circuit and the chassis ground.If now the IAT reading on the scan tool is maxed   out then check for an open in the IAT ground circuit. If you get no reading   at all on the scan tool, it's likely that the sensor signal is open or the 5   volt reference is missing. Check using a DVOM (digital volt ohm meter) for a   5 volt reference. If it's there, then unplug the connector at the PCM and check   for continuity on the IAT signal circuit between the PCM connector and the IAT   connector.Other IAT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0095, P0096, P0097, P0098, P0099, P0109, P0110, P0111, P0112, P0114', ''
14', 'P0115', 'P0115 - Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit Malfunction', 'Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit Malfunction ', 'The ECT (Engine coolant temperature) sensor is basically a thermistor that changes resistance with temperature.  Usually a two wire sensor, a 5Volt reference from PCM (Powertrain Control Module) and ground signal to PCM.  This is different from a temperature SENDER (which usually operates the dash temperature gauge and operates in a similar way as the SENSOR, only it's a different circuit than what a P0115 is referring to).  As the temperature of the coolant changes, the resistance changes on the ground signal to the PCM. When the engine is cold, the resistance is high.  When the engine is warm, the resistance is low.  If the PCM detects a voltage condition that seems abnormally low or high, P0115 will set. ', 'Symptoms of a P0115 DTC code may include:MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination will always occur  Vehicle may be hard to start   May blow a lot of black smoke and run extremely rich  Engine may want to die or backfire in tailpipe  Engine may run lean and increased Nox emissions may be apparent (Requires gas analyzer)  Cooling fans may run all the time when they shouldn't be, or not at all when they should be', 'MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination will always occur  Vehicle may be hard to start   May blow a lot of black smoke and run extremely rich  Engine may want to die or backfire in tailpipe  Engine may run lean and increased Nox emissions may be apparent (Requires gas analyzer)  Cooling fans may run all the time when they shouldn't be, or not at all when they should be', 'Usually the cause can be traced to a bad ECT sensor, however that doesn't preclude the following:   Wiring or connector damaged at sensor   Open  or short in reference or signal circuit  Open or short in signal circuit  Bad PCM', '   Wiring or connector damaged at sensor   Open  or short in reference or signal circuit  Open or short in signal circuit  Bad PCM', 'First, visually check the sensor for damage to wiring or connector and repair as necessary.  Then, if you have access to a scanner, determine what the temperature of the engine is.  (If you don't have access to a scan tool, using the dash temperature gauge may not be an effective way to determine coolant temperature.  This is because the P0115 code is referring to the ECT SENSOR, and the dash gauge is operated by, usually a one-wire SENDER. Basically a different sensor that the code doesn't refer to.)2.  If the engine temperature is abnormally high, around 280 deg. F, that's abnormal.  Unplug the sensor on the engine and see if the signal drops to, say, negative 50 deg. F. If it does, then it's a good bet the sensor is bad, internally shorted, causing a low resistance signal to be sent to the PCM.  However if you want to be sure it's the sensor and not the wiring, there's a couple tests you can do.  With the ECT sensor unplugged, check that you have 5 volts on the reference circuit with KOEO (Key on engine off).      Also you can check the resistance of the sensor to ground using an Ohm meter.  The resistance of a normal sensor to ground will vary a little depending on the vehicle, but basically, if the temp of the engine is around 200 deg. F., the resistance will be about 200 Ohms.  If the temperature is about 0 def. F., the resistance will be over 10,000 Ohms.  With this test you should be able to tell if the resistance of the sensor matches the temperature of the engine.  If it's not accurate according to your engine's temperature, then you probably have a bad sensor.3. Now, if the temperature of the engine according to the scanner is around 280 deg. F. and unplugging the sensor doesn't cause the reading to drop to negative 50 deg. F, but it stays at the same high temperature reading, then you'll need to repair the short on the signal circuit(ground) to the PCM. It's shorted directly to ground somewhere.4. If your temperature reading of the engine according to the scanner is showing negative 50 deg. F or so, (and you don't live in the arctic!) unplug the sensor and check for a 5V reference present at the sensor.5. If there isn't, then check at the PCM connector for proper 5V reference.  If it's present at the PCM connector, then repair the open or short on 5V reference from PCM. If there is no 5V reference present at the PCM connector, then you're done with your diagnosis and you may have a PCM fault.   6. If the 5V reference circuit is intact, then check the ground signal to the PCM using the previous ground resistance test.  If the resistance isn't normal for the temperature of the engine, then ohm the resistance of the ground signal to the PCM by removing the ground signal wire from the PCM connector.  The wire should have no resistance, unplugged from the PCM to the sensor.  If it does, repair open in the signal to the PCM.  If it doesn't have any resistance on the ground signal wire and the resistance test of the sensor is normal, then suspect a faulty PCM. Other coolant engine light codes: P0115, P0116, P0117, P0118, P0119, P0125, P0128', ''
15', 'P0116', 'P0116 - ECT Circuit Range/Performance', 'Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) Circuit Range/Performance Problem ', 'The ECT (Engine coolant temperature) sensor is a thermistor which changes resistance based on temperature of the coolant in contact with it. The ECT sensor will be located in the block or coolant passage. Usually it is a two wire sensor. One wire is a 5 Volt supply from the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) to the ECT. The other is a ground to the ECT.As the temperature of the coolant changes the resistance on the signal wire changes accordingly. The PCM monitors the reading and determines coolant temperature in order to perform essential engine fuel management. When engine coolant is low, sensor resistance is high. The PCM will see a high signal voltage (low temperature). When coolant is warm, the sensor's resistance is low and the PCM will see a high temperature. The PCM expects to see slow resistance changes on the ECT signal circuit. If it sees a quick change in voltage that isn't consistent with an engine warming up, this P0116 code will set. Or if it sees a lack of change in ECT signal, this code may set. ', 'There may be no noticeable symptoms if the problem is very intermittent, however the following may occur:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor drivability  Black smoke at tailpipe  Poor fuel economy  May not idle  May exhibit stalling or misfires', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor drivability  Black smoke at tailpipe  Poor fuel economy  May not idle  May exhibit stalling or misfires', 'Potential causes of the P0116 code include:   Missing or stuck-open thermostat  Bad ECT sensor  Short or open on signal wire  Short or open on ground wire  Poor connections in wiring ', '  Missing or stuck-open thermostat  Bad <a href="/faq/ect-sensor.php">ECT sensor  Short or open on signal wire  Short or open on ground wire  Poor connections in wiring ', 'If there are any other ECT sensor codes, diagnose them first.Using a scan tool, check the ECT reading. On a cold engine, it should match the IAT reading or should be equal to ambient (outside) temperature reading. If it does match the IAT or ambient temp, check the freeze frame data on your scan tool (if equipped). The saved data should tell you what the ECT reading was when the fault occurred.a) If the saved info indicates that the engine coolant reading was at the coldest exreme (around -30 deg. F) then that's a good indication the ECT resistance was intermittently high (unless you live in Anchorage!) Check for an open in the ECT sensor ground and signal circuits and repair as necessary. If they appear okay, warm the engine up while monitoring the ECT for any intermittent jumps high or low. If there are replace the ECT.b) If the saved info indicates that the engine coolant reading was at the warmest exreme (around 250+ deg.F) then that's a good indication the ECT resistance was intermittently low. Check for a short to ground on the signal circuit and repair as necessary. If it appears okay, warm the engine up while monitoring the ECT for any intermittent jumps high or low. If there are replace the ECT. Other ECT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0115, P0117, P0118, P0119, P0125, P0128', ''
16', 'P0117', 'P0117 - ECT Circuit Malfunction', 'Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) Circuit Low Input ', 'The ECT (Engine coolant temperature) sensor is a thermistor located in the engine block or other coolant passage. It changes resistance with changes in temperature of the coolant that it's in contact with. It's usually a two wire sensor. One wire is a 5 volt reference from PCM (Powertrain Control Module) and the other is a ground supplied from PCM.As the temperature of the coolant changes, the resistance of the sensor changes. When the engine is cold, the resistance is high. When the engine is warm, the resistance is low. If the PCM detects a signal voltage lower than the normal operating range of the sensor then P0117 code will set.', 'Potential symptoms include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor fuel economy  Poor drivability  Engine may run rough or blow black smoke out the tailpipe  May not idle  May start and then die', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor fuel economy  Poor drivability  Engine may run rough or blow black smoke out the tailpipe  May not idle  May start and then die', 'Potential causes of the P0117 code include:   Bad ECT sensor  Short to ground on ECT signal circuit  Faulty or damaged connectors  Wiring harness damaged  Loose terminals at ECT or PCM  POSSIBLY an overheated engine  Bad PCM', '  Bad <a href="/faq/ect-sensor.php">ECT sensor  Short to ground on ECT signal circuit  Faulty or damaged connectors  Wiring harness damaged  Loose terminals at ECT or PCM  POSSIBLY an overheated engine  Bad PCM', 'Since this code is for an abnormally low signal to the PCM from the ECT, the PCM saw a excessively &quot;hot&quot; condition in the engine coolant. This could be due to faulty ECT sensor or wiring, but it could, conceivably, be caused by an overheated engine.So if your engine was overheated diagnose that first. Having said that here are the possible solutions:Using a scan tool, with KOEO (Key on engine off) check the ECT reading on the display. On a cold engine the ECT reading should match the IAT (Intake Air Temperature) sensor reading. If it doesn't, replace the ECT sensor.1. If the ECT reading is showing an excessively hot reading, for example more than 260 deg. F, then unplug the ECT sensor. This should cause the ECT reading to drop to the extreme cold reading (around -30 deg.F or so). If it does, replace the sensor, because it's internally shorted. If it doesn't change the reading, the check for a short to ground on the signal circuit of the ECT wiring. It could be that the two ECT wires are shorted to each other. Look for any chafing or melted wiring. Repair as necessary.a. If you can't find any wiring problems and the ECT reading doesn't drop to the extreme coldest when unplugged, then, check for voltage coming out of the PCM on the signal wire's pin at the PCM connector. If there isn't any voltage, or it is low, then the PCM may be bad. NOTE: On some models it is possible for the 5 Volt reference signal to be temperarily shorted. This can happen if an engine sensor internally shorts the 5 Volt reference. Since the 5 Volt reference is a &quot;shared&quot; circuit on many models, this will cause it to be abnormally low. Usually, though this will be accompanied by several other sensor codes. If you suspect that may be the case, unplug each sensor until the 5 Volt reference reappears. The last sensor unplugged is the offending sensor. Replace and recheck the signal wire from the PCM connector2. If the scan tool ECT reading seems normal at this time then the problem may be intermittent. Use a &quot;wiggle&quot; test to manipulate the wiring harness and connectors while watching the ECT reading on the scan tool. Repair any wiring or connectors that are loose or corroded. You could check the Freeze frame data if your scan tool has that function. It will show the ECT reading when the failure occurred. If it shows the reading to be at the hottest extreme then replace the ECT sensor and see if the code reappears. Other ECT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0115, P0116, P0118, P0119, P0125, P0128', ''
17', 'P0118', 'P0118 - Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit High Input', 'Engine Coolant Temperature Circuit High Input', '', 'Symptoms of a P0118 could include:  Very poor fuel economy   A no start condition   Vehicle may start, but run very poorly, blowing black smoke, running very     rough and misfiring   Illumination of MIL', '  Very poor fuel economy   A no start condition   Vehicle may start, but run very poorly, blowing black smoke, running very     rough and misfiring   Illumination of MIL', 'A code P0118 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  A bad connection at the sensor   An open in the ground circuit between the ECT sensor and the PCM  A short in the voltage feed between the sensor and the PCM   A bad PCM (less likely)   A bad temperature sensor (shorted internally)', '  A bad connection at the sensor   An open in the ground circuit between the <a href="/faq/ect-sensor.php">ECT sensor and the PCM  A short in the voltage feed between the sensor and the PCM   A bad PCM (less likely)   A bad temperature sensor (shorted internally)', 'First, if you have access to a scan tool, check the reading of the coolant   sensor. Does it read a logical number? If so, the problem is likely intermittent.   Perform a &quot;wiggle&quot; test by wiggling the connector and harness to the   sensor while watching the reading on the scan tool. Watch for any drop-outs.   Drop-outs would indicate a bad connection. If the scan tool reads an illogical   temperature, check the resistance of the temperature sensor. If it is out of   specs, replace it. If it is in specifications, unplug the sensor and, using   a fused jumper wire, jumper the two terminals of the connector together. The   temperature reading should now be maxed out to above 250 degrees F. If not,   there is likely a problem with the ground circuit or voltage supply.Check for 5 volts reference voltage at the connector. Also check for ground   presence at the connector. If you do not have 5V ref. and/or ground continuity,   check for these back at the PCM connector. If you have these at the PCM connector,   then repair open or short between the PCM and the sensor. If you do not, remove   the offending wire from the PCM and then check for proper voltage at the PCM   pin. If it's present now, repair short on the circuit. If it isn't present after   removing the wire and checking the pin, replace PCMNOTE: Usually, P0118 is indicative of a bad temperature sensor, but doesn't   rule out these other possibilities. If you're unsure of how to diagnose a PCM,   do not attempt.Other engine coolant  engine light codes: P0115, P0116, P0117, P0118, P0119, P0125, P0128', ''
18', 'P0120', 'P0120 DTC - TPS A Circuit Malfunction', 'Throttle Position Sensor/Switch (TPS) A Circuit Malfunction', 'The TPS (Throttle Position Sensor) is a potentiometer that is mounted to the throttle body. It detects the throttle blade angle. As the throttle blade moves, the TPS sends a signal to the PCM (Powertrain Control Module). Usually a three wire sensor: A 5 volt reference from the PCM to the TPS, a ground from the PCM to the TPS, and a signal return from the TPS to the PCM.The TPS sends the throttle position information back to the PCM on this signal wire. When the throttle is closed the signal is near .45 volts. At WOT (Wide Open Throttle) the TPS signal voltage will approach a full 5 volts. When the PCM sees a voltage that is outside of normal operating range, P0120 will set.NOTE: The PCM knows that any large change in throttle position means a cooresponding change in manifold pressure (MAP). On some models the PCM will monitor MAP and TPS operation for comparison. Meaning that if the PCM sees a large percentage change in throttle position, it expects to see a cooresponding change in manifold pressure and vice versa. If it doesn't see this comparitive change, P0120 may set. This doesn't apply to all models.', 'Potential symptoms include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Misfiring at idle or at highway speed  Poor idle quality  Possibly won't idle  Possibly starts and stalls ', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Misfiring at idle or at highway speed  Poor idle quality  Possibly won't idle  Possibly starts and stalls ', 'Potential causes of the P0120 code include:   Sticking throttle return spring  MAP or TPS connector corrosion  Misrouted harness causing chafing  Bad TPS  Bad PCM', '  Sticking throttle return spring  MAP or TPS connector corrosion  Misrouted harness causing chafing  Bad TPS  Bad PCM', 'If you have access to a scan tool, with KOEO (Key on engine off) observe the TPS voltage. With throttle closed, voltage should be about .45 volts. It should gradually sweep upwards to approximately 4.5 to 5 volts as you depress the throttle. Sometimes only a scope can capture an intermittent glitch in the TPS signal voltage. If you notice a glitch in the TPS sweep voltage, replace the TPS.NOTE: Some TPS sensors require fine adjustment. If you aren't comfortable with using a DVOM (Digital Volt Ohm meter) to adjust the new TPS, then it's best to take the vehicle to a shop. If the voltage is not .45 volts (+or- .3 volts or so) with the throttle closed or if the reading is &quot;stuck&quot; then unplug the TPS connector. With KOEO check for 5 volts reference voltage present at the connector and a good ground. You can check the signal circuit for continuity by jumping a fused wire between the ground circuit of the TPS connector and the signal circuit. If the TPS reading on the scan tool now reads zero, then replace the TPS. However if that doesn't change the reading to zero, then check for an open or a short on the signal wire and if none is found, suspect a bad PCM. If manipulating the TPS wiring harness causes any change in idle, then suspect bad TPS. Other TPS sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0121, P0122, P0123, P0124', ''
19', 'P0121', 'P0121 - Throttle Position Sensor/Switch A Circuit Range/Performance Problem', 'Throttle Position Sensor/Switch A Circuit Range/Performance Problem', '', 'Symptoms of a P0121 trouble code could include:  Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination (Check Engine Light or Service     Engine Soon light)   Intermittent stumble on acceleration or deceleration   Blows black smoke on acceleration  No start', '  Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination (Check Engine Light or Service     Engine Soon light)   Intermittent stumble on acceleration or deceleration   Blows black smoke on acceleration  No start', 'A code P0121 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  TPS has intermittent open or short internally  Harness is rubbing and causing an open or short in the wiring   Bad connection at the TPS   Bad PCM (less likely)   Water or corrosion in connector or sensor', '  TPS has intermittent open or short internally  Harness is rubbing and causing an open or short in the wiring   Bad connection at the TPS   Bad PCM (less likely)   Water or corrosion in connector or sensor', '1. If you have access to a scan tool, see what the idle and WOT (wide open   throttle) readings are for the TPS. Check if they're close to the specifications   mentioned above. If not, then replace the TPS and re-check.2. Check for an intermittent open or short in the TPS signal. To do that, you   can't use a scan tool. You'll need an oscilliscope. The reason is because scan   tools take samplings of many different readings over just one or two data lines   and can miss an intermittent drop out. Hook up your oscilliscope and watch the   signal. It should sweep up and down smoothly with no drop outs or spikes.3. If no problems were noticed, perform a wiggle test. Do this by wiggling   the connector and harness while watching the pattern. Does it drop out? If so,   replace TPS and re-check.4. If you have no TPS signal, check for 5 Volt reference at the connector.   If it's present, check the ground circuit for open or shorts.5. Make sure the signal circuit isn't 12V. It should never have battery voltage.   If it does, trace circuit for short to voltage and repair.6. Look for any water in the connector and replace TPS as necessary.Other TPS sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0120, P0122, P0123, P0124', ''
20', 'P0122', 'P0122 Code - Throttle Position Sensor/Switch A Circuit Low Input', 'Throttle Position Sensor/Switch A Circuit Low Input', 'A P0122 code means that the the car's computer has detected that the TPS (throttle   position sensor) is reporting too low a voltage. On some vehicles that lower   limit is 0.17 - 0.20 volts (V).Did you adjust it when you installed it? If the signal value is less than .17V   then the PCM sets this code. Could be an open or a short to ground in the signal   circuit. Or you may have lost the 5Volt reference voltage.', 'Symptoms may include:   Rough or low idle  Stalling  Surging  No/little acceleration  other symptoms may also be present', '  Rough or low idle  Stalling  Surging  No/little acceleration  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0122 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  TPS not mounted securely  TPS circuit short to ground or another wire  Faulty TPS  Damaged computer (PCM)', '  TPS not mounted securely  TPS circuit short to ground or another wire  Faulty TPS  Damaged computer (PCM)', 'Some recommended troubleshooting and repair steps are:  Carefully check the throttle position sensor (TPS), wiring connector, and     wiring for breaks, etc. Repair or replace as necessary  Check the voltage at the TPS (refer to a service manual for your vehicle     for specific information). If the voltage is too low that is indicative of     a problem. Replace if necessary.  If recently replaced the TPS may need to be adjusted. On some vehicles the     installation instructions call for the TPS to be properly aligned or adjusted,     consult a repair manual for specifics.  If there are no symptoms at all, the problem may be intermittent and clearing     the code may resolve the issue temporarily. If this is the case then you should     definitely check the wiring to be sure it's not rubbing on anything, grounding,     etc. The code may come back.Other TPS sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0120, P0121, P0123, P0124', '  Carefully check the throttle position sensor (TPS), wiring connector, and     wiring for breaks, etc. Repair or replace as necessary  Check the voltage at the TPS (refer to a service manual for your vehicle     for specific information). If the voltage is too low that is indicative of     a problem. Replace if necessary.  If recently replaced the TPS may need to be adjusted. On some vehicles the     installation instructions call for the TPS to be properly aligned or adjusted,     consult a repair manual for specifics.  If there are no symptoms at all, the problem may be intermittent and clearing     the code may resolve the issue temporarily. If this is the case then you should     definitely check the wiring to be sure it's not rubbing on anything, grounding,     etc. The code may come back.'
21', 'P0123', 'P0123 Code - Throttle Position Sensor/Switch A Circuit High Input', 'Throttle Position Sensor/Switch A Circuit High Input', 'A P0123 code means that the the car's computer has detectedthat the TPS (throttle position sensor) is reporting too high a voltage.', 'Symptoms may include:   Rough idle  High idle  Surging  other symptoms may also be present', '  Rough idle  High idle  Surging  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0123 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  TPS not mounted securely  TPS circuit short to ground or another wire  Faulty TPS  Damaged computer (PCM)', '  TPS not mounted securely  TPS circuit short to ground or another wire  Faulty TPS  Damaged computer (PCM)', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, carefully  inspect all wiring and connectors that lead to the TPS. More than likely the  problem is with the TPS wiring. Check the voltage at the TPS (refer to a service  manual for your vehicle for this specific information). If the voltage spikes  or is too high (over 4.65 volts with key on, engine off), then that is indicative  of a problem. Carefully trace each wire from the TPS wiring harness to check  for  breaks,  rubbing against other components, etc.Other ReadingSRT ForumsOther TPS sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0120, P0121, P0122, P0123, P0124', ''
22', 'P0125', 'P0125 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Insufficient Coolant Temperature For Closed Loop Fuel Control', 'This means that the engine coolant temperature (ECT) sensor indicates that the engine has not reached the required temperature  level to  enter  closed-loopoperation within a specified amount of time after starting the engine.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems.', '', 'A code P0125 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Insufficient warm up time   Low engine coolant level   Leaking or stuck open thermostat   Faulty coolant temperature sensor', '  Insufficient warm up time   Low engine coolant level   Leaking or stuck open thermostat   Faulty coolant temperature sensor', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.If the code comes back, the problem is likely going to be the result of the  above causes (faulty thermostat, faulty ECT sensor, or a low coolant level).Other ECT sensor and circuit related DTCs: P0115, P0116, P0117, P0118, P0119, P0128', ''
23', 'P0130', 'P0130 - 02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank I Sensor 1)', '02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank I Sensor 1)', '', 'Depending if the problem is intermittent or not, there may be no symptoms other   than MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination. If the problem is constant,   then symptoms may include one or more of the following:  MIL illumination  Engine runs rough, missing or stumbling  Blows black smoke from tail pipe  Engine dies   Poor fuel economy', '  MIL illumination  Engine runs rough, missing or stumbling  Blows black smoke from tail pipe  Engine dies   Poor fuel economy', 'Usually the cause of P0130 is a bad oxygen sensor, however this isn't always   the case. If your o2 sensors haven't been replaced and they are old, it's a   good bet that the sensor is the problem. But, It could be caused by any of the   following:   Water or corrosion in the connector  Loose terminals in the connector  Wiring burnt on exhaust components   Open or short in the wiring due to rubbing on engine components   Holes in exhaust allowing unmetered oxygen into exhaust system   Unmetered vacuum leak at the engine   Bad o2 sensor   Bad PCM', '   Water or corrosion in the connector  Loose terminals in the connector  Wiring burnt on exhaust components   Open or short in the wiring due to rubbing on engine components   Holes in exhaust allowing unmetered oxygen into exhaust system   Unmetered vacuum leak at the engine   Bad o2 sensor   Bad PCM', 'Using a scan tool, determine if the Bank   1, sensor 1 is switching properly. It should switch rapidly between rich   and lean, evenly.1. If it does, the problem is likely intermittent and you should examine the   wiring for any visible damage. Then perform a wiggle test by manipulating the   connector and wiring while watching the o2 sensor voltage. If it drops out,   fix the appropriate part of the wiring harness where problem resides.2. If it doesn't switch properly, try to determine if the sensor is accurately   reading the exhaust or not. Do this by removing the fuel pressure regulator   vacuum supply briefly. The o2 sensor reading should go rich, reacting to the   extra fuel added. Reinstall regulator supply. Then induce a lean condition by   removing a vacuum supply line from the intake manifold. The o2 sensor reading   should go lean, reacting to the enleaned exhaust. If the sensor operates properly,   then the sensor may be okay and the problem may be holes in the exhaust or an   unmetered vacuum leak in the engine (NOTE: Unmetered vacuum leaks at the engine   are almost always accompanied by lean codes. Refer to the appropriate articles   for diagnosing an unmetered vacuum leak). If the exhaust does have holes in   it, it's possible that the o2 sensor may be misreading the exhaust because of   the extra oxygen entering the pipe via those holes3. If none of this is the case and the o2 sensor just isn't switching or acts   sluggish, unplug the sensor and make sure there is 5 Volt reference voltage   to the sensor. Then check for 12V supply to the o2 sensor's heater circuit.   Also check for continuity to ground on the ground circuit. If any of these are   missing, or aren't their proper voltage, repair open or short in the appropriate   wire. The o2 sensor will not operate properly without proper voltage. If the   proper voltages are present, replace the o2 sensor.', ''
24', 'P0131', 'P0131 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen O2 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 1, Sensor 1)', 'Essentially the same as P0136   and P0137,   a P0131 code refers to the first oxygen sensor on Bank   1.P0131 means the O2 oxygen sensor's voltage remained low for longer than   2 minutes. This, is interpreted by the ECM as a low voltage condition and sets   the MIL. Bank   1 Sensor 1 is located in front of the catalytic converter.', 'There may be no visible symptoms to the driver, other than the MIL (Check Engine   / Service Engine Soon) illumination.', '  Rough or low idle  Stalling  Surging  No/little acceleration  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0131 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty o2 oxygen sensor  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  High resistance or open on O2 signal circuit', '  Faulty o2 oxygen sensor  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  High resistance or open on O2 signal circuit', '  Replace faulty sensor  Repair short, open, or high resistance on o2 signal circuit', '  Replace faulty sensor  Repair short, open, or high resistance on o2 signal circuit'
25', 'P0132', 'P0132 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'O2 Oxygen Sensor Circuit High Voltage (Bank1, Sensor1)', 'This involves the front oxygen sensor on Bank   1. This code indicates that the heated oxygen sensor reading is too high.In the case of Ford vehicles, that indicates the voltage at the sensor is over   1.5 volts. Other vehicles may be similar.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems.', '', 'A code P0132 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The oxygen sensor heater circuit is shorted out  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed (less likely)', '  The oxygen sensor heater circuit is shorted out  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed (less likely)', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.If the code comes back, the problem is more than likely the front Bank   1 oxygen sensor. You will likely wind up replacing it but you should also   consider these possible solutions:Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the voltage of the oxygen sensor', 'Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the voltage of the oxygen sensor'
26', 'P0133', 'P0133 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response (Bank1, Sensor1)', 'This is considered a generic powertrain DTC (code). That means it's definition is the same for all makes and models of OBD-II vehicles, however specific repair steps may vary depending on the vehicle. This trouble code involves the front oxygen sensor on Bank   1.This code indicates the engine air fuel ratio is not being adjusted by   the oxygen sensor signal or the ECM as expected to do so, or not adjusted as   often as expected to do so once the engine is warmed or under normal engine   use.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms.', '', 'A code P0133 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', '  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.If the code comes back, the problem is more than likely the front Bank   1 oxygen sensor. You will likely wind up replacing it but you should also   consider these possible solutions:  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation', '  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation'
27', 'P0134', 'P0134 - 02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank I Sensor 1)', '02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank I Sensor 1)', '', 'One or more of the following may occur:  Check engine light illumination  Poorly running/engine missing  Blowing black smoke  Poor fuel economy  Dying, stuttering', '  Check engine light illumination  Poorly running/engine missing  Blowing black smoke  Poor fuel economy  Dying, stuttering', 'A code P0134 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Bad O2 (oxygen) sensor  Bad heater circuit in the O2 sensor  Wiring or connector to the sensor frayed / broken  Blown heater circuit fuse  Holes in the exhaust system  PCM failure', '  Bad O2 (oxygen) sensor  Bad heater circuit in the O2 sensor  Wiring or connector to the sensor frayed / broken  Blown heater circuit fuse  Holes in the exhaust system  PCM failure', 'The most common fix is to replace the oxygen sensor. But that doesn't rule   out the possibility of:  Rusted exhaust pipe  Inspect wiring &amp; connector(s) for problems  Excessive amperage blowing heater fuse (still requires replacement of sensor     but also replacement of blown fuse)  Replace PCM (only as last resort after all other possibilities are covered.', '  Rusted exhaust pipe  Inspect wiring &amp; connector(s) for problems  Excessive amperage blowing heater fuse (still requires replacement of sensor     but also replacement of blown fuse)  Replace PCM (only as last resort after all other possibilities are covered.'
28', 'P0135', 'P0135 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen O2 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction (Bank 1, Sensor 1)', 'This code refers to the front oxygen sensor on Bank   1. The heated circuit in the oxygen sensor decreases time needed to enter   closed loop.As the O2 heater reaches operating temperature, the oxygen sensor   responds by switching according to oxygen content of the exhaust surrounding   it. The ECM tracks how long it takes for the oxygen sensor to begin switching.   It the ECM determines (based on coolant temp) that too much time elapsed before   the oxygen sensor began operating properly, it will set P0135.', 'You will likely notice poor fuel economy the illumination of the MIL.', '', 'A code P0135 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  O2 Heater element resistance is high  Internal short or open in the heater element  O2 heater circuit wiring high resistance  open or short to ground in the wiring harness', '  O2 Heater element resistance is high  Internal short or open in the heater element  O2 heater circuit wiring high resistance  open or short to ground in the wiring harness', '  Repair short or open or high resistance in wiring harness or harness connectors  Replace oxygen sensor (cannot repair open or short that occurs internally     to sensor)', '  Repair short or open or high resistance in wiring harness or harness connectors  Replace oxygen sensor (cannot repair open or short that occurs internally     to sensor)'
29', 'P0136', 'P0136 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen O2 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 1, Sensor 2)', 'Essentially the same as P0137,   a P0136 code refers to the second oxygen sensor on Bank   1. The O2 oxygen sensor produces a voltage between .1 mV and .9 mV. The   ECM monitors O2 sensor voltage and determines if exhaust is lean or rich.O2   sensor voltage is high when exhaust is rich and low when exhaust is lean. The   ECM monitors this voltage and increases or decreases fuel injector pulsewidth   according to engine fuel/air ratio. If the ECM detects low HO2Sensor voltage   for an extended period, it will set P0136 Conditions required to set: HO2 sensor   voltage is low for longer than 2 minutes (minutes depend on model of vehicle.   Could be up to 4 minutes)', 'There may be no visible symptoms to the driver. Poor fuel mileage, possible   misfire, depending on O2 sensor position when sticking.', '', 'A code P0136 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty O2 sensor leak in exhaust close to O2 sensor  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  Open in circuit resistance caused by corrosion in connector', '  Faulty O2 sensor leak in exhaust close to O2 sensor  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  Open in circuit resistance caused by corrosion in connector', '  Replace the second oxygen sensor on bank 1  Repair open or short in signal circuit  Clean corrosion from connector', '  Replace the second oxygen sensor on bank 1  Repair open or short in signal circuit  Clean corrosion from connector'
30', 'P0137', 'P0137 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen O2 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 1, Sensor 2)', 'Essentially the same as P0136,   P0137 refers to the second oxygen sensor on Bank   1. P0137 means the O2 oxygen sensor's voltage remained low for longer than   2 minutes.This, is interpreted by the ECM as a low voltage condition and sets   the MIL. Bank   1 Sensor 2 is located to the rear of the catalytic converter and should produce   an output signal relative to oxygen storage capacity of the catalytic converter.   This rear (sensor 2) sensor is less active than the signal produced by the front   sensor. However, if the ECM senses the sensor is inactive, this code will set.', 'There may be no visible symptoms to the driver, other than the MIL (Check Engine   / Service Engine Soon) illumination.', '', 'A code P0137 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty o2 sensor Exhaust leak near the rear sensor  Plugged catalyst  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  High resistance or open on O2 signal circuit  Engine running very rich or lean  Engine misfire condition  Fuel pressure very high or low - fuel pump or pressure regulator', '  Faulty o2 sensor Exhaust leak near the rear sensor  Plugged catalyst  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  High resistance or open on O2 signal circuit  Engine running very rich or lean  Engine misfire condition  Fuel pressure very high or low - fuel pump or pressure regulator', '  Replace faulty sensor  Repair exhaust leak near the rear sensor   Check for restriction in catalyst and replace as necessary   Repair short, open, or high resistance on o2 signal circuit', '  Replace faulty sensor  Repair exhaust leak near the rear sensor   Check for restriction in catalyst and replace as necessary   Repair short, open, or high resistance on o2 signal circuit'
31', 'P0138', 'P0138 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'O2 Oxygen Sensor Circuit High Voltage (Bank1, Sensor2)', 'The Heated Oxygen Sensor (2) located rear of catalytic converter produces an   output signal relative to oxygen storage capacity of catalytic converter.Ho2S   2 signal is less active than signal produced by front oxygen sensor. This code   sets when HO2 Sensor voltage is greater than 999 mV for more than 2 minutes   (time depends on model. Could be as high as 4 minutes)', 'There may be no noticeable symptoms except for MIL illumination. Possible high   fuel pressure can over rich the system.', '', 'A code P0138 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty O2 sensor  Short to battery voltage in O2 sensor signal circuit  High fuel pressure (not as likely)', '  Faulty O2 sensor  Short to battery voltage in O2 sensor signal circuit  High fuel pressure (not as likely)', 'Here are some potential solutions:  Replace O2 sensor  Repair short to battery voltage in o2 sensor signal circuit', '  Replace O2 sensor  Repair short to battery voltage in o2 sensor signal circuit'
32', 'P0139', 'P0139 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response (Bank1, Sensor2)', 'This involves the rear oxygen sensor on the driver's side. This code indicates   the engine air fuel ratio is not being adjusted by the oxygen sensor signal   or the ECM as expected to do so, or not adjusted as often as expected to do   so once the engine is warmed or under normal engine use.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms.', '', 'A code P0139 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', '  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.If the code comes back, the problem is more than likely the rear driver's side   oxygen sensor. You will likely wind up replacing it but you should also consider   these possible solutions:  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation', '  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation'
33', 'P0140', 'P0140 - 02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank 1 Sensor 2)', '02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank 1 Sensor 2)', '', 'Your check engine light(CEL), or malfuction indicator lamp (MIL) will be illuminated.   There will not likely be any noticeable drivability problems other than the   MIL. The reason is this: The rear or post catalytic converter Oxygen sensor   does not affect fuel deliver(this is an exception on Chryslers). It only MONITORS   the efficiency of the catalytic converter. For this reason, you will likely   not notice any engine trouble.', '', 'The causes for a P0140 code are fairly few. They could be any of the following:  Shorted heater circuit in O2 sensor. (Usually requires replacement of heater     circuit fuse in fuse block also)   Shorted signal circuit in O2 sensor   Melting of harness connector or wiring due to contact with exhaust system   Water intrusion in harness connector or PCM connector   Bad PCM', '  Shorted heater circuit in O2 sensor. (Usually requires replacement of heater     circuit fuse in fuse block also)   Shorted signal circuit in O2 sensor   Melting of harness connector or wiring due to contact with exhaust system   Water intrusion in harness connector or PCM connector   Bad PCM', 'This is a fairly specific problem and shouldn't be too difficult to diagnose.First, start engine and warm up. Using a scan tool, watch the Bank 1, sensor   2, o2 sensor voltage. Normally the voltage should switch slowly above and below   .45 volts. If it does, the problem is likely intermittent. You'll have to wait   for the problem to surface before you can accurately diagnose.However, if it doesn't switch, or is stuck then perform the following: 2. Shut   off vehicle. Visually check the Bank1,2 harness connector for melting or chafing   of the harness or the connector. Repair or replace as needed 3. Turn ignition   on, but engine off. Disconnect the O2 sensor connector and check for 12Volts   at the Heater Circuit supply and for proper ground on the heater circuit ground   circuit. a. If 12V heater supply is missing, check the proper fuses for an open   in the circuit. If heater circuit fuse is blown, then suspect a bad heater in   the o2 sensor causing a blown heater circuit fuse. Replace sensor and fuse and   recheck. b. If ground is missing, trace the circuit and clean or repair ground   circuit. 4. Next, with connector still unplugged, check for 5 Volts on the reference   circuit. If this is missing, check for 5 Volts at the PCM connector. If 5 Volts   is present at the PCM connector but not at the o2 sensor harness connector,   then there is an open or short in the reference wire supply between the PCM   and the o2 sensor connector. However, if there is no 5 Volts present at the   PCM connector, the PCM is likely at fault due to internal short. Replace PCM.   ** (NOTE: on Chrysler models, a common problem is the 5Volt reference circuit   can be shorted out by any sensor on the car that uses a 5 Volt reference. Simply   unplug each sensor one at a time until the 5 Volts reappears. The last sensor   you unplugged is the shorted sensor. Replacing it should fix the 5 Volt reference   short.) 5. If all the voltages and grounds are present, then replace the Bank   1,2 O2 sensor and re-test.', ''
34', 'P0141', 'P0141 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'O2 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction (Bank 1, Sensor 2)', 'This code means that the heated circuit in the oxygen sensor on bank   1 decreases time needed to enter closed loop.As the O2 heater reaches operating   temperature, the oxygen sensor responds by switching according to oxygen content   of the exhaust surrounding it. The ECM tracks how long it takes for the oxygen   sensor to begin switching. It the ECM determines (based on coolant temp) that   too much time elapsed before the oxygen sensor began operating properly, it   will set P0141. See also: P0135 (Bank 1, Sensor 1).', 'You will likely notice poor fuel economy the illumination of the Check Engine   Light. ', '', 'A code P0141 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  open or short to ground in the wiring harness  O2 heater circuit wiring high resistance  O2 heater element resistance is high  Internal short or open in the heater elementNote: Typically a failed catalytic converter does not cause this code. You're   more likely to see a P0420 code for a failed converter.', '  open or short to ground in the wiring harness  O2 heater circuit wiring high resistance  O2 heater element resistance is high  Internal short or open in the heater element', '  Replace oxygen sensor (cannot repair open or short that occurs internally     to sensor)  Repair short or open or high resistance in wiring harness or harness connectors', '  Replace oxygen sensor (cannot repair open or short that occurs internally     to sensor)  Repair short or open or high resistance in wiring harness or harness connectors'
35', 'P0142', 'P0142 02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction', '02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank I Sensor 3)', 'The oxygen sensors are critical to the engine running properly. It basically informs the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) of oxygen content of the exhaust. The PCM then uses this information to regulate fuel injector pulse. Inaccurate or faulty O2 sensors can cause the PCM to add or take away fuel based on the faulty O2 sensor voltage which can cause a host of problems.A P0142 code refers to the Bank 1,3 O2 sensor or the 3rd downstream (post-cat) O2 sensor on Bank 1. It is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a ground circuit and a reference voltage circuit of about 0.5 volts. Also for the O2 sensor heater element there is a battery voltage supply wire and another ground circuit for that. The O2 sensor heater allows the O2 sensor to warm up faster, thus achieving closed loop in less time than it would normally take for the exhaust to warm the sensor up to operating temperature. The O2 sensor varies the supplied reference voltage based on oxygen content in the exhaust. It is capable of varying from about 0.1 to 0.9 volts, 0.1v indicating lean exhaust and 0.9v indicating rich exhaust. This P0142 code indicates that the Bank 1,3 O2 sensor is stuck low for too long or isn't active at all. ', 'Often post-cat O2 sensor problems present few symptoms since they are inputs to the PCM to monitor catalytic converter quality and don't directly control fuel. sometimes no symptoms are noticeable. However the following may be possible on some vehicles:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Decrease in MPG  Increase in tailpipe emissions ', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Decrease in MPG  Increase in tailpipe emissions ', 'Potential causes of a P0142 code include:  Bad O2 sensor  Signal shorted to voltage  Wiring problems due to contact with exhaust components  Holes in exhaust near O2 sensor ', '  Bad O2 sensor  Signal shorted to voltage  Wiring problems due to contact with exhaust components  Holes in exhaust near O2 sensor ', 'If you have access to a scan tool, check the signal voltage for the Bank 1,3 oxygen sensor with the engine at normal operating temperature. Is it stuck low currently? If so, increase RPM for a few seconds and see if it affects the reading. If it begins working with increased RPM, check for holes in the exhaust near the O2 sensor that may cause a false lean. If the exhaust pipe is intact, the sensor is sluggish, replace it. If the Bank 1,3 O2 sensor voltage reading remains low with increased RPM, unplug it and then observe the reading. It should have increased to about 0.5 volts or thereabouts. If it did, check for water intrusion or other connector problems. If none are found, replace the shorted O2 sensor.If the voltage reading is still stuck low after unplugging the sensor, then suspect a wiring problem. Using a voltmeter, with the O2 sensor unplugged, check for voltage on the signal circuit at the O2 sensor connector (PCM side). It can vary with model, but should be about 0.5 volts and not above 1 volt. If the voltage reading is too high, repair short to voltage on signal circuit. If the signal voltage checks out, suspect the PCM.', ''
36', 'P0143', 'P0143 O2 Sensor Circuit Low', '02 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank I Sensor 3)', 'The Catalytic Converter is used to help control emissions. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) uses the signal from the oxygen sensor to the rear of the catalyst to monitor the catalyst's efficiency.This is the bank 1,3 sensor. It's a four wire sensor being supplied a 0.5 volt reference voltage as well as a power and ground circuit for the o2 sensor heater element. There is also a signal wire from the oxygen sensor to the PCM that can vary between about 0.1 volts to about 0.9 volts according to oxygen content of the exhaust. A properly working post-cat sensor will exhibit small changes at a slower rate than front o2 sensors.To over simplify: a post-cat sensor's main job is to monitor catalyst efficiency, not control fuel management (although they can have a measure of influence over the front o2 sensor's operation). If the PCM determines that the post-cat o2 sensor signal voltage is below a certain threshold for too long, P0143 will set. PCM detected the HO2S signal was less than 156 mv for 28 seconds. ', 'Usually rear o2 sensor problems won't cause drivability issues since they are an input that measures catalyst efficiency (unlike front o2 sensors). However if you have other codes present, like lean codes or pre-o2 sensor codes, then they may cause drivability problems as well as P0143. The following symptoms may be present:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine performance issues  Engine running rough  Engine running rich  Poor idle', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine performance issues  Engine running rough  Engine running rich  Poor idle', 'An engine that is running lean could set this code, however there will likely be other codes present.  Air leaks in exhaust in front of o2 sensor giving false reading  O2 sensor connector damaged  O2 sensor signal circuit is shorted to ground  O2 sensor ground circuit is open  O2 sensor has failed (it may be contaminated with fuel or coolant)  PCM has failed ', '  Air leaks in exhaust in front of o2 sensor giving false reading  O2 sensor connector damaged  O2 sensor signal circuit is shorted to ground  O2 sensor ground circuit is open  O2 sensor has failed (it may be contaminated with fuel or coolant)  PCM has failed ', 'It's always good to start with checking for air leaks in the exhaust manifold and in the exhaust pipes.With KOER (Key on engine running) use a scan tool or a voltmeter check the o2 sensor signal voltage with engine warm. You may have to increase the RPM to a fast idle to check the voltage of the bank 1,3 sensor. If it's voltage is stuck low (less than a half a volt) and you don't have any other o2 sensor codes present in the PCM, then it's a good bet that the sensor is bad. If the voltage isn't stuck low and the o2 sensor seems to be operating fine, it's likely sticking low intermittently. This often turns out to be the sensor.Having said that, if you're interested in knowing for sure what the problem is then perform the following: 1. Turn off the engine and unplug the 1,3 o2 sensor connector. Make sure that there is battery voltage present and ground present for the o2 sensor heater. If there isn't then diagnose that first then retest. If that checks out then, using a jumper wire, supply a chassis ground to the o2 sensor connector(PCM side) ground circuit. Now observe the scan tool bank 1,3 o2 sensor reading. If it is now at about a half a volt then replace the o2 sensor. If, after supplying a ground to the unplugged PCM side of the o2 sensor connector, the voltage reading doesn't change then check the harness for short to ground.Check for harness making contact with exhaust components. Check pins for damage, and for moisture. Repair as necessary. If you can find no harness problems, then the PCM may be bad.', ''
37', 'P0144', 'P0144 O2 Sensor Circuit High', '02 Sensor Circuit High Voltage (Bank I Sensor 3)', 'The catalytic converter is used to lower harmful emissions. To ensure proper operation, there is an O2 sensor located behind the catalyst that monitors the oxygen content of the exhaust after the cat. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) then compares the post-cat reading to the pre-cat readings to determine if the catalyst is working properly.A P0144 refers to a fault at the post-cat o2 sensor, indicating that the signal voltage is too high. The o2 sensor is a four wire sensor. Two wires are dedicated to the heating element and two wires are dedicated to the sensor. The heating element should have battery voltage on one wire with key on engine off and ground should be present on the other. The PCM supplies a reference voltage to the o2 sensor which the sensor varies according to oxygen content in the exhaust. It is capable of varying between approximately 0.1 and 0.9 volts. This variance in the voltage is monitored by the PCM. The PCM also supplies a ground to the sensor. P0144 means that the voltage was too high on the signal circuit.', 'Symptoms of a P0144 DTC may include:    MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  Engine loses power and misses intermittently  May exhibit loss of fuel efficiency', '    MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  Engine loses power and misses intermittently  May exhibit loss of fuel efficiency', 'Potential causes of an P0144 code include:  Bad o2 sensor (Bank 1 Sensor 3)  Wiring in contact with exhaust components  Engine running rich (If other codes are present)  Holes in exhaust near Bank 1 Sensor 3  Short to voltage on signal circuit   Bad PCM', '  Bad o2 sensor (Bank 1 Sensor 3)  Wiring in contact with exhaust components  Engine running rich (If other codes are present)  Holes in exhaust near Bank 1 Sensor 3  Short to voltage on signal circuit   Bad PCM', 'Start the engine and observe the Bank 1 Sensor 3 (a.k.a. 1/3) o2 sensor voltage. You may need to raise the idle up until the o2 sensor starts switching.If it is stuck high, or close to 1 volt and the voltage doesn't vary, then check for a good ground on both the heater element and the sensor. Also check that the heater element is being supplied good battery voltage. No heater operation can cause a sluggish sensor.If the grounds are good and the battery voltage is present, then jumper the sensor's signal wire to the sensor's ground wire. Now the scan tool should read low or near zero volts. If it does, the wiring is good. Replace the bank 1/3 o2 sensor. If jumpering the signal wire to the ground doesn't lower the voltage, then check the o2 sensor wiring harness. Make sure there is no contact with hot exhaust components. Ensure good wiring harness connections. If the wiring checks out, then reperform the previous wiring harness checks at the PCM connector.If now the 1/3 o2 sensor reading drops, then there is a wiring problem that isn't visible. Open the harness and visually inspect the wiring for problems. But if the result is the same, then the PCM may be bad.', ''
38', 'P0146', 'P0146 O2 Sensor Circuit (No Activity)', '02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank I Sensor 3)', 'The catalytic converter is used to control emissions. The o2 sensor on Bank 1, position 3 is aft of the converter and monitors the catalyst efficiency. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) does this by comparing the post-cat o2 sensor to the pre-cat o2 sensors.The o2 sensor is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a reference to the sensor of about half a volt and also supplies a sensor ground and 12 volts for the heater element. The fourth wire is a ground for the heater element (the heater in the sensor helps the sensor to warm up faster which allows the engine to reach closed loop sooner).The sensor varies the supplied reference voltage based on oxygen content of the exhaust. Oxygen sensors are capable of varying between 0.1 volts to 0.9 volts. Lean exhaust produces low voltage and causes the supplied 0.45 volts to drop. Rich exhaust produces high voltage and causes the supplied 0.45 voltage to increase. Pre-catalyst o2 sensors switch between low and high voltage rapidly. However a post-cat o2 sensor may switch much slower &amp; not vary as much (this is normal). If the sensor doesn't respond as it should or there are too few switches in a given time period, P0146 may set. ', 'Symptoms of a P0146 DTC may include:    MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  May idle or drive poorly  Fuel economy may decrease', '    MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  May idle or drive poorly  Fuel economy may decrease', 'Potential causes of an P0146 code include:  Bad Bank 1, position 3, o2 sensor  Wiring problem, melted harness, broken connectors, etc.  Bad PCM ', '  Bad Bank 1, position 3, o2 sensor  Wiring problem, melted harness, broken connectors, etc.  Bad PCM ', '1. Start the engine and allow it to reach operating temperature. Using a scan tool, observe the Bank 1 position 3 o2 sensor. If it isn't moving between 0.1 and 0.9 volts, increase the engine RPM to a fast idle and then recheck the sensor voltage reading. If it starts switching now, the sensor may be sluggish and/or intermittently going &quot;dormant&quot;. Replacing the sensor at this point would be a good idea.Visually check the o2 sensor for contaminates, etc. If you suspect it's contaminated with coolant or oil, replace it.a. But, if it still isn't responding after increasing engine RPM, turn off the engine and unplug the 1/3 o2 sensor. With KOEO (key on engine off) check that there is battery voltage and ground to the o2 sensor heater element. If the heater element has no battery voltage it can cause the o2 sensor to go &quot;dormant&quot; and not switch properly which can cause a P0146. So, diagnose that problem first(there will usually be other codes present).b. If there is power and ground to the heater element check that the sensor ground is present. If it is, connect a jumper wire between the sensor ground and signal wire. Now the 1/3 o2 sensor reading should be low. If so, replace the Bank 1 position 3 o2 sensor.c. If, after connecting the jumper wire, the o2 sensor reading still remains &quot;stuck&quot;, check for wiring problems, harness contacting exhaust components, or broken connectors. Repair as necessary. Then recheck.d. If you can find no wiring problems and the o2 sensor reading on the scan tool doesn't change after installing the jumper wire, recheck at the PCM connector. If it still shows no change, the PCM may be at fault.', ''
39', 'P0147', 'P0147 O2 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction', '02 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction (Bank I Sensor 3)', 'O2 (Oxygen) sensors contain a heating element that allows the sensor to reach operating temperature quickly. This lowers emissions since it allows the engine to reach closed loop faster and also allows the engine to stay in closed loop at idle.The heater circuit is supplied a 12 V battery feed from the PCM or ignition circuit (depending on model) and a ground. The PCM (powertrain control module) monitors how long it takes for the sensors to become active after engine start-up. If it takes too long for the o2 sensors to reach operating temperature, this P0147 can set. ', 'For this particular o2 sensor, there may be no noticeable symptoms other than:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor/ rough idle', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor/ rough idle', 'Potential causes of an P0147 code include:  Bad o2 sensor heater circuit  Bad o2 sensor  Wiring harness problems ', '  Bad o2 sensor heater circuit  Bad o2 sensor  Wiring harness problems ', 'Unplug the Bank 1, 3 sensor. With KOEO (key on engine off) use a voltmeter to check for battery voltage present at the o2 sensor connector (PCM side). (You can also do this with a test light. Connect to ground and touch lead to heater circuit supply. Light should illuminate with KOEO) You should have battery voltage present.a. If voltage is present, check the ground side of the heater element also making sure a good ground is present. If it is, check for any faulty connections &amp; then replace the o2 sensor. If you don't have a good ground, then there is an open in the ground circuit somewhere that will need to be repaired. Look for wiring harness contact with exhaust components or broken/missing connectors, etc.b. If battery voltage isn't present with KOEO, check for a blown fuse supplying the heater elements. You may need to get a wiring diagram for this. If the fuse is blown, you'll need to check for a short to ground on the battery supply circuit before replacing the fuse. If you find none, and replacing the fuse re-establishes battery voltage at the o2 sensor connector, then the o2 sensor may have shorted internally, blowing the fuse. Replace it &amp; recheck. (NOTE: it's possible for an o2 sensor's heater circuit to be open/shorted and the o2 sensor to still function).c. If you have no battery voltage present with KOEO and there are no blown fuses supplying the heater circuit, then check for an open on the supply circuit. You can do this by ohming the circuit with the o2 sensor unplugged and the PCM unplugged. Repair and recheck.', ''
40', 'P0150', 'P0150 - 02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 1)', '02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 1)', '', 'Depending if the problem is intermittent or not, there may be no symptoms other   than MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination. If the problem is constant,   then symptoms may include one or more of the following:  MIL illumination  Engine runs rough, missing or stumbling  Blows black smoke from tail pipe  Engine dies   Poor fuel economy', '  MIL illumination  Engine runs rough, missing or stumbling  Blows black smoke from tail pipe  Engine dies   Poor fuel economy', 'Usually the cause of P0150 is a bad oxygen sensor, however this isn't always   the case. If your o2 sensors haven't been replaced and they are old, it's a   good bet that the sensor is the problem. But, It could be caused by any of the   following:   Water or corrosion in the connector  Loose terminals in the connector  Wiring burnt on exhaust components   Open or short in the wiring due to rubbing on engine components   Holes in exhaust allowing unmetered oxygen into exhaust system   Unmetered vacuum leak at the engine   Bad o2 sensor   Bad PCM', '   Water or corrosion in the connector  Loose terminals in the connector  Wiring burnt on exhaust components   Open or short in the wiring due to rubbing on engine components   Holes in exhaust allowing unmetered oxygen into exhaust system   Unmetered vacuum leak at the engine   Bad o2 sensor   Bad PCM', 'Using a scan tool, determine if the Bank   2, sensor 1 is switching properly. It should switch rapidly between rich   and lean, evenly.1. If it does, the problem is likely intermittent and you should examine the   wiring for any visible damage. Then perform a wiggle test by manipulating the   connector and wiring while watching the o2 sensor voltage. If it drops out,   fix the appropriate part of the wiring harness where problem resides.2. If it doesn't switch properly, try to determine if the sensor is accurately   reading the exhaust or not. Do this by removing the fuel pressure regulator   vacuum supply briefly. The o2 sensor reading should go rich, reacting to the   extra fuel added. Reinstall regulator supply. Then induce a lean condition by   removing a vacuum supply line from the intake manifold. The o2 sensor reading   should go lean, reacting to the enleaned exhaust. If the sensor operates properly,   then the sensor may be okay and the problem may be holes in the exhaust or an   unmetered vacuum leak in the engine (NOTE: Unmetered vacuum leaks at the engine   are almost always accompanied by lean codes. Refer to the appropriate articles   for diagnosing an unmetered vacuum leak). If the exhaust does have holes in   it, it's possible that the o2 sensor may be misreading the exhaust because of   the extra oxygen entering the pipe via those holes3. If none of this is the case and the o2 sensor just isn't switching or acts   sluggish, unplug the sensor and make sure there is 5 Volt reference voltage   to the sensor. Then check for 12V supply to the o2 sensor's heater circuit.   Also check for continuity to ground on the ground circuit. If any of these are   missing, or aren't their proper voltage, repair open or short in the appropriate   wire. The o2 sensor will not operate properly without proper voltage. If the   proper voltages are present, replace the o2 sensor.', ''
41', 'P0151', 'P0151 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen O2 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 2, Sensor 1)', 'Essentially the same as P0136   and P0137   and P0131,   a P0151 code refers to the first oxygen sensor on Bank   2 . P0151 means the O2 oxygen sensor's voltage remained low for longer than   2 minutes.This, is interpreted by the ECM as a low voltage condition and sets   the MIL. Bank   2 Sensor 1 is located in front of the catalytic converter.', 'There may be no visible symptoms to the driver, other than the MIL (Check Engine   / Service Engine Soon) illumination.', '', 'A code P0151 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty o2 oxygen sensor  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  High resistance or open on O2 signal circuit', '  Faulty o2 oxygen sensor  Short to voltage on O2 signal circuit  High resistance or open on O2 signal circuit', '  Replace faulty sensor  Repair short, open, or high resistance on o2 signal circuit', '  Replace faulty sensor  Repair short, open, or high resistance on o2 signal circuit'
42', 'P0152', 'P0152 O2 Sensor (High Voltage)', '02 Sensor Circuit High Voltage (Bank 2 Sensor 1) ', 'The o2 (oxygen) sensors basically measure oxygen content in the exhaust. The PCM (powertrain control module) then uses this information to regulate fuel injector pulse. The o2 sensors are very important to proper operation of the engine. Problems with them can cause the PCM to add or take away too much fuel based on the faulty o2 sensor voltage.A P0152 code refers to the Bank 2, sensor 1, o2 sensor. (Bank 1 would contain cylinder 1 and bank 2 is the opposite bank. Bank 2 doesn't necessarily contain cylinder 2.) &quot;Bank 2&quot; refers to the side of the exhaust that DOES NOT contain cylinder number 1 and &quot;Sensor 1&quot; indicates that it is the pre-cat sensor, or forward(first) sensor on that bank. It is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a ground circuit and a reference voltage of about .5 volts on another circuit. Also for the o2 heater there is a battery voltage supply wire and another ground circuit for that. The o2 sensor heater allows the o2 sensor to warm up faster, thus achieving closed loop in less time than it would normally take for the exhaust to warm the sensor up to operating temperature.The O2 sensor varies the supplied reference voltage based on oxygen content in the exhaust. It is capable of varying from .1 to .9 volts, .1 indicating lean exhaust and .9 indicating rich exhaust. NOTE: A condensed explanation of fuel trims: If the o2 sensor indicates that the oxygen voltage reading is .9 volts or high, the PCM interprets this as a rich condition in the exhaust and as a result decreases the amount of fuel entering the engine by shortening injector &quot;on time&quot;. The STFT (short term fuel trims) would reflect this change. The opposite would occur when the PCM sees a lean condition. The PCM would add fuel which would be indicated by a single digit positive STFT reading. On a normal engine the front o2 sensors switch rapidly back and forth two or three times per second and the STFT would shift positive and negative single digits to add and remove fuel to compensate at a similar rate. This little &quot;dance&quot; goes on to keep the air/fuel ratio at it's optimal level. Short term fuel trims or STFT reflect immediate changes in fuel injector &quot;on-time&quot; while long term fuel trims or LTFT reflect changes in fuel over a longer period of time. If your STFT or LTFT readings are in the positive double digits (ten or above), this indicates the fuel system has been adding an abnormal amount of fuel than is necessary to keep the proper air/fuel ratio. It may be overcompentsating for a vacuum leak or a stuck lean o2 sensor, etc. The opposite would be true if the fuel trim readings are in the negative double digits. It would indicate that the fuel system has been taking away excessive amounts of fuel, perhaps to compensate for leaking injectors or a stuck rich o2 sensor, etc. So when experiencing o2 related issues, reading your fuel trims can indicate what the PCM has been doing over the long term and short term with regard to fuel.This code indicates that the o2 sensor was stuck too high or in the rich position. The PCM monitors this voltage and if it determines that the voltage is too high out of range for too long, P0152 may set. ', 'Symptoms may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine may run very rough  Engine may be running lean or rich depending on if the o2 sensor is reading correctly or incorrectly  Lack of power  Increased fuel consumption', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine may run very rough  Engine may be running lean or rich depending on if the o2 sensor is reading correctly or incorrectly  Lack of power  Increased fuel consumption', 'Potential causes of an P0152 code include:  Bad bank 2, 1 o2 sensor incorrectly reading rich condition  Engine running rich and o2 sensor  Correctly reading rich condition  Signal shorted to voltage in harness  Wiring harness damage/melted due to contact with exhaust components  Vacuum leak (make have lean codes (P0171, P0174) present with it)  Leaking injectors  Bad fuel pressure regulator  Bad PCM', '  Bad bank 2, 1 o2 sensor incorrectly reading rich condition  Engine running rich and o2 sensor  Correctly reading rich condition  Signal shorted to voltage in harness  Wiring harness damage/melted due to contact with exhaust components  Vacuum leak (make have lean codes (P0171, P0174) present with it)  Leaking injectors  Bad fuel pressure regulator  Bad PCM', 'If you have any lean or rich codes associated with this code, focus on fixing these first because these can cause the o2 sensor voltage readings to appear to be faulty when they are in fact only reading correctly.So, with the engine running at operating temperature, use a scan tool to observe the Bank 2,1 o2 sensor voltage reading. Is it high? If so, look at the long term and short term fuel trim readings. The fuel trims are affected by the o2 sensors as noted above. If the LTFT reading for that bank is indicating negative double digits (PCM trying to take away fuel to compensate for problem) try inducing a vacuum leak to see if the sensor voltage then goes lean and the fuel trims increase. If the o2 sensor responds, suspect a problem with the engine, not the sensor. There may be other engine codes to help you.If the o2 sensor reading remains high (0.9 volts or above) and won't respond then shut off engine. With KOEO (Key on engine off) disconnect the o2 sensor and look for signs of corrosion or water intrustion. Repair as necessary. The voltage reading should now be about 0.5 volts. If so, replace the o2 sensor, it's shorted internally.If after unplugging the o2 sensor the voltage reading on the scan tool doesn't change, then suspect wiring problems. Inspect the harness and look for any melted wires or anywhere that the o2 sensor harness is making contact with the exhaust components. If you are unsure, you can check for continuity of all four wires between the sensor and the PCM with an ohmmeter. Any resistance at all indicates a problem. Repair as necessary.', ''
43', 'P0153', 'P0153 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response (Bank2, Sensor1)', 'This involves the oxygen sensor upstream the catalytic converter on Bank   2.This code indicates the engine air fuel ratio is not being adjusted by   the oxygen sensor signal or the ECM as expected to do so, or not adjusted as   often as expected to do so once the engine is warmed or under normal engine   use.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms.', '', 'A code P0153 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', '  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', 'Things that may fix the problem include:  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation  Replace the Bank 2 oxygen sensor upstream of the catalytic converter', '  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation  Replace the Bank 2 oxygen sensor upstream of the catalytic converter'
44', 'P0154', 'P0154 02 Sensor No Activity Circuit', '02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank 2 Sensor 1)', 'The oxygen sensors are critical to the engine running properly. It basically informs the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) of oxygen content of the exhaust. The PCM then uses this information to regulate fuel into the engine and maintain proper air:fuel ratio. It is a four wire sensor, with the PCM providing a reference/signal voltage of about half a volt (0.5v) to the sensor. It usually provides a ground also The other two wires are dedicated to the oxygen sensor heater element. This heater allows the sensor to warm up faster, which allows the engine to enter closed loop faster, reducing startup emissions. The heater element is supplied a 12v feed from the power distribution center (usually) and a ground.The oxygen content of the exhaust affects the O2 sensor resistance. This resistance produces a counter voltage on the reference/signal wire that the PCM will use to analyze oxygen in the exhaust. Lean exhaust produces low voltage, while rich exhaust produces high voltage. The oxygen sensor is capable of varying between 0.9v (rich) and 0.1v (lean). Once the engine reaches closed loop, the O2 sensor should begin switching rapidly between rich and lean voltages 2-3 times per second. If for some reason the O2 sensor doesn't switch properly or &quot;sticks&quot;, P0154 may set. This code indicates the O2 sensor isn't operating.', 'Symptoms of a P0154 code may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Other codes indicating rich or lean condition may be present  Poor idle, won't idle  Misfire at idle or at highway speed  Engine may blow black smoke at tailpipe  Fuel economy may decrease  May start and stall', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Other codes indicating rich or lean condition may be present  Poor idle, won't idle  Misfire at idle or at highway speed  Engine may blow black smoke at tailpipe  Fuel economy may decrease  May start and stall', 'Potential causes of a P0154 code include:  Faulty bank 2,1 Oxygen sensor  Holes in exhaust near oxygen sensor  Short to voltage or ground on signal circuit  Open or high resistance in signal circuit  Wiring harness chafing/rubbing on exhaust components  Water/oil intrusion at O2 sensor connector  Broken lock or loose terminals on O2 sensor connector  Oil/coolant fouled oxygen sensor', '  Faulty bank 2,1 Oxygen sensor  Holes in exhaust near oxygen sensor  Short to voltage or ground on signal circuit  Open or high resistance in signal circuit  Wiring harness chafing/rubbing on exhaust components  Water/oil intrusion at O2 sensor connector  Broken lock or loose terminals on O2 sensor connector  Oil/coolant fouled oxygen sensor', 'First start the engine and bring it up to operating temperature and ensure the engine reaches closed loop. Then, using the live data function on a scan tool, observe the Bank 2,1 oxygen sensor voltage reading. Is it switching properly? If so, the problem may be an intermittently bad sensor or more likely a wiring problem. Visually check the O2 sensor wiring and repair as needed. Does the voltage for the Bank 2,1 oxygen sensor appear to be &quot;stuck&quot; and not moving? If so, increase idle speed for 30 seconds or so. If the sensor begins switching after a period of elevated idle, visually check the exhaust for holes or rust near the O2 sensor that could be affecting the voltage reading If the exhaust checks out, suspect the sensor to be sluggish and replace it. If the Bank 2,1 oxygen sensor appears to be not switching, turn the engine off, and unplug the Bank 2,1 oxygen sensor. With KOEO (Key on engine off) jumper the O2 sensor signal wire to the ground wire. Now the voltage reading should be low (about 0.1v). If it is, then check for a bad connection at the O2 sensor connector. Repair as necessary. If no bad connection is found, replace the O2 sensor and re-check. If when you jumper the signal wire to the ground wire the voltage reading isn't low (about 0.1v), remove the jumper wire. Now check for voltage at the O2 sensor signal wire. It should have, with KOEO and O2 sensor unplugged, roughly 0.5 volts. If it does, check also for a good ground to the sensor as well. Repair as necessary Check for loose connections, water intrusion at PCM connector, etc. If you have no 0.5 volt reference voltage, unplug the PCM connector and ohm the signal circuit and ground circuits. There should be no resistance nor any voltage. Repair excessive resistance. If you still have no 0.5 volt reference voltage, recheck at the PCM connector. It may be necessary to clip the signal wire to eliminate the possibility of a short or open somewhere. If you now have reference voltage present coming out of the PCM, fix open/short in signal circuit. If you have no reference voltage coming out of the PCM, the PCM will have to be diagnosed for a fault. It may be the problem.', ''
45', 'P0155', 'P0155 - 02 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 1)', '02 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 1)', '', 'You will likely notice poor fuel economy the illumination of the MIL.', '', 'A code P0155 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  O2 Heater element resistance is high  Internal short or open in the heater element  O2 heater circuit wiring high resistance  open or short to ground in the wiring harness', '  O2 Heater element resistance is high  Internal short or open in the heater element  O2 heater circuit wiring high resistance  open or short to ground in the wiring harness', '  Repair short or open or high resistance in wiring harness or harness connectors  Replace oxygen sensor (cannot repair open or short that occurs internally     to sensor)', '  Repair short or open or high resistance in wiring harness or harness connectors  Replace oxygen sensor (cannot repair open or short that occurs internally     to sensor)'
46', 'P0156', 'P0156 O2 Sensor Circuit Malfunction', '02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 2)', 'The o2 (oxygen) sensors measure oxygen content in the exhaust. The PCM (powertrain control module) then uses this information to regulate fuel injector pulse. The o2 sensors are very important for the proper operation of the engine. Innacurate or faulty o2 sensors can cause the PCM to add or take away fuel based on the faulty o2 sensor voltage which can cause a host of problems.A P0156 code refers to the Bank 2,2 o2 sensor or the downstream (post-cat) o2 sensor on Bank 2. It is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a ground circuit and a reference voltage circuit of about 0.5 volts. Also for the o2 sensor heater element there is a battery voltage supply wire and another ground circuit for that. The o2 sensor heater allows the o2 sensor to warm up faster, thus achieving closed loop in less time than it would normally take for the exhaust to warm the sensor up to operating temperature. The O2 sensor varies the supplied reference voltage based on oxygen content in the exhaust. It is capable of varying from about 0.1 to 0.9 volts, 0.1 V indicating lean exhaust and 0.9 V indicating rich exhaust. This P0156 code indicates that the Bank 2, 2 o2 sensor is stuck low for too long or isn't active at all. ', 'Often post-cat o2 sensor problems present few symptoms since they are inputs to the PCM to monitor catalytic converter quality and don't directly control fuel. sometimes no symptoms are noticeable. However the following may be possible on some vehicles:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Decrease in MPG  Increase in tailpipe emissions', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Decrease in MPG  Increase in tailpipe emissions', 'Potential causes of an P0156 code include:  Bad O2 sensor  Signal shorted to voltage  Wiring problems due to contact with exhaust components  Holes in exhaust near o2 sensor', '  Bad O2 sensor  Signal shorted to voltage  Wiring problems due to contact with exhaust components  Holes in exhaust near o2 sensor', 'If you have access to a scan tool, check the signal voltage for the Bank 2,2 oxygen sensor with the engine at normal operating temperature. Is it stuck low currently? If so, increase RPM for a few seconds and see if it affects the reading. If it begins working with increased RPM, check for holes in the exhaust near the o2 sensor that may cause a false lean. If the exhaust pipe is intact, the sensor is sluggish, replace it.If the Bank 2,2 o2 sensor voltage reading remains low with increased RPM, unplug it and then observe the reading. It should have increased to about 0.5 volts or thereabouts. If it did, check for water intrusion or other connector problems. If none are found, replace the shorted o2 sensor. If the voltage reading is still stuck low after unplugging the sensor, then suspect a wiring problem. Using a voltmeter, with the o2 sensor unplugged, check for voltage on the signal circuit at the o2 sensor connector(PCM side). It can vary with model, but should be about 0.5 volts and not above 1 volt. If the voltage reading is too high, repair short to voltage on signal circuit. If the signal voltage checks out, suspect the PCM. ', ''
47', 'P0157', 'P0157 O2 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage', '02 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 2 Sensor 2)', 'This code refers to a fault in the post-catalyst o2 sensor on Bank 2. First, a basic run-down of the catalyst: The Catalytic Converter is used to help control tailpipe emissions, to &quot;clean up&quot; the exhaust, if you will. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) uses the signal from the heated oxygen sensor to the rear of the catalyst to monitor the catalyst's efficiency by comparing it to the o2 sensors in front of the catalyst.If the PCM sees little or no difference between the exhaust quality in post- and pre- catalyst sensors then it knows that the catalyst is not working properly. To over simplify: a post-cat sensor's main job is to monitor catalyst efficiency, not control fuel management (although they can have a measure of influence over the front o2 sensor's operation, we'll just stick to basics for the sake of simplicity).If you have a P0157, that doesn't mean your catalyst is bad (in fact, it usually never does). This code basically means that the Bank 2, Sensor 2 (or second o2 sensor back on bank 2) signal voltage is below what is considered normal for that sensor. It's a four wire sensor being supplied a 0.5 volt reference voltage (usually on the signal wire) and a ground, as well as a power and ground circuit for the o2 sensor heater element. Changes in oxygen content cause resistance changes in the sensor's signal circuit. This changing resistance affects the 0.5 volts on the signal/reference circuit. A heated o2 sensor is capable of switching between 0.1 volts and 0.9 volts. However, a properly working post-catalyst sensor will exhibit small changes at a slower rate than front (pre-catalyst) o2 sensors. It may switch slightly above and below 0.45 volts at the rate of about 1 switch per second or less(depends on the vehicle). The PCM monitors this changing signal to determine if the catalyst is working properly. If the PCM determines that the post-cat o2 sensor signal voltage is below a certain threshold for too long, P0157 will set. ', 'Usually rear o2 sensor problems won't cause drivability issues since they are an input that measures catalyst efficiency (unlike front o2 sensors). However if you have other codes present, like lean codes or pre-o2 sensor codes, then they may cause drivability problems as well as P0143. The following symptoms may be present:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine performance issues  Engine running rough  Engine running rich (only if PCM is trying to add fuel to compensate for low o2 sensor voltage reading)  Engine running lean (only if vacuum leak is large enough that PCM can't compensate by adding fuel)  Poor idle ', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine performance issues  Engine running rough  Engine running rich (only if PCM is trying to add fuel to compensate for low o2 sensor voltage reading)  Engine running lean (only if vacuum leak is large enough that PCM can't compensate by adding fuel)  Poor idle ', 'If you have reason to believe that your engine is running lean, fix that problem first, then clear codes and see if the P0157 code resets. An engine that is running lean could set this code, but usually there will be lean codes (P0171, P0174) present. The following could be causes:  Air leaks in exhaust in front of o2 sensor giving false reading  Engine running excessively lean  O2 sensor connector damaged/corroded  O2 sensor signal circuit is shorted to ground  O2 sensor ground circuit is open  O2 sensor has failed (it may be contaminated with fuel or coolant)  PCM has failed', '  Air leaks in exhaust in front of o2 sensor giving false reading  Engine running excessively lean  O2 sensor connector damaged/corroded  O2 sensor signal circuit is shorted to ground  O2 sensor ground circuit is open  O2 sensor has failed (it may be contaminated with fuel or coolant)  PCM has failed', 'It's always good to start with checking for air leaks in the exhaust manifold and in the exhaust pipes. Fix these first.With KOER (Key on engine running) use a scan tool or a voltmeter check the o2 sensor signal voltage with engine warm. You may have to increase the RPM to a fast idle to check the voltage of the bank 2,2 sensor. If it's voltage is stuck low (less than 0.5 volts may not be enough to set the code, but it depends on the vehicle) and you don't have any other o2 sensor codes present in the PCM, then it's a good bet that the sensor is bad. If the voltage isn't stuck low and the o2 sensor seems to be operating fine, it's likely sticking low intermittently. This often turns out to be the sensor. In either case, replacing the sensor can be an effective way to diagnose the problem. But it can also be an expensive diagnostic tool, especially if it turns out to be a wiring issue, instead of a sensor.So, if you're interested in knowing for sure what the problem is before spending unnecessarily, then perform the following: 1. Turn off the engine and unplug the 2,2 o2 sensor connector. Inspect for corrosion, etc. Repair as necessary. Make sure that there is battery voltage present and ground present for the o2 sensor heater. If there isn't, then diagnose that first then retest. The o2 sensor depends on the heater to warm it up so it can start working quicker. If the heater element is bad or there isn't the proper voltage supplying it, the sensor may set this code. Usually heater problems have codes associated with them, too. If you find there is no battery voltage feeding the o2 sensor use the associated code to diagnose that. If you find the heater element bad, replace the sensor.If the heater element checks out then, using a jumper wire, supply a chassis ground to the o2 sensor connector(PCM side) ground circuit. Now observe the scan tool bank 2,2 o2 sensor reading. If it is now at about a half a volt then replace the o2 sensor. If, after supplying a ground to the unplugged PCM side of the o2 sensor connector, the voltage reading doesn't change then check the harness for short to ground. Check for harness making contact with exhaust components. Check pins for damage, and for moisture. Repair as necessary. If you can find no harness problems, then the PCM may be at fault.', ''
48', 'P0158', 'P0158 O2 Sensor Circuit High Voltage', '02 Sensor Circuit High Voltage (Bank 2 Sensor 2)', 'The catalytic converter is used to lower harmful emissions. To ensure proper operation, there is an O2 sensor located behind the catalyst that monitors the oxygen content of the exhaust after the cat. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) then compares the post-cat reading to the pre-cat readings to determine if the catalyst is working properly.A P0158 refers to a fault at the post-cat o2 sensor on bank 2 (second sensor back on bank 2), indicating that the signal voltage is too high. The o2 sensor is a four wire sensor. Two wires are dedicated to the heating element and two wires are dedicated to the sensor. The heating element should have battery voltage on one wire with key on engine off and ground should be present on the other. The PCM supplies a reference voltage of 0.5 volts to the o2 sensor which the sensor varies according to oxygen content in the exhaust. The PCM also supplies a ground to the sensor. Changes in oxygen content cause resistance changes in the o2 sensor. This change in resistance affects the PCM-supplied 0.5 volts. It is capable of varying between approximately 0.1 and 0.9 volts. A reading of 0.1 indicates full lean and 0.9 indicates full rich. This variance in the voltage is monitored by the PCM.A P0158 code means that the voltage was higher than normal on the signal circuit. NOTE: A post-catalyst o2 sensor will normally switch slower and fewer times than front (pre-cat) o2 sensors.', 'Symptoms of a P0158 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  Engine loses power and misses intermittently  May exhibit loss of fuel efficiency  Engine running rich', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  Engine loses power and misses intermittently  May exhibit loss of fuel efficiency  Engine running rich', 'Potential causes of an P0158 code include:  Bad o2 sensor (Bank 2 Sensor 2)  Wiring in contact with exhaust components  Engine running rich (If other codes are present)  Holes in exhaust causing PCM to over-rich engine resulting in an abnormally high Bank 2, sensor 2 reading  Short to voltage on signal circuit  Bad PCM ', '  Bad o2 sensor (Bank 2 Sensor 2)  Wiring in contact with exhaust components  Engine running rich (If other codes are present)  Holes in exhaust causing PCM to over-rich engine resulting in an abnormally high Bank 2, sensor 2 reading  Short to voltage on signal circuit  Bad PCM ', 'It's always a good idea to observe the condition of the exhaust components. Inspect for holes, wiring harness making contact with exhaust, etc. Start the engine and observe the Bank 2 Sensor 2 o2 sensor voltage. On rear o2 sensors you may need to raise the idle up until the o2 sensor starts switching if the sensor is sluggish. If raising the idle causes the sensor's voltage to drop, then replace the sensor due to sluggishness. If, after starting the engine and warming to operating temperature, the 2,2 oxygen sensor is observed to be stuck high, or close to 1 volt and the voltage doesn't drop or vary, then turn the engine off.With KOEO (key on engine off) unplug the 2,2 o2 sensor and check for a good ground on both the heater element and the sensor. Also check that the heater element is being supplied good battery voltage. No heater operation can cause a sluggish sensor, but will usually have codes associated with it. If the grounds are good and the battery voltage is present, then jumper the sensor's signal wire to the sensor's ground wire. Now the scan tool should read low or near zero volts. If it does, the wiring is good. Replace the bank 2/2 o2 sensor. If jumpering the signal wire to the ground doesn't lower the voltage, then check the o2 sensor wiring harness. Make sure there is no contact with hot exhaust components. Ensure good wiring harness connections.If the wiring checks out, then recheck the previous wiring harness checks at the PCM connector. It may be necessary to clip the o2 sensor signal wire close to the PCM in a location that is easily accessible so it may be repaired after this test. If now the 2/2 o2 sensor reading drops, then there is a wiring problem that isn't visible. Open the harness and visually inspect the wiring for problems on the signal wire. Or you may choose to run another signal wire by clipping and leaving the offending wire in the harness. But if the result is the same, then the PCM may be at fault.', ''
49', 'P0159', 'P0159 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen Sensor Circuit Slow Response (Bank2, Sensor2)', 'This involves the rear oxygen sensor on the passenger side.This code indicates   the engine air fuel ratio is not being adjusted by the oxygen sensor signal   or the ECM as expected to do so, or not adjusted as often as expected to do   so once the engine is warmed or under normal engine use.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms.', '', 'A code P0159 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', '  The oxygen sensor is faulty  The wiring to the sensor is broken / frayed  There is an exhaust leak', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.If the code comes back, the problem is more than likely the rear passenger   side oxygen sensor. You will likely wind up replacing it but you should also   consider these possible solutions:  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation', '  Check and fix any exhaust leaks  Check for wiring problems (shorted, frayed wires)  Check the frequency and amplitude of the oxygen sensor (advanced)  Check for a deteriorating / contaminated oxygen sensor, replace if necessary  Check for inlet air leaks  Check the MAF sensor for proper operation'
50', 'P0160', 'P0160 O2 Sensor Circuit No Activity', '02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank 2 Sensor 2)', 'This code is for a post-catalyst oxygen sensor that isn't operating porperly or not at all. The catalyst, or catalytic converter is used to control emissions. This particular o2 sensor on Bank 2, position 2 is after the converter on bank 2 and monitors the catalyst efficiency of the catalytic converter on that bank.The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) compares the post-cat o2 sensor to the pre-cat o2 sensors to measure the cat's efficiency. The o2 sensor is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a reference voltage to the sensor of about half a volt and also supplies a sensor ground. 12 volts are supplied for the heater element and also a ground for the heater element (the heater in the sensor helps the sensor to warm up faster which allows the engine to reach closed loop sooner).The sensor varies the reference voltage the PCM gives it based on oxygen content of the exhaust. The change in oxygen content causes resistance changes in the sensor which affects the 0.5 volt reference voltage. Oxygen sensors are capable of varying the supplied voltage between 0.1 volts to 0.9 volts. Lean exhaust produces low voltage and causes the supplied 0.5 volts to drop. Rich exhaust produces high voltage and causes the supplied 0.5 voltage to increase. Pre-catalyst (front) o2 sensors switch between low and high voltage rapidly one or two times per second.However this sensor is a post-cat o2 sensor and may switch much slower &amp; not vary as much (this is normal). If the sensor &quot;sticks&quot; or there are too few switches in a given time period, P0160 may set.', 'Symptoms of a P0160 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  May idle or drive poorly  Fuel economy may decrease', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  May idle or drive poorly  Fuel economy may decrease', 'Potential causes of an P0160 code include:  Holes in exhaust near post cat o2 sensor  Bad Bank 2, position 2, o2 sensor  Wiring problem, melted harness, broken connectors, etc.  Bad PCM ', '  Holes in exhaust near post cat o2 sensor  Bad Bank 2, position 2, o2 sensor  Wiring problem, melted harness, broken connectors, etc.  Bad PCM ', 'It's always best to do a visual inspection of the exhaust system first. Look for holes near o2 sensors or wiring harnesses coming in contact with exhaust components. Repair as necessary.1. Start the engine and allow it to reach operating temperature. Using a scan tool, observe the Bank 2 position 2 o2 sensor. If it isn't moving at all this doesn't necessarily mean that anythings wrong. Post cat o2 sensors often switch very little. Increase the engine RPM to a fast idle and then recheck the sensor voltage reading. If it starts switching now, the sensor may be sluggish and/or intermittently going &quot;dormant&quot;. Replacing the sensor at this point would be a good idea. Visually check the o2 sensor for contaminates, etc. If you suspect it's contaminated with coolant or oil, replace it. But, if it still isn't responding after increasing engine RPM, turn off the engine and unplug the 2/2 o2 sensor. With KOEO (key on engine off) check that there is 12 Volts battery voltage and a good ground to the o2 sensor heater element. If the heater element has no battery voltage it can cause the o2 sensor to be sluggish and not switch properly which can cause a P0160.So, diagnose that problem first(there will usually be other codes present). If there is power and ground to the heater element check that the sensor ground is present. If it is, connect a jumper wire between the sensor ground and signal wire. Now the 2/2 o2 sensor reading should be low. If so, replace the Bank 2 position 2 o2 sensor. If, after connecting the jumper wire, the o2 sensor reading still remains &quot;stuck&quot;, check for wiring problems, harness contacting exhaust components, or broken connectors. Repair as necessary. Then recheck. If you can find no wiring problems and the o2 sensor reading on the scan tool doesn't change after installing the jumper wire, recheck at the PCM connector. It may be necessary to clip the signal wire near the PCM in a location that will be easy to repair. If it now shows a low voltage reading, then you know beyond a doubt that there is a wiring problem. At this point clipping the offending wire out of the harness and running a new one may be your best bet. But If it still shows no change, the PCM may be at fault.', ''
51', 'P0161', 'P0161 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Oxygen O2 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 2, Sensor 2)', 'It basically means the PCM detected either an excessive current draw, or an   open or short in the circuit powering the oxygen sensor's heater circuit. This   is in reference to the Heated Oxygen Sensor (2) located rear of catalytic converter   (Bank 2).', 'There will likely be no obvious symptoms other than MIL illumination.', '', 'A code P0161 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  HO2S heater power circuit open  HO2S heater ground circuit open  HO2S signal tracking (due to oil or moisture in the connector)  HO2S is damaged or has failed PCM has failed', '  HO2S heater power circuit open  HO2S heater ground circuit open  HO2S signal tracking (due to oil or moisture in the connector)  HO2S is damaged or has failed PCM has failed', '  Replace HO2 Sensor  Repair open or short in power circuit  Repair open or short in ground circuit  Repair damaged connector due to tracking', '  Replace HO2 Sensor  Repair open or short in power circuit  Repair open or short in ground circuit  Repair damaged connector due to tracking'
52', 'P0162', 'P0162 02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction', '02 Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 3)', 'The O2 (oxygen) sensors measure oxygen content in the exhaust, whether rich or lean. The PCM (powertrain control module) then uses this information to regulate fuel injector pulse in order to keep the proper air:fuel ratio. The O2 sensors are very important for the proper operation of the engine.Fouled or faulty O2 sensors can cause the PCM to add or take away fuel based on the faulty O2 sensor data which can cause a false lean or rich condition. A P0162 code refers to the Bank 2,3 O2 sensor, or the third sensor downstream (post-cat) on Bank 2. It is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a ground circuit and a reference voltage circuit of about 0.5 volts or half a volt. Also for the O2 sensor heater element there is a battery voltage supply wire (usually from the power distribution center) and another ground circuit for that. The O2 sensor heater allows the O2 sensor to warm up faster, thus achieving closed loop in less time than it would normally take for the exhaust to warm the sensor up to operating temperature. This creates less exhaust emissions at cold startup. The O2 sensor varies the supplied reference voltage based on oxygen content in the exhaust. It is capable of varying from about 0.1 to 0.9 volts, 0.1 V indicating lean exhaust and 0.9 V indicating rich exhaust. This P0162 code indicates that the Bank 2, 3 O2 sensor is stuck low for too long or is inactive. ', 'Often post-cat O2 sensor problems present few drivability issues since they are inputs to the PCM to monitor catalytic converter quality and don't directly control fuel. Sometimes no symptoms are noticeable. However the following may be possible on some vehicles:   MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Decrease in MPG  Increase in tailpipe emissions', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Decrease in MPG  Increase in tailpipe emissions', 'Potential causes of a P0162 code include:  Bad O2 sensor  Signal shorted to voltage   Wiring problems due to contact with exhaust components  Holes in exhaust near O2 sensor ', '  Bad O2 sensor  Signal shorted to voltage   Wiring problems due to contact with exhaust components  Holes in exhaust near O2 sensor ', 'Warm the engine up to normal operating temperature. Using your scan tool's live datastream, check the signal voltage for the Bank 2,3 O2 sensor at idle. Is it stuck low and not switching? If so, increase engine RPMs for a minute or so and observe if the sensor begins switching or changing voltage. If it does after a period of elevated idle, check under the vehicle for rusty exhaust components or holes in the exhaust near the O2 sensor(s). Repair as necessary. If the exhaust is intact, then suspect a sluggish Bank 2,3 O2 sensor and replace it. If you observe that the O2 sensor remains low on the datastream, then unplug it and observe the reading. It should now be showing reference voltage, or half a volt (0.5 v). If it does, check for connector problems, water intrusion, damage to the sensor, etc. If all is okay, replace the faulty Bank 2,3 O2 sensor.If the voltage reading is still low after unplugging the O2 sensor, then suspect a problem with the wiring. Visually inspect the wiring harness making sure that there is no contact with hot exhaust components and that all the harness retainers are in place. Repair as necessary If no wiring harness issues exist, use a voltmeter to check for reference voltage from the PCM at the unplugged connector. It should be reading reference voltage, or about half a volt (0.5v). If voltage reading is too high, repair the short to voltage on the signal circuit. ', ''
53', 'P0163', 'P0163 02 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage', '02 Sensor Circuit Low Voltage (Bank 2 Sensor 3)', 'This code refers to a fault in one of the post-catalyst O2 sensors on Bank 2. This oxygen sensor is used for a specific purpose. This is it in a nutshell: The Catalytic Converter is used to help control emissions, to &quot;clean up&quot; the exhaust gasses. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) uses the signal from post catalyst heated oxygen sensors to monitor the catalyst's efficiency by comparing it to the O2 sensors in front of the catalyst. If the PCM sees little or no difference between the exhaust quality in post- and pre- catalyst sensors then it knows that the catalyst is not working properly.To over simplify: a post-cat sensor's main job is to monitor catalyst efficiency, not control fuel management. If you have a P0163, that doesn't mean your catalyst is bad (in fact, it usually never does). This code basically means that the Bank 2, Sensor 3 (or third o2 sensor back on bank 2) signal voltage is below what is considered normal for that sensor. It's a four wire sensor being supplied a 0.5 volt reference voltage on the signal wire and a ground, as well as a power and ground circuit for the o2 sensor heater element. Changes in oxygen content cause resistance changes inside the sensor. This changing resistance affects the 0.5 volts on the signal/reference circuit.A heated o2 sensor is capable of switching between 0.1 volts and 0.9 volts with 0.1 volts indicating lean and 0.9 volts indicating rich. However, a properly working post-catalyst sensor will exhibit small changes at a slower rate than front (pre-catalyst) O2 sensors. It may switch slightly above and below 0.45 volts at the rate of about 1 switch per second or less. The PCM monitors this signal change to determine if the catalyst is working properly. If the PCM determines that the Bank 2,3 O2 sensor signal voltage is below a certain threshold for too long, P0163 will set. ', 'Rear O2 sensor problems won't usually cause drivability issues since they are an input that measures catalyst efficiency (unlike front O2 sensors). However if you have other codes present, like lean codes or pre-O2 sensor codes, then they may cause drivability problems. The following symptoms may be present:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine performance issues  Engine running rough  Engine running rich (only if PCM is trying to add fuel to compensate for low O2 sensor voltage reading)  Engine running lean (only if vacuum leak is large enough that PCM can't compensate by adding fuel)   Poor idle', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine performance issues  Engine running rough  Engine running rich (only if PCM is trying to add fuel to compensate for low O2 sensor voltage reading)  Engine running lean (only if vacuum leak is large enough that PCM can't compensate by adding fuel)   Poor idle', 'Potential causes of a P0163 code include:  Air leaks in exhaust in front of O2 sensor giving false reading  Engine running excessively lean  O2 sensor connector damaged/corroded  O2 sensor signal circuit is shorted to ground  O2 sensor ground circuit is open  O2 sensor has failed (it may be contaminated with fuel or coolant)  PCM has failed ', '  Air leaks in exhaust in front of O2 sensor giving false reading  Engine running excessively lean  O2 sensor connector damaged/corroded  O2 sensor signal circuit is shorted to ground  O2 sensor ground circuit is open  O2 sensor has failed (it may be contaminated with fuel or coolant)  PCM has failed ', 'It's always good to start with checking for air leaks in the exhaust manifold and in the exhaust pipes. Fix these first. With KOER (Key on engine running) use a scan tool or a voltmeter check the O2 sensor signal voltage with engine warm. You may have to increase the RPM to a fast idle to check the voltage of the bank 2,3 sensor. If it's voltage is stuck low (less than 0.5 volts) and you don't have any other O2 sensor codes present in the PCM, then the sensor is probably bad. If the voltage isn't stuck low and the O2 sensor seems to be operating fine, it's likely sticking low intermittently. This often turns out to be the sensor. In either case, replacing the sensor can be an effective way to diagnose the problem. But it can also be an expensive diagnostic tool, especially if it turns out to be a wiring issue, instead of a sensor.So, if you're interested in knowing for sure what the problem is before spending unnecessarily, then perform the following: 1. Turn off the engine and unplug the 2,3 O2 sensor connector. Inspect for corrosion, etc. Repair as necessary. Make sure that there is battery voltage present and ground present for the O2 sensor heater. If there isn't, then diagnose that first then retest. The O2 sensor depends on the heater to warm it up so it can start working quicker. If the heater element is bad or there isn't the proper voltage supplying it, the sensor may set this code. Usually heater problems have codes associated with them, too. If you find there is no battery voltage feeding the O2 sensor use the associated code to diagnose that. If you find the heater element bad, replace the sensor. If the heater element checks out then, using a jumper wire, supply a chassis ground to the O2 sensor connector (PCM side) ground circuit. Now observe the scan tool bank 2,3 O2 sensor reading. If it is now at about a half a volt then replace the O2 sensor.If, after supplying a ground to the unplugged PCM side of the O2 sensor connector, the voltage reading doesn't change then check the harness for short to ground. Check for harness making contact with exhaust components. Check pins for damage, and for moisture. Repair as necessary. If you can find no harness problems, then the PCM may be at fault.', ''
54', 'P0164', 'P0164 O2 Sensor Circuit High', '02 Sensor Circuit High Voltage (Bank 2 Sensor 3)', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The catalytic converter is used to lower harmful emissions. To ensure proper operation, there is an O2 (oxygen) sensor located behind the catalyst that monitors the oxygen content of the exhaust after the cat. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) then compares the post-cat reading to the pre-cat readings to determine if the catalyst is working properly.A P0164 refers to a fault at the post-cat O2 sensor, indicating that the signal voltage is too high. The O2 sensor is a four wire sensor. Two wires are dedicated to the heating element and two wires are dedicated to the sensor. The heating element should have battery voltage on one wire with key on engine off and ground should be present on the other. The PCM supplies a reference voltage to the O2 sensor which the sensor varies according to oxygen content in the exhaust. It is capable of varying between approximately 0.1 and 0.9 volts. This variance in the voltage is monitored by the PCM. The PCM also supplies a ground to the sensor. P0164 means that the voltage was too high on the signal circuit. Bank 2 is the side of the engine that doesn't contain cylinder #1.', 'Symptoms of a P0164 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  Engine loses power and misses intermittently  May exhibit loss of fuel efficiency', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  Engine loses power and misses intermittently  May exhibit loss of fuel efficiency', 'Potential causes of an P0164 code include:  Bad O2 sensor (Bank 2 Sensor 3)  Wiring in contact with exhaust components  Engine running rich (If other codes are present)  Holes in exhaust near Bank 2 Sensor 3  Short to voltage on signal circuit   Bad PCM', '  Bad O2 sensor (Bank 2 Sensor 3)  Wiring in contact with exhaust components  Engine running rich (If other codes are present)  Holes in exhaust near Bank 2 Sensor 3  Short to voltage on signal circuit   Bad PCM', 'Start the engine and observe the Bank 2 Sensor 3 (a.k.a. 2/3) O2 sensor voltage. You may need to raise the idle up until the O2 sensor starts switching.If it is stuck high, or close to 1 volt and the voltage doesn't vary, then check for a good ground on both the heater element and the sensor. Also check that the heater element is being supplied good battery voltage. No heater operation can cause a sluggish sensor.If the grounds are good and the battery voltage is present, then jumper the sensor's signal wire to the sensor's ground wire. Now the scan tool should read low or near zero volts. If it does, the wiring is good. Replace the bank 2/3 O2 sensor. If jumpering the signal wire to the ground doesn't lower the voltage, then check the O2 sensor wiring harness. Make sure there is no contact with hot exhaust components. Ensure good wiring harness connections. If the wiring checks out, then reperform the previous wiring harness checks at the PCM connector.If now the 2/3 O2 sensor reading drops, then there is a wiring problem that isn't visible. Open the harness and visually inspect the wiring for problems. But if the result is the same, then the PCM may be bad.', ''
55', 'P0166', 'P0166 O2 Sensor Circuit (No Activity)', '02 Sensor Circuit No Activity Detected (Bank 1 Sensor 3)', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The catalytic converter is used to control emissions. The O2 (oxygen) sensor on bank 2, position 3 is aft of the converter and monitors the catalyst efficiency. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) does this by comparing the post-cat o2 sensor to the pre-cat o2 sensors. The o2 sensor is a four wire sensor. The PCM supplies a reference to the sensor of about half a volt and also supplies a sensor ground and 12 volts for the heater element. The fourth wire is a ground for the heater element (the heater in the sensor helps the sensor to warm up faster which allows the engine to reach closed loop sooner).The sensor varies the supplied reference voltage based on oxygen content of the exhaust. Oxygen sensors are capable of varying between 0.1 volts to 0.9 volts. Lean exhaust produces low voltage and causes the supplied 0.45 volts to drop. Rich exhaust produces high voltage and causes the supplied 0.45 voltage to increase. Pre-catalyst o2 sensors switch between low and high voltage rapidly. However a post-cat o2 sensor may switch much slower &amp; not vary as much (this is normal). If the sensor doesn't respond as it should or there are too few switches in a given time period, P0166 may set. Bank 2 is the side of the engine that does not contain cylinder #1.', 'Symptoms of a P0166 DTC may include:    MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  May idle or drive poorly  Fuel economy may decrease', '    MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) on  May idle or drive poorly  Fuel economy may decrease', 'Potential causes of an P0166 code include:  Bad Bank 2, position 3, o2 sensor  Wiring problem, melted harness, broken connectors, etc.  Bad PCM ', '  Bad Bank 2, position 3, o2 sensor  Wiring problem, melted harness, broken connectors, etc.  Bad PCM ', '1. Start the engine and allow it to reach operating temperature. Using a scan tool, observe the Bank 2 position 3 o2 sensor. If it isn't moving between 0.1 and 0.9 volts, increase the engine RPM to a fast idle and then recheck the sensor voltage reading. If it starts switching now, the sensor may be sluggish and/or intermittently going &quot;dormant&quot;. Replacing the sensor at this point would be a good idea.Visually check the o2 sensor for contaminates, etc. If you suspect it's contaminated with coolant or oil, replace it.a. But, if it still isn't responding after increasing engine RPM, turn off the engine and unplug the 1/3 o2 sensor. With KOEO (key on engine off) check that there is battery voltage and ground to the o2 sensor heater element. If the heater element has no battery voltage it can cause the o2 sensor to go &quot;dormant&quot; and not switch properly which can cause a P0166. So, diagnose that problem first(there will usually be other codes present).b. If there is power and ground to the heater element check that the sensor ground is present. If it is, connect a jumper wire between the sensor ground and signal wire. Now the 1/3 o2 sensor reading should be low. If so, replace the Bank 2 position 3 o2 sensor.c. If, after connecting the jumper wire, the o2 sensor reading still remains &quot;stuck&quot;, check for wiring problems, harness contacting exhaust components, or broken connectors. Repair as necessary. Then recheck.d. If you can find no wiring problems and the o2 sensor reading on the scan tool doesn't change after installing the jumper wire, recheck at the PCM connector. If it still shows no change, the PCM may be at fault.', ''
56', 'P0167', 'P0167 O2 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction', '02 Sensor Heater Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 3)', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.O2 (Oxygen) sensors contain a heating element that allows the sensor to reach operating temperature quickly. This lowers emissions since it allows the engine to reach closed loop faster and also allows the engine to stay in closed loop at idle. The heater circuit is supplied a 12 V battery feed from the PCM or ignition circuit (depending on model) and a ground. The PCM (powertrain control module) monitors how long it takes for the sensors to become active after engine start-up. If it takes too long for the o2 sensors to reach operating temperature, this P0167 can set. Bank 2 is the side of the engine that does not contain cylinder #1.', 'For this particular O2 sensor, there may be no noticeable symptoms other than:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor/ rough idle', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Poor/ rough idle', 'Potential causes of an P0167 code include:  Bad o2 sensor heater circuit  Bad o2 sensor  Wiring harness problems ', '  Bad o2 sensor heater circuit  Bad o2 sensor  Wiring harness problems ', 'Unplug the Bank 1, 3 sensor. With KOEO (key on engine off) use a voltmeter to check for battery voltage present at the o2 sensor connector (PCM side). (You can also do this with a test light. Connect to ground and touch lead to heater circuit supply. Light should illuminate with KOEO) You should have battery voltage present.a. If voltage is present, check the ground side of the heater element also making sure a good ground is present. If it is, check for any faulty connections &amp; then replace the o2 sensor. If you don't have a good ground, then there is an open in the ground circuit somewhere that will need to be repaired. Look for wiring harness contact with exhaust components or broken/missing connectors, etc.b. If battery voltage isn't present with KOEO, check for a blown fuse supplying the heater elements. You may need to get a wiring diagram for this. If the fuse is blown, you'll need to check for a short to ground on the battery supply circuit before replacing the fuse. If you find none, and replacing the fuse re-establishes battery voltage at the o2 sensor connector, then the o2 sensor may have shorted internally, blowing the fuse. Replace it &amp; recheck. (NOTE: it's possible for an o2 sensor's heater circuit to be open/shorted and the o2 sensor to still function).c. If you have no battery voltage present with KOEO and there are no blown fuses supplying the heater circuit, then check for an open on the supply circuit. You can do this by ohming the circuit with the o2 sensor unplugged and the PCM unplugged. Repair and recheck.', ''
57', 'P0170', 'P0170 Fuel Trim Malfunction (Bank 1)', 'Fuel Trim Malfunction (Bank 1)', 'This code is one that surfaces with certain makes of automobiles more than others. In writing this article I've added Mercedes-Benz-specific info since it seems that M-B (and VW) are most prone to having this P0170 surface along with misfire codes or other fuel trim codes. P0170 means there was a malfunction in the computer's control of the air:fuel ratio.It also indicates that the fuel trims reached their limit of adding fuel while trying to compensate for a actual or perceived rich condition. When the fuel trims reach their rich correction limit, the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) sets a P0170, indicating a problem or malfunction in the fuel trims. It may also have a P0173 referring to the same malfunction but on bank two. ', 'Symptoms of a P0170 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) Illumination  Start and stall  Poor fuel economy  Black smoke at tailpipe  Hesitation/misfire at idle or under load', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) Illumination  Start and stall  Poor fuel economy  Black smoke at tailpipe  Hesitation/misfire at idle or under load', 'Potential causes include a vacuum leak, unmetered air leaks Fuel saturated engine oil Leak in turbo air charge hoses (if equipped) Possibly bad O2 sensor (If Mercedes, may require adaptation with M-Benz compatible scan tool.) Oil contamination in MAF connector or O2 sensor connectors. Also check ignition coils, cam and crank sensors, and oil sensor for leakage contributing to oil intrusion in wiring harness. Defective MAF (Mass Air Flow) sensor (especially on Mercedez-Benz and other European autos. There are a lot of problems with aftermarket MAF sensors.) Defective fuel pressure regulator Leaking camshaft adjuster solenoids (Mercedes-Benz).NOTE: for some Mercedes-Benz models there is a service recall for a crankcase vent hose located under the intake manifold. It should be checked for leaks/cracking and also operation of check valve in the hose. The check valve should flow only one way. ', '', 'It should be stated right off the bat that the most common problem associated with this code is the MAF sensor or air mass meter. This is especially the case with Mercedes-Benz and Volkswagen and other European cars. At time of writing, you don't normally see this code with American-made cars, and minimally with Asian, and, to be honest, I have no idea why. It appears to me that the PCM (powertrain control module) logic used by some European car manufacturers to set a P0170 (or P0173) fault code simply isn't used by American vehicle manufacturers. It is more common to see P0171, 0174, 0172, 0175 codes set with regard to fuel trim malfunctions on American cars. There is very little information on the setting conditions for a P0170, or P0173, but what information that is available almost seems to be a redundancy of the P0171,4,2 &amp; 5 setting conditions. I'm sure there's a reason for it, but I can't get anyone to tell me what that is. The similarities between them may be why we don't see this code surface on domestic vehicles very often. It's simply unnecessary. So, simply put, if you have a P0170, your PCM noticed that the fuel trims reached their rich correction limit. Basically it's adding fuel to try to compensate for a lean condition, real or perceived.If you have this code and access to a scan tool, observe the MAF sensor reading in grams/sec. The reading will be different for different automobiles, so get a good spec. I'm going to stick with what would be normal for a Mercedes (1.8L), since they have the bulk of the trouble. Expect to see at idle 3.5-5 g/s (ideally). At 2500 RPMs with no load it should be between 9 and 12 g/s. On road test, at WOT (wide open throttle) it should be 90 g/s or well above. If it's not in specs, replace it. Be careful of Ebay MAFs. Often they don't work according to OE specifications. If the MAF checks out and there is no oil intrusion at the connector, check fuel pressure and ensure that there are no leaks at the regulator internally or externally. Check all vacuum hoses and confirm none are cracked, disconnected or missing. Make sure there are no vacuum leaks at the intake manifold gaskets or tears in the air supply hose. If the engine is turbo charged, be sure the hoses are in good condition and have no leaks. Leaking turbo pressure hoses could cause a rich condition. Inspect the condition of crankcase vent hose under intake manifold and operation of check valve in the hose. (In the &quot;What are the causes?&quot; section) If there doesn't appear to be any problems with the fuel pressure, MAF or vacuum hoses, then inspect the O2 sensor connectors for oil intrusion. A bad O2 sensor could cause a P0170, or P0173. Repair cause of oil leak and replace oil-fouled O2 sensor.', ''
58', 'P0171', 'P0171 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'System Too Lean (Bank 1)', 'Basically this means that an oxygen sensor in bank 1 has detected a lean condition   (too much oxygen in the exhaust). On V6/V8/V10 engines, Bank 1 is the side of   the engine that has cylinder #1. The P0171 is one of the more common trouble codes.This code is triggered by the first downstream (front) O2 sensor. The sensor provides a reading of the air:fuel ratio leaving the engine's cylinders, and the vehicles powertrain/engine control module (PCM/ECM) uses that reading and adjusts to keep the engine running at that optimum ratio of  14.7:1. If something is not right and the PCM cannot maintain the 14.7:1 ratio, but rather there is too much air, it triggers this code.You'll want to also read our article on short and long term fuel trims to help understand the operation of the engine. Note: This DTC is very similar to P0174, and in fact   your vehicle may show both codes at the same time.This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic OBD-II powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may vary depending on the model.', 'You will more than likely not notice any drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as:   a lack of power  detonation (spark knock)  rough idle  hesitation/surge on acceleration.', '   a lack of power  detonation (spark knock)  rough idle  hesitation/surge on acceleration.', 'A code P0171 may mean that one or more of the following   has happened:  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty    Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters may cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled.     There is also an issue with some vehicles where the MAF sensors leak the silicone     potting material used to protect the circuitry.  There could be a vacuum leak downstream of the MAF sensor  Possible cracked vacuum or PCV line/connection  Faulty or stuck open PCV valve  Failed or faulty oxygen sensor (bank 1, sensor 1)  Sticking/plugged or failed fuel injector  Low fuel pressure (possible plugged/dirty fuel filter!)  Exhaust leak between engine and first oxygen sensor', '  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty    Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters may cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled.     There is also an issue with some vehicles where the MAF sensors leak the silicone     potting material used to protect the circuitry.  There could be a vacuum leak downstream of the MAF sensor  Possible cracked vacuum or PCV line/connection  Faulty or stuck open PCV valve  Failed or faulty oxygen sensor (bank 1, sensor 1)  Sticking/plugged or failed fuel injector  Low fuel pressure (possible plugged/dirty fuel filter!)  Exhaust leak between engine and first oxygen sensor', 'A lot of times, cleaning the MAF sensor and finding/fixing vacuum leaks fix the problem. If you're on a tight budget, start there, but that may not be the fix for certain. So, possible solutions include:  Clean the MAF sensor.     Consult your service manual for it's location if you need help. I find it's     best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner or brake cleaner.     Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor, and make sure it's     dry before reinstalling  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace/repair as required  Inspect all hoses and connections in the air intake system  Inspect and/or test the intake manifold gaskets for leakage  Check for a dirty fuel filter and proper fuel pressure  Ideally you'll want to monitor short and long term fuel trims using an advanced scan tool  If you have access, you may want to run a smoke test', '  Clean the MAF sensor.     Consult your service manual for it's location if you need help. I find it's     best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner or brake cleaner.     Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor, and make sure it's     dry before reinstalling  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace/repair as required  Inspect all hoses and connections in the air intake system  Inspect and/or test the intake manifold gaskets for leakage  Check for a dirty fuel filter and proper fuel pressure  Ideally you'll want to monitor short and long term fuel trims using an advanced scan tool  If you have access, you may want to run a smoke test'
59', 'P0172', 'P0172 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'System Too Rich (Bank 1)', 'Basically this means that an oxygen sensor in bank 1 detected a rich condition   (too little oxygen in the exhaust). On V6/V8/V10 engines, Bank 1 is the side   of the engine that has cylinder #1.Note: This DTC is very similar to P0175, and in fact   your vehicle may show both codes at the same time.', 'You will more than likely not notice any drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a misfire.', '', 'A code P0172 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty. Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters can cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled.     There is also an issue with some vehicles where the MAF sensors leak the silicone     potting material used to protect the circuitry.  There could be a vacuum leak.  There could be a fuel pressure or delivery problem', '  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty. Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters can cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled.     There is also an issue with some vehicles where the MAF sensors leak the silicone     potting material used to protect the circuitry.  There could be a vacuum leak.  There could be a fuel pressure or delivery problem', 'Possible solutions include:  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace if necessary  Cleanthe MAF sensor. Consult your service manual for it's location if you     need help. I find it's best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner     or brake cleaner. Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor,     and make sure it's dry before reinstalling  Inspect fuel lines for cracks, leaks, or pinches  Check the fuel pressure at the fuel rail  Check the fuel injectors, they may be dirty. Use fuel injector cleaner or     get them professionally cleaned/replaced.  Check for an exhaust leak before the first oxygen sensor (this is unlikely     to cause the problem, but it is possible)', '  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace if necessary  Cleanthe MAF sensor. Consult your service manual for it's location if you     need help. I find it's best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner     or brake cleaner. Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor,     and make sure it's dry before reinstalling  Inspect fuel lines for cracks, leaks, or pinches  Check the fuel pressure at the fuel rail  Check the fuel injectors, they may be dirty. Use fuel injector cleaner or     get them professionally cleaned/replaced.  Check for an exhaust leak before the first oxygen sensor (this is unlikely     to cause the problem, but it is possible)'
60', 'P0173', 'P0173 Fuel Trim Malfunction (Bank 2)', 'Fuel Trim Malfunction (Bank 2)', 'This code is one that surfaces with certain makes of automobiles more than others. In writing this article I've added Mercedes-Benz-specific info since it seems that M-B (and VW) are most prone to having this P0173 surface along with misfire codes or other fuel trim codes. P0173 means there was a malfunction in the computer's control of the air:fuel ratio.It also indicates that the fuel trims reached their limit of adding fuel while trying to compensate for a actual or perceived rich condition. When the fuel trims reach their rich correction limit, the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) sets a P0173, indicating a problem or malfunction in the fuel trims. It may also have a P0170 referring to the same malfunction but on bank one. ', 'Symptoms of a P0173 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) Illumination  Start and stall  Poor fuel economy  Black smoke at tailpipe  Hesitation/misfire at idle or under load', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) Illumination  Start and stall  Poor fuel economy  Black smoke at tailpipe  Hesitation/misfire at idle or under load', 'Potential causes include a vacuum leak, unmetered air leaks Fuel saturated engine oil Leak in turbo air charge hoses (if equipped) Possibly bad O2 sensor (If Mercedes, may require adaptation with M-Benz compatible scan tool.) Oil contamination in MAF connector or O2 sensor connectors. Also check ignition coils, cam and crank sensors, and oil sensor for leakage contributing to oil intrusion in wiring harness. Defective MAF (Mass Air Flow) sensor (especially on Mercedez-Benz and other European autos. There are a lot of problems with aftermarket MAF sensors.) Defective fuel pressure regulator Leaking camshaft adjuster solenoids (Mercedes-Benz).NOTE: for some Mercedes-Benz models there is a service recall for a crankcase vent hose located under the intake manifold. It should be checked for leaks/cracking and also operation of check valve in the hose. The check valve should flow only one way. ', '', 'It should be stated right off the bat that the most common problem associated with this code is the MAF sensor or air mass meter. This is especially the case with Mercedes-Benz and Volkswagen and other European cars. At time of writing, you don't normally see this code with American-made cars, and minimally with Asian, and, to be honest, I have no idea why. It appears to me that the PCM (powertrain control module) logic used by some European car manufacturers to set a P0173 (or P0173) fault code simply isn't used by American vehicle manufacturers. It is more common to see P0171, 0174, 0172, 0175 codes set with regard to fuel trim malfunctions on American cars. There is very little information on the setting conditions for a P0173, or P0173, but what information that is available almost seems to be a redundancy of the P0171,4,2 &amp; 5 setting conditions. I'm sure there's a reason for it, but I can't get anyone to tell me what that is. The similarities between them may be why we don't see this code surface on domestic vehicles very often. It's simply unnecessary. So, simply put, if you have a P0173, your PCM noticed that the fuel trims reached their rich correction limit. Basically it's adding fuel to try to compensate for a lean condition, real or perceived.If you have this code and access to a scan tool, observe the MAF sensor reading in grams/sec. The reading will be different for different automobiles, so get a good spec. I'm going to stick with what would be normal for a Mercedes (1.8L), since they have the bulk of the trouble. Expect to see at idle 3.5-5 g/s (ideally). At 2500 RPMs with no load it should be between 9 and 12 g/s. On road test, at WOT (wide open throttle) it should be 90 g/s or well above. If it's not in specs, replace it. Be careful of Ebay MAFs. Often they don't work according to OE specifications. If the MAF checks out and there is no oil intrusion at the connector, check fuel pressure and ensure that there are no leaks at the regulator internally or externally. Check all vacuum hoses and confirm none are cracked, disconnected or missing. Make sure there are no vacuum leaks at the intake manifold gaskets or tears in the air supply hose. If the engine is turbo charged, be sure the hoses are in good condition and have no leaks. Leaking turbo pressure hoses could cause a rich condition. Inspect the condition of crankcase vent hose under intake manifold and operation of check valve in the hose. (In the &quot;What are the causes?&quot; section) If there doesn't appear to be any problems with the fuel pressure, MAF or vacuum hoses, then inspect the O2 sensor connectors for oil intrusion. A bad O2 sensor could cause a P0170, or P0173. Repair cause of oil leak and replace oil-fouled O2 sensor.', ''
61', 'P0174', 'P0174 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'System Too Lean (Bank 2)', 'Basically this means that an oxygen sensor in bank 2 detected a lean condition   (too much oxygen in the exhaust). On V6/V8/V10 engines, Bank 2 is generally   the side of the engine that doesn't have cylinder #1.Note: This DTC is very similar to P0171, and in fact   your vehicle may show both codes at the same time.', 'You will more than likely not notice any drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a lack of power, detonation (spark knock), and/or a   hesitation/surge on acceleration.', '', 'A code P0174 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty. Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters can cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled.     There is also an issue with some vehicles where the MAF sensors leak the silicone     potting material used to protect the circuitry.  There could be a vacuum leak downstream of the MAF sensor.', '  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty. Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters can cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled.     There is also an issue with some vehicles where the MAF sensors leak the silicone     potting material used to protect the circuitry.  There could be a vacuum leak downstream of the MAF sensor.', 'Possible solutions include:  In the vast majority of cases, simply cleaning the MAF sensor does the trick.     Consult your service manual for it's location if you need help. I find it's     best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner or brake cleaner.     Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor, and make sure it's     dry before reinstalling  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace if necessary  Check for a dirty fuel filter and proper fuel pressure', '  In the vast majority of cases, simply cleaning the MAF sensor does the trick.     Consult your service manual for it's location if you need help. I find it's     best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner or brake cleaner.     Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor, and make sure it's     dry before reinstalling  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace if necessary  Check for a dirty fuel filter and proper fuel pressure'
62', 'P0175', 'P0175 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'System Too Rich (Bank 2)', 'Basically this means that an oxygen sensor in bank 2detected a rich condition   (too little oxygen in the exhaust). On V6/V8/V10 engines, Bank 2 is the side   of the engine that doesn't have cylinder #1.Note: This DTC is very similar to P0172, and in fact   your vehicle may show both codes at the same time.', 'You will more than likely not notice any drivability problems, although there   may be symptoms such as a misfire.', '', 'A code P0175 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty. Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters can cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled  There could be a vacuum leak.  There could be a fuel pressure or delivery problem', '  The MAF (Mass Air Flow) Sensor is dirty or faulty. Note: The use of &quot;oiled&quot;     air filters can cause the MAF to become dirty if the filter is over-oiled  There could be a vacuum leak.  There could be a fuel pressure or delivery problem', 'Possible solutions include:  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace if necessary  Clean the MAF sensor. Consult your service manual for it's location if you     need help. I find it's best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner     or brake cleaner. Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor,     and make sure it's dry before reinstalling  Inspect fuel lines for cracks, leaks, or pinches  Check the fuel pressure at the fuel rail  Check the fuel injectors, they may be dirty. Use fuel injector cleaner or     get them professionally cleaned/replaced.  Check for an exhaust leak before the first oxygen sensor (this is unlikely     to cause the problem, but it is possible)', '  Inspect all vacuum and PCV hoses, replace if necessary  Clean the MAF sensor. Consult your service manual for it's location if you     need help. I find it's best to take it off and spray it with electronics cleaner     or brake cleaner. Make sure you are careful not to damage the MAF sensor,     and make sure it's dry before reinstalling  Inspect fuel lines for cracks, leaks, or pinches  Check the fuel pressure at the fuel rail  Check the fuel injectors, they may be dirty. Use fuel injector cleaner or     get them professionally cleaned/replaced.  Check for an exhaust leak before the first oxygen sensor (this is unlikely     to cause the problem, but it is possible)'
63', 'P0200', 'P0200 Fuel Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'In sequential fuel injection the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) controls each injector individually. Battery voltage is supplied to each injector from, usually, the power distribution center (PDC) or other fused source.The PCM supplies the ground circuit to each injector by means of an internal switch called a &quot;driver&quot;. The PCM monitors each driver circuit for faults. For example, when a fuel injector is commanded &quot;off&quot; by the PCM, it expects to see a high voltage on the driver ground circuit. Conversely, when a fuel injector is commanded &quot;on&quot; by the PCM, it expects to see the voltage pulled low on the driver circuit If it doesn't see this expected condition on the driver circuit, P0200 or P1222 may set. Other injector circuit fault codes may set as well. ', 'Symptoms of a P0200 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine misfire at idle or at highway speed  Engine may start and stall or not start at all  Cylinder misfire codes may be present', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine misfire at idle or at highway speed  Engine may start and stall or not start at all  Cylinder misfire codes may be present', 'Potential causes of an P0200 code include:  Open or shorted injector  Injector low internal resistance (basically an injector that works, but is out of specs)  Grounded driver circuit  Open driver circuit  Driver circuit shorted to voltage  Wiring harness intermittently shorting against underhood components', '  Open or shorted injector  Injector low internal resistance (basically an injector that works, but is out of specs)  Grounded driver circuit  Open driver circuit  Driver circuit shorted to voltage  Wiring harness intermittently shorting against underhood components', '1. If you have multiple misfire/injector codes, a good first step is to unplug all the fuel injectors and then turn the ignition on, engine off (KOEO). Check for presence of battery voltage (12 Volts) at one wire of each injector connector. If all are missing, check for continuity to ground on the voltage circuit by using a test light connected to positive battery and probe each voltage feed. If it lights up, then there is a short to ground on the voltage feed causing a short. Get a wiring diagram and repair the short on the voltage feed and reestablish proper battery voltage. (Don't forget to check for a blown fuse and replace as necessary). NOTE: It's possible for one injector to short out the whole battery voltage feed to all the injectors. So if you have lost voltage to all the injectors, replace the blown fuse and plug each injector in, one by one. If the fuse blows, the last injector you plugged in is shorted. Replace it and retest. If only one or two battery feeds are missing, then it's more likely to be a shorted battery voltage feed in the individual injector wiring harness. Inspect and repair as necessary.2. If you have battery voltage fed to each injector harness, then the next step is to get a noid light to check for injector driver operation. A noid light will insert into the injector harness in place of the fuel injector and flash rapidly when the injector driver operates. Check each fuel injector connector. If the noid light flashes rapidly then suspect the injector. Ohm each fuel injector if you have a resistance specification. If the injector is open or the resistance is higher or lower than the spec, replace the fuel injector. If the injector tests out, the problem is likely an intermittent wiring problem. (Remember that a fuel injector can work properly when cold but go open when hot, or vice versa. So it's best to do these checks when the problem is occurring). Check the wiring harness for any chafing, or the injector connector for loose pins or a broken lock. Repair as necessary and retest. Now, if the noid light doesn't flash, then there's a problem with the driver or the driver circuit. Unplug the PCM connector and ohm the fuel injector driver circuits. Any resistance means there's a problem. Infinite resistance points to an open in the circuit. Find it and repair it, then retest. If you can find no problem with the harness and there is no fuel injector driver operation, then check the PCM powers and grounds. If they are okay, the PCM may be at fault. ', ''
64', 'P0201', 'P0201 - Cylinder 1 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 1 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
65', 'P0202', 'P0202 - Cylinder 2 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 2 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0202 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
66', 'P0203', 'P0203 - Cylinder 3 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 3 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0203 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
67', 'P0204', 'P0204 - Cylinder 4 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 4 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0204 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
68', 'P0205', 'P0205 - Cylinder 5 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 5 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0205 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
69', 'P0206', 'P0206 - Cylinder 6 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 6 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0206 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
70', 'P0207', 'P0207 - Cylinder 7 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 7 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0207 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
71', 'P0208', 'P0208 - Cylinder 8 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 8 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0208 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
72', 'P0209', 'P0209 - Cylinder 9 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 9 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0209 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
73', 'P0210', 'P0210 - Cylinder 10 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 10 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0210 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
74', 'P0211', 'P0211 - Cylinder 11 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 11 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0211 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
75', 'P0212', 'P0212 - Cylinder 12 Injector Circuit Malfunction', 'Cylinder 12 Injector Circuit Malfunction', '', 'The symptoms for this code will likely be a misfire and a rough running engine.   Poor acceleration. The MIL will also be illuminated.', '', 'The causes of a P0212 engine light code could be any of the following:   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   Bad injector. This is usually the cause of this code but doesn't rule out     the possibility of one of the other causes   Open in the wiring to the injector   Short in the wiring to the injector   Bad PCM', '   First, using a DVOM check the resistance of the injector. If it isn't     within specs, then replace the injector.   Check for voltage at the fuel injector connector. It should have 10 volts     or more.   Visually check the connector for damage or broken wires.   Visually check the injector for damage.   If you have access to an injector tester, activate the injector and see     if it operates. If the injector operates, then you likely have either an open     in the wiring, or a blocked injector. If you do not have access to a tester,     swap the injector with another one and see if the code changes. If the code     changes, then change the injector.   At the PCM, remove the driver wire from the PCM connector and Ground the     wire. (Make sure you have the correct wire. If you're not sure, do not attempt)     The injector should activate   Replace the injector', ''
76', 'P0216', 'P0216 DTC - Injection Timing Control Circuit Malfunction', 'Injection Timing Control Circuit Malfunction', 'Basically this means the diesel fuel injection pump has a timing failure. This could be that the injection pump timing needs adjusted OR the failure is internal to the injection pump and therefore non-adjustable.NOTE: If your vehicle is a Dodge Ram with Cummins engine then be aware that fuel delivery problems frequently cause this code. Prolonged fuel delivery problems can cause injection pump failure!', 'Symptoms of a P0216 DTC may include:  Low power  Crank, but no start  Hard start  Displays an intermittent stumble or miss  Engine may start and then stall  Engine may appear to drive fine but surge at idle', '  Low power  Crank, but no start  Hard start  Displays an intermittent stumble or miss  Engine may start and then stall  Engine may appear to drive fine but surge at idle', 'The most frequent cause of this code is a bad injection pump due to poor fuel delivery. Fuel delivery problems could be:   A plugged diesel fuel filter  An in-tank blockage  Air in the fuel due to a cracked in-tank fuel ine above the fuel level  Bad transfer (lift) pump  Injection pump out of time', '  A plugged diesel fuel filter  An in-tank blockage  Air in the fuel due to a cracked in-tank fuel ine above the fuel level  Bad transfer (lift) pump  Injection pump out of time', 'First, simply check if your injection pump timing is adjustable. If so, check the timing and adjust if necessary.If you think that you may have a fuel delivery problem, then check the lift pump operation. On Dodge Ram with the Cummins engine, the lift pump should produce about 45 oz of diesel in 25 seconds of operation. This can be performed by disconnecting the fuel hose from the injection pump and pumping the fuel into an approved container. Bump the engine over but do not start it. Then the lift pump will operate for 25 seconds. If the fuel is aerated, then check/repair fuel line and recheck.With the fuel hose connected the fuel pressure should be 10psi. If the fuel delivery tests fail, replace the diesel fuel filter and recheck.If it still fails then verify there are no restrictions in the fuel tank Then replace the lift (transfer) pump. IT SHOULD BE NOTED that if this code surfaced after a routine fuel filter replacement or if you have any of the above symptoms after routine fuel filter replacement, then suspect the fuel transfer pump. This occurs because even a weak transfer pump can still provide enough fuel for the engine to run. But when the fuel system's prime is lost due to fuel filter replacement, it may not restart again without fixing the fuel delivery problem.If you found your injection pump to be bad, the lift pump should be checked for operation to protect the new injection pump. This is because weak or low output from lift pump are common cause of injection pump failure. There are some aftermarket kits that can be purchased to warn the operator when the fuel pressure/volume drops to level that could damage the injection pump.', ''
77', 'P0217', 'P0217 Engine Over Temperature', 'Engine Overtemp Condition', 'Having this code in memory means your vehicle is equipped with an engine overtemp indicator light that will illuminate in the event of an overheat condition. Most modern vehicles are also equipped with a temperature gauge but some aren't.An overheat condition is usually anything above 240-250 deg. F (will vary according to manufacturer) in the cooling system. The overtemp light is designed to illuminate before engine damage occurs but shutting the engine down as soon as possible should be your first priority.', 'Symptoms of a P0217 DTC may include:  MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Loss of power  Coolant expelled from reservoir or radiator  Low coolant  Acrid smell of coolant due to leak  Air conditioner inoperative (In the event of an overheat condition, the PCM (powertrain control module) on some vehicles shuts down the A/C system to reduce load on the engine).', '  MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Loss of power  Coolant expelled from reservoir or radiator  Low coolant  Acrid smell of coolant due to leak  Air conditioner inoperative (In the event of an overheat condition, the PCM (powertrain control module) on some vehicles shuts down the A/C system to reduce load on the engine).', 'Potential causes of a P0217 code include:  Low coolant due to leak in cooling system  Restriction/debris in the A/C condenser or radiator  Restriction/debris in the cooling system  Thermostat stuck closed or faulty  Inoperative cooling fan(s)  Cylinder head gasket leaking combustion into cooling system  Overloaded trailer towing  Faulty water pump (impeller broken/damaged)', '  Low coolant due to leak in cooling system  Restriction/debris in the A/C condenser or radiator  Restriction/debris in the cooling system  Thermostat stuck closed or faulty  Inoperative cooling fan(s)  Cylinder head gasket leaking combustion into cooling system  Overloaded trailer towing  Faulty water pump (impeller broken/damaged)', 'Start by checking the coolant level ON A COLD ENGINE. It's never a good idea to check the coolant on a hot or overheated engine. Also, putting cold water in an overheated, empty cooling system causes thermal shock and isn't a good idea.If you find your cooling system is low on coolant and you have a P0217 stored, inspect the system for leaks and repair as necessary. Then change the thermostat (see note below) and after refilling the cooling system, restart the engine and verify it isn't overheating. Be aware that it's possible for an overheated engine to expel the coolant out of the radiator cap to protect the cooling system from over-pressurization. If you can't locate a leak, this may be the reason.Follow the steps below to check the performance of the cooling system. If the coolant level is normal, check the radiator and A/C condenser for any type of restriction that could impede airflow. This step may require removing the radiator and visually inspecting it outside of the vehicle. Check in between the radiator and the condenser for restriction or debris. Make sure all the plastic panels that direct airflow into the radiator are in place. If you have access to a scan tool, check the cooling fans for operation or abnormal noise indicating a bearing failure. Look down into the radiator tank (if possible) and observe the condition. Is there a lot of buildup that may restrict coolant flow? If so, replace the radiator.If you don't notice any apparent problems, and the vehicle continues to overheat, feel the upper radiator hose. Is it hot, indicating that the coolant is flowing freely? If not, the water pump impeller may be damaged or broken causing a no-flow condition. If the water pump appears to be working properly, the thermostat may be faulty. Replace it and re-check. If after the above checks, you still have problems with overheating and coolant being expelled from the system, you may have combustion gasses leaking into the cooling system. This would require a combustion gas leak-test on the cooling system. If you have a P0217 but the vehicle isn't overheating, there may be a faulty coolant temperature sender.Note: An overheated engine can effectively ruin the thermostat. So it's always best to replace the thermostat after an overheat condition. If you don't you may successfully repair the original cause of the overheat but still have an overheat condition due to the damaged thermostat.', ''
78', 'P0218', 'P0218 Transmission Over Temperature', 'Transmission Over Temperature Condition', 'If you have a P0218 code stored, then you have a transmission fluid temperature sender and likely have a transmission over-temp light in the instrument cluster If your transmission/transaxle fluid temperature is greater than 290 deg. F then P0218 will set and the overtemp light will illuminate. The number one cause of transmission failure is overheated fluid. ', 'Symptoms of a P0218 DTC may include:  Vehicle transmission/transaxle won't engage  Leaking fluid out of torque converter seal or other location  Low fluid in transmission/transaxle', '  Vehicle transmission/transaxle won't engage  Leaking fluid out of torque converter seal or other location  Low fluid in transmission/transaxle', 'Potential causes of a P0218 code include:  Overheating due to towing overloaded trailer  Transmission cooler or lines restricted  Restriction/debris in transmission cooler  Low transmission fluid  Inoperative cooling fan/fan clutch  Missing or damaged front air dam/spoiler  Bad transmission fluid temperature sensor', '  Overheating due to towing overloaded trailer  Transmission cooler or lines restricted  Restriction/debris in transmission cooler  Low transmission fluid  Inoperative cooling fan/fan clutch  Missing or damaged front air dam/spoiler  Bad transmission fluid temperature sensor', 'If you're towing a heavy load make sure the vehicle is rated for that load. If the load is too heavy, the transmission cooler may not be able to keep the transmission fluid temperature down. An overheated transmission/transaxle won't last long.Next, make sure that the cooler isn't restricted by any debris and that the lines aren't pinched or leaking. If the transmission cooler is equipped with a cooling fan, make sure it's operating properly. If the transmission fluid smells burnt or is dark in color, perform a transmission fluid flush. If the transmission fluid level is low, top it off and check for leaks.Note: An overheated transmission can expel fluid out of the vent or out of the torque converter seal. ', ''
79', 'P0230', 'P0230 Fuel Pump Primary Circuit Malfunction', 'Fuel Pump Primary (Control) Circuit Malfunction', 'The fuel pump is activated by a PCM-controlled relay. Just as the name implies, a &quot;relay&quot; permits the transmittal of higher amperage current to the fuel pump without that current having to travel through the PCM (Powertrain Control Module).For obvious reasons it's better to not have higher amperage current anywhere near the PCM. Higher amperage current creates more heat but also in the event of a failure, can cause a PCM failure. This principal applies to any relay. The higher amperages are kept under the hood, away from sensitive areas The relay contains basically two sides. The &quot;control&quot; side which is basically a coil and the &quot;switch&quot; side which is a set of electrical contacts. The control side (or coil side) is the low amp side. It's fed a switched ignition feed (12 volts with key on)and a ground. The ground circuit is activated by the PCM driver when appropriate. When the PCM fuel pump driver activates the relay coil, the coil acts as an electromagnet that pulls the electrical contacts closed which completes the fuel pump circuit. This closed switch allows voltage to flow on the fuel pump activation circuit, activating the pump. Whenever the key is turned on, the PCM grounds the fuel pump circuit for a few seconds, activating the fuel pump and pressurizing the system. The fuel pump won't be activated again until the PCM sees an RPM signal.The driver in the PCM is monitored for faults. When activated the driver or ground circuit voltage should be low. When deactivated the driver/ground potential voltage should be high or near battery voltage. If the PCM sees a voltage other than what is expected, P0230 may be set.', 'Symptoms of a P0230 DTC may include:  MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  No start condition  No fuel pump operation  Fuel pump runs all the time with ignition on ', '  MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  No start condition  No fuel pump operation  Fuel pump runs all the time with ignition on ', 'Potential causes of a P0230 code include:  Short to ground on control circuit  Fuel pump control circuit open  Short to battery voltage on control circuit  Harness chafing causing one of above conditions  Bad relay  Bad PCM', '  Short to ground on control circuit  Fuel pump control circuit open  Short to battery voltage on control circuit  Harness chafing causing one of above conditions  Bad relay  Bad PCM', 'Command the fuel pump on and off by using a scan tool or simply turning the ignition key on and off without starting the engine. If the fuel pump activates and deactivates, then start the vehicle and measure the current on the control (ground) circuit for a couple of minutes. It should be less than an amp and stay less than an amp.If it doesn't then replacing the relay is a good idea at this point. If the fuel pump won't activate and deactivate, then remove the relay and visually check for discoloration due to heat or loose terminals. If okay, install a test light between the control circuit ignition feed and ground driver terminals (If you're not sure, don't attempt).The test light should illuminate when the key is on or the fuel pump is commanded on. If it doesn't, then make sure there is voltage on one side of the coil (switched ignition feed). If voltage is present repair the open or short on the control ground circuit.', ''
80', 'P0231', 'P0231 Low Voltage Fuel Pump Secondary Circuit', 'Fuel Pump Secondary (Feedback) Circuit Low Voltage', 'The fuel pump is powered by the fuel pump relay. When the PCM (powertrain control module) activates the fuel pump relay, voltage is supplied to the fuel pump and it pressurizes the fuel system. Some vehicles have a feedback on the fuel pump supply circuit. This is simply a circuit spliced into the voltage feed to the fuel pump. The splice is usually located close to the PCM.The PCM monitors this feedback circuit to ensure that there is proper voltage being sent to the fuel pump. As it activates the fuel pump relay, it expects to see battery voltage on the feedback circuit. If it sees voltage that is too low or no voltage at all, it may set P0231. ', 'Symptoms of a P0231 DTC may include:  No start Start and stall  Misfire  Inadequate fuel supply ', '  No start Start and stall  Misfire  Inadequate fuel supply ', 'Potential causes of a P0231 code include:  Bad FP (fuel pump) relay  Harness chafing causing open in fuel pump supply circuit  Loose/damaged connectors  Open in feedback circuit  Fuel pump fuse blown due to short to groundNOTE: If no drivability complaints are present and P0231 code is stored, suspect open in feedback circuit between splice and PCM', '  Bad FP (fuel pump) relay  Harness chafing causing open in fuel pump supply circuit  Loose/damaged connectors  Open in feedback circuit  Fuel pump fuse blown due to short to ground', 'To diagnose fuel pump circuits there's no replacement for a good wiring diagram. Try to locate one before attempting a complex repair. If the vehicle will start and run and no drivability complaints are present, then suspect an open in the feedback circuit between the PCM and where it splices into the fuel pump supply voltage circuit. Repair as necessary.If the vehicle doesn't start or starts and dies due to low fuel pressure, check the fuel pump fuse. If it's blown check for a short to ground on the fuel pump voltage supply circuit. Do this by removing the FP relay and then check the resistance between the voltage supply circuit at the fuel pump connector and ground. If you have little resistance indicating a short to ground, unplug the fuel pump and check again. If it shows high or infinite resistance after unplugging the fuel pump, replace the shorted fuel pump. If the resistance is still low after unplugging the fuel pump then repair short in the FP voltage supply circuit If the resistance check is showing that the fuel pump supply circuit is okay then re-check between the FP fuse and the FP relay. There has to be a short somewhere. Check for wiring harness chafing in certain areas. Repair as necessary. If the fuel pump fuse isn't blown and the vehicle won't start or starts and stalls due to low fuel pressure then remove the fuse and check that voltage is present to the fuse. Then check that voltage is traveling from the fuse to the FP relay by re-installing the FP fuse and checking for battery voltage at the FP relay. If the FP fuse or the FP relay doesn't have voltage supplied to it, the fuel pump will not operate. Find the open in the circuit and repair as necessary. If both the FP fuse and the FP relay have sufficient voltage, remove the FP relay and install a fused jumper wire to complete the FP voltage supply circuit (Usually you do this by jumping terminals 30 &amp; 87 in most relays-check a wiring diagram to be sure). If the fuel pump runs, replace the faulty FP relay and recheck. If the fuel pump doesn't run check for voltage present (with jumper connected or by cycling the ignition key with FP relay installed) at the fuel pump connector at the fuel tank. If voltage is present verify that the ground circuit is intact. If both are okay, replace the fuel pump. If voltage isn't present at the fuel pump with fused jumper wire installed, repair open in fuel pump voltage supply circuit.', ''
81', 'P0232', 'P0232 High Voltage Fuel Pump Secondary Circuit', 'Fuel Pump Secondary (Feedback) Circuit High Voltage', 'The fuel pump is powered by the fuel pump relay. When the PCM (powertrain control module) activates the fuel pump relay, voltage is supplied to the fuel pump and it pressurizes the fuel system. Some vehicles have a feedback on the fuel pump supply circuit. This is simply a circuit spliced into the voltage feed to the fuel pump. The splice is usually located close to the PCM.The PCM monitors this feedback circuit to ensure that there is proper voltage being sent to the fuel pump. As it activates the fuel pump relay, it expects to see battery voltage on the feedback circuit. If the PCM sees an unexpected high voltage when the fuel pump isn't activated, P0232 may set. ', 'Symptoms of a P0232 DTC may include:  MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Fuel pump runs with key off  Small amount of voltage present on FP (fuel pump) voltage supply circuit due to short ', '  MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Fuel pump runs with key off  Small amount of voltage present on FP (fuel pump) voltage supply circuit due to short ', 'Potential causes of a P0232 code include:  Bad FP relay  Short to voltage on FP voltage supply circuit or feedback circuit  Short to ground on PCM  FP relay control circuit PCM  FP relay control driver shorted to ground internally', '  Bad FP relay  Short to voltage on FP voltage supply circuit or feedback circuit  Short to ground on PCM  FP relay control circuit PCM  FP relay control driver shorted to ground internally', 'It is possible with a P0232 for the fuel pump to be running continuously, even with the ignition off. If that's the case and you can hear the fuel pump running, you may be able to disregard some of the following checks. Turn the KOEO (key on engine off) and wait for a few seconds. This allows the PCM to complete it's fuel pump pre-cycle. Now, using your scan tool (if you have one) observe the FP VOLTAGE FEEDBACK reading in the datastream. This reading indicates what kind of voltage the fuel pump is receiving.If you don't have access to a scan tool, use a voltmeter to read the FP voltage at the fuel tank. If your reading shows any voltage at all present to the fuel pump with KOEO (or if you can hear the pump running), remove the FP relay. If the voltage remains, or the fuel pump continues to run, then there is a short to voltage on the FP voltage supply circuit or on the feedback circuit. Repair as necessary. If the voltage disappears (or the pump quits running) with the FP relay removed then try replacing the relay with a spare one. Upon reinstalling the spare relay, if the voltage disappears, the relay was faulty due to a short. If, though, after replacing the relay voltage is still present, suspect that the PCM FP relay control circuit is shorted to ground.Check for a short to ground on the PCM FP relay control (ground driver) circuit by removing the FP relay and ohm between a good ground and the PCM FP relay control. There should be no continuity to ground with KOEO (after the FP pre-cycle is completed). If there is continuity to ground the wire is shorted. Find the short to ground and repair as necessary. If you can find no physical short, It may be necessary to snip the FP relay control wire close to the PCM connector where it will be easy to repair and check for continuity to ground with KOEO coming OUT of the PCM. If there is no continuity the wire is shorted in the harness. But if continuity exists, the driver may be internally shorted to ground and the PCM may require replacement.', ''
82', 'P0234', 'P0234 Turbocharger / Supercharger "A" Overboost Condition Code', 'Turbocharger / Supercharger "A" Overboost Condition', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.Trouble code P0234 indicates the powertrain control module (PCM) senses a dangerously high boost pressure from the engine's forced induction system. Levels of boost in excess of recommended levels can compromise the structural integrity of the engine.Normally, an engine relies on the vacuum produced by the downward movement of the piston to draw the air and fuel charge into the engine. A supercharger or turbocharger is an air compressor used to increase the air and fuel charge entering the engine. This is known as &quot;forced induction&quot; which allows a much smaller fuel-efficient engine to create the power normally available with a much larger engine.The mechanical apparatus used in forced induction is divided into three categories, positive displacement (roots style), centrifugal and turbo. The roots style and centrifugal chargers are belt driven while the turbo relies on pressure from the exhaust to operate.A roots or positive displacement supercharger is positioned on the top of the intake. A centrifugal looks much like a rotary air conditioning compressor and is located on the driver's side front of the engine. Turbochargers are located in line with the exhaust system.As boost pressure rises, the stress on the engine increases as well. Your engine has recommended boost pressure limits to preclude the possibility of engine component failure. Code P0234 is set when these limits are breached and should be corrected as soon as possible to prevent engine or transmission damage.Turbo chargers rely on exhaust pressure to spin the turbine blades fast enough to produce air pressure greater than atmospheric. However they have an inherent lag where the exhaust pressure is insufficient to spin the turbo fast enough to create pressure. Depending on the type of unit used, the turbo needs 1700 to 2500 engine rpm before it begins to &quot;spool up.&quot;Turbos spin around 250,000 rpm in full boost. Boost pressure increases with engine rpm. To regulate the boost pressure and prevent overboost, a wastegate valve is installed. Most modern turbos have an internal wastegate and external actuator. There is a rod from the actuator to the wastegate on the turbo. Intake manifold air pressure passes to the top of the wastegate. As boost pressure increases it begins to exert force on the spring in the actuator that holds the wastegate valve closed. The higher the pressure rises, the more it overpowers the spring, resulting in the wastegate opening and directing exhaust gas away from the turbo blades and preventing further increase in boost.Regulation of the pressure applied to the wastegate regulates the boost levels at specific rpm. To accomplish this, the computer uses barometric or MAP sensors, engine and transmission temperature sensors, knock sensors and intake pressure sensors to determine the amount of wastegate opening necessary to deliver the best boost levels.To regulate boost levels, the computer uses either a solenoid, stepper motor or pulse modulator. By regulating the pressure to the wastegate actuator, varying degrees of boost are possible.', 'The symptoms displayed for a P0234 code will depend on the cause of the overboost condition:  The service engine soon or check engine light will illuminate.  You will experience a loss of power.  The engine may show signs of overheating.  The transmission may show signs of overheating and harsh shifting.  Additional codes associated with the condition set by P0234 may be present to help identify the cause. Codes are available for all electrical components utilized by the engine management computer for the control of boost levels.  The engine may display signs of pre-ignition in the form of knocking.  The engine may display ignition misfiring.', '  The service engine soon or check engine light will illuminate.  You will experience a loss of power.  The engine may show signs of overheating.  The transmission may show signs of overheating and harsh shifting.  Additional codes associated with the condition set by P0234 may be present to help identify the cause. Codes are available for all electrical components utilized by the engine management computer for the control of boost levels.  The engine may display signs of pre-ignition in the form of knocking.  The engine may display ignition misfiring.', '', '', '', ''
83', 'P0300', 'P0300 Diagnostic Code - Random Misfire', 'Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', 'Basically this means that the the car's computer has detected that not all  of the engine's cylinders are firing properly.A P0300 diagnostic code indicates a random or multiple misfire. If the last digit   is a number other than zero, it corresponds to the cylinder number that is misfiring.   A P0302 code, for example, would tell you cylinder number two is misfiring.   Unfortunately, a P0300 doesn't tell you specifically which cylinder(s) is/are   mis-firing, nor why.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0300 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plugs or wires  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector(s)  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Stuck/blocked/leaking EGR valve / passages  Faulty camshaft position sensor  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plugs or wires  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector(s)  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Stuck/blocked/leaking EGR valve / passages  Faulty camshaft position sensor  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Random misfires that jump around from one cylinder to another (read: P030x  codes) also will set a P0300 code. The underlying cause is often  a lean fuel  condition,  which may be due to a vacuum leak in the intake manifold or unmetered air gettingpast the airflow sensor, or an EGR valve that is stuck open.It is helpful to have access to a factory service manual and an advanced scan tool to properly diagnose a random misfire DTC.P0300 Diagnostics VideoHere is a helpful video that may assist you in learning more, diagnosing, and repairing your P0300 DTC. This video is intended for auto repair professionals but could be helpful to DIYers. It shows use of an advanced OBD-II scan tool during diagnostic steps:Other P0300 ReadingFaqFarm.com', ''
84', 'P0301', 'P0301 Code - Cylinder #1 Misfire', 'Cylinder #1 Misfire Detected', 'A P0301 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder #1.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0301 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 - Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
85', 'P0302', 'P0302 Code - Cylinder #2 Misfire', 'Cylinder #2 Misfire Detected', 'A P0302 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#2.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0302 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
86', 'P0303', 'P0303 Code - Cylinder #3 Misfire', 'Cylinder #3 Misfire Detected', 'A P0303 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#3.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0303 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
87', 'P0304', 'P0304 Code - Cylinder #4 Misfire', 'Cylinder #4 Misfire Detected', 'A P0304 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#4.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0304 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
88', 'P0305', 'P0305 Code - Cylinder #5 Misfire', 'Cylinder #5 Misfire Detected', 'A P0305 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#5.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0305 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
89', 'P0306', 'P0306 Code - Cylinder #6 Misfire', 'Cylinder #6 Misfire Detected', 'A P0306 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#6.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0306 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
90', 'P0307', 'P0307 Code - Cylinder #7 Misfire', 'Cylinder #7 Misfire Detected', 'A P0307 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#7.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0307 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
91', 'P0308', 'P0308 Code - Cylinder #8 Misfire', 'Cylinder #8 Misfire Detected', 'A P0308 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#8.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0308 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
92', 'P0309', 'P0309 Code - Cylinder #9 Misfire', 'Cylinder #9 Misfire Detected', 'A P0309 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#9.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0309 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
93', 'P0310', 'P0310 Code - Cylinder #10 Misfire', 'Cylinder #10 Misfire Detected', 'A P0310 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#10.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0310 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
94', 'P0311', 'P0311 Code - Cylinder #11 Misfire', 'Cylinder #11 Misfire Detected', 'A P0311 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#11.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0311 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
95', 'P0312', 'P0312 Code - Cylinder #12 Misfire', 'Cylinder #12 Misfire Detected', 'A P0312 code means that the the car's computer has detected  that one of the engine's cylinders is not firing properly. In this case it's  cylinder#12.', 'Symptoms may include:   the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', '  the engine may be harder to start  the engine may stumble / stumble, and/or hesitate  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0312 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', '  Faulty spark plug or wire  Faulty coil (pack)  Faulty oxygen sensor(s)  Faulty fuel injector  Burned exhaust valve  Faulty catalytic converter(s)  Running out of fuel  Poor compression  Defective computer', 'If there are no symptoms, the simplest thing to do is to reset the code and  see if it comes back.If there are symptoms such as the engine is stumbling or hesitating, check  all wiring and connectors that lead to the cylinders (i.e. spark plugs). Depending  on how long the ignition components have been in the car, it may be a good  idea to replace them as part of your regular maintenance schedule. I would  suggest spark plugs, spark plug wires, distributor cap, and rotor (if applicable).  Otherwise, check the coils (a.k.a. coil packs). In some cases, the catalytic  converter has gone bad. If you smell rotten eggs in the exhaust, your cat converter  needs to be replaced. I've also heard in other cases the problems were faulty  fuel injectors.Other ReadingP0300 -    Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected', ''
96', 'P0325', 'P0325 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Knock Sensor Circuit Malfunction', 'A knock sensor tells the engine computer   when one or more of your engine's cylinders are &quot;knocking&quot;, that is,   exploding the air/fuel mixture in a way that delivers less power and can be   damaging to the engine if prolonged.The computer uses this information to tune   the engine so that it doesn't knock. If your knock     sensor wasn't operating properly, so that it was always indicating a knock,   the engine computer's response may have been to change the ignition timing on   your engine. Knock sensors generally bolt   into or thread into the engine block. This P0325 code may show   up intermittently or the Service Engine light may be lit constantly. Other knock sensor related DTC codes include P0330.', 'You may notice drivability problems including a lack of power and perhaps some   hesitation. There may also be other symptoms.', '', 'A code P0325 most likely means one or more of the following   has happened:  The knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit', '  The knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit', '  Check the resistance of the knock sensor     (compare it to factory specs)Check for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensor  Replace the knock sensorSources: W.   Farmer - Nissan', '  Check the resistance of the knock sensor     (compare it to factory specs)Check for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensor  Replace the knock sensor'
97', 'P0326', 'P0326 Knock Sensor Circuit Voltage', 'Knock Sensor 1 Circuit Range/Performance (Bank 1 or Single Sensor) High Voltage', 'Knock sensors are used to detect engine pre-detonation (engine knock or ping). The knock sensor (KS) is usually a two wire sensor. A 5 volt reference is supplied to the sensor and there is a signal return from the knock sensor to the PCM (powertrain control module).The sensor signal wire informs the PCM when a knock occurs and in what degree of severity. The PCM will retard the spark timing to avoid pre-detonation. Most PCMs have the ability to learn spark knock trends in the engine during normal operation.If the PCM determines that the knock is out of the ordinary or that the noise level is abnormally high, P0326 may set. If the PCM senses that the knock is severe and cannot be eliminated by retarding the spark timing, P0326 may set. Keep in mind that knock sensors cannot distinguish between a knock from pre-detonation or one from engine problems. ', 'Symptoms of a P0326 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration', 'Potential causes of a P0326 code include:  Knock sensor connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Moisture in knock sensor connectors  Incorrect fuel octane  PCM has failed', '  Knock sensor connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Moisture in knock sensor connectors  Incorrect fuel octane  PCM has failed', 'If an engine knock can be heard, fix the source of the mechanical problem first then retest. Make sure the proper octane of fuel was used in the engine. Using lower octane fuel than what is specified can cause a ping or pre-detonation and may cause P0326.Unplug the knock sensor and check for water or corrosion in the connector. If the knock sensor has a seal, verify there is no coolant from the engine block fouling the sensor. Repair as necessary.Turn ignition to run position with engine off. Ensure that 5 Volts are present at the KS connector. If there is, check for proper resistance between KS terminal and engine ground. You will need a vehicle specification for this. If resistance is out of specification, replace the knock sensor. If resistance is normal, plug KS back in and idle the engine. Using a scan tool in datastream, observe KS value. Does it indicate a knock is present at idle? If so, replace the knock sensor. If the knock sensor shows no knock at idle, then tap on the engine block while observing the knock signal. If it doesn't show a signal that corresponds with the taps, replace the knock sensor. If it does, verify the knock sensor wiring isn't routed next to ignition wires. If there was no 5 volts present at the knock sensor connector while unplugged with KOEO (Key on engine off) then go back to the PCM connector. Turn ignition off and clip the knock sensor 5 volt reference wire in a location that is easy to repair (Or remove the wire from the PCM connector). With KOEO, check for 5 volts on the PCM side of the clipped wire. If 5 volts isn't present, suspect a bad PCM. If 5 volts IS present, repair short in 5 volt reference circuit.Since the reference circuit is a shared circuit, you will need to check all engine sensors that are fed a 5 volt reference. Unplug each sensor one at a time until the reference voltage returns. When it returns the last sensor you plugged in is the shorted sensor. If no sensors are shorted, check the wiring harness for short to voltage on reference circuit.', ''
98', 'P0327', 'P0327 Knock Sensor DTC Code', 'Knock Sensor 1 Circuit Low Input (Bank 1 or Single Sensor)', 'A knock sensor tells the engine computer   when one or more of your engine's cylinders are &quot;knocking&quot;, that is,   exploding the air/fuel mixture in a way that delivers less power and can be   damaging to the engine if prolonged.The computer uses this information to tune   the engine so that it doesn't knock. If your knock   sensor on Bank #1 is generating a low output voltage (perhaps under 0.5V), then it will trigger a P0327 DTC. This P0327 code may show   up intermittently or the Service Engine light may be lit constantly. Other knock sensor related DTC codes include P0325, P0326, P0328, P0329, P0330, P0331, P0332, P0333, and P0334.', 'You may notice drivability problems including fluctation engine RPM, a loss of power, and perhaps some   hesitation. There may also be other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes for a P0327 DTC include (but are not limited to):  The knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring open/short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit  The PCM/ECM has failed', '  The knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring open/short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit  The PCM/ECM has failed', '  Verify the resistance of the knock sensor     (compare it to factory specs)Inspect for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensorCheck the wiring and connections leading to/from the knock sensor and PCM/ECMVerify proper voltage is reaching the knock sensor (e.g. 5 volts)Verify proper grounding of sensor and circuitReplace the knock sensor  Replace the PCM/ECM', '  Verify the resistance of the knock sensor     (compare it to factory specs)Inspect for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensorCheck the wiring and connections leading to/from the knock sensor and PCM/ECMVerify proper voltage is reaching the knock sensor (e.g. 5 volts)Verify proper grounding of sensor and circuitReplace the knock sensor  Replace the PCM/ECM'
99', 'P0328', 'P0328 Knock Sensor Circuit High Input', 'Knock Sensor 1 Circuit High Input (Bank 1 or Single Sensor)', 'Knock sensors are used to detect engine pre-detonation (engine knock or ping). The knock sensor (KS) is usually a two wire sensor. A 5 volt reference is supplied to the sensor and there is a signal return from the knock sensor to the PCM (powertrain control module).The sensor signal wire informs the PCM when a knock occurs and in what degree of severity. The PCM will retard the spark timing to avoid pre-detonation. Most PCMs have the ability to learn spark knock trends in the engine during normal operation.A P0328 code is a generic DTC, thus it applies to all makes of vehicles, and refers to a high output voltage of the knock sensor. In many cases, this means the voltage is above 4.5V but that specific value depends on the specific make and model of vehicle. This code refers to the sensor on bank #1.', 'Symptoms of a P0328 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration  Loss of power  Irregular RPM', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration  Loss of power  Irregular RPM', 'Potential causes of a P0328 code include:  Knock sensor connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Loose knock sensor  Electrical interference in circuit  Low fuel pressure  Incorrect fuel octane  Mechanical engine problem  Failed/faulty PCM', '  Knock sensor connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Loose knock sensor  Electrical interference in circuit  Low fuel pressure  Incorrect fuel octane  Mechanical engine problem  Failed/faulty PCM', 'If you can hear engine knock (detonation), first fix the source of the mechanical problem and retest. Ensure the correct octane fuel was used (some engines require premium fuel, check the owners manual). Aside from that, for this code, most likely the problem will lie either with the knock sensor itself or the wiring &amp; connectors going from the sensor to the PCM.Realisitcally, for the DIY vehicle owner, the best next steps are to measure the resistance between the two knock sensor wire terminals where they go into the PCM. Also, check the voltage of the same terminals. Compare those numbers to the manufacturer's specifications. Also, check all wiring and connectors leading from the knock sensor back to the PCM. In addition, you should also check the resistance using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) of the knock sensor itself, compare it to the vehicle manufacturers specification. If the knock sensor resistance value is out of spec, then it needs to be replaced.Other knock sensor DTCs include P0324, P0325, P0326, P0327, P0328, P0329, P0330, P0331, P0332, P0334', ''
100', 'P0330', 'P0330 - Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2)', 'Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2)', 'A knock sensor tells the engine computer   when one or more of your engine's cylinders are &quot;knocking&quot;, that is,   exploding the air/fuel mixture in a way that delivers less power and can be   damaging to the engine if prolonged. The computer uses this information to tune   the engine so that it doesn't knock. If your knock   sensor wasn't operating properly, so that it was always indicating a knock,   the engine computer's response may have been to change the ignition timing on   your engine. Knock sensors generally bolt   into or thread into the engine block. This P0330 code may show   up intermittently or the Service Engine light may be lit constantly. Other knock sensor related DTC codes include P0325.', 'You may notice drivability problems including a lack of power and perhaps some   hesitation. There may also be other symptoms.', '', 'A code P0330 most likely means one or more of the following   has happened:  The &quot;B&quot;  knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit', '  The &quot;B&quot;  knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit', '  Check the resistance of the knock sensor on bank 2     (compare it to factory specs)Check for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensor  Replace the knock sensor on bank 2Sources: W.   Farmer - Nissan', '  Check the resistance of the knock sensor on bank 2     (compare it to factory specs)Check for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensor  Replace the knock sensor on bank 2'
101', 'P0331', 'P0331 Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Range/Performance', 'Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Range/Performance (Bank 2)', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.Knock sensors are used to detect engine pre-detonation (engine knock or ping). The knock sensor (KS) is usually a two wire sensor. A 5 volt reference is supplied to the sensor and there is a signal return from the knock sensor to the PCM (powertrain control module). The sensor signal wire informs the PCM when a knock occurs and in what degree of severity. The PCM will retard the spark timing to avoid pre-detonation. Most PCMs have the ability to learn spark knock trends in the engine during normal operation.If the PCM determines that the knock is out of the ordinary or that the noise level is abnormally high, P0331 may set. If the PCM senses that the knock is severe and cannot be eliminated by retarding the spark timing, P0331 may set. Keep in mind that knock sensors cannot distinguish between a knock from pre-detonation or one from engine problems. Bank 2 is the side of the engine that doesn't contain cylinder #1.', 'Symptoms of a P0331 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration', 'Potential causes of a P0331 code include:  Knock sensor (KS) connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Moisture in knock sensor connectors  Incorrect fuel octane  PCM has failed', '  Knock sensor (KS) connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Moisture in knock sensor connectors  Incorrect fuel octane  PCM has failed', 'If an engine knock can be heard, fix the source of the mechanical problem first then retest. Make sure the proper octane of fuel was used in the engine. Using lower octane fuel than what is specified can cause a ping or pre-detonation and may cause P0331.Unplug the knock sensor and check for water or corrosion in the connector. If the knock sensor has a seal, verify there is no coolant from the engine block fouling the sensor. Repair as necessary.Turn ignition to run position with engine off. Ensure that 5 Volts are present at the KS connector. If there is, check for proper resistance between KS terminal and engine ground. You will need a vehicle specification for this. If resistance is out of specification, replace the knock sensor. If resistance is normal, plug KS back in and idle the engine. Using a scan tool in datastream, observe KS value. Does it indicate a knock is present at idle? If so, replace the knock sensor. If the knock sensor shows no knock at idle, then tap on the engine block while observing the knock signal. If it doesn't show a signal that corresponds with the taps, replace the knock sensor. If it does, verify the knock sensor wiring isn't routed next to ignition wires. If there was no 5 volts present at the knock sensor connector while unplugged with KOEO (Key on engine off) then go back to the PCM connector. Turn ignition off and clip the knock sensor 5 volt reference wire in a location that is easy to repair (Or remove the wire from the PCM connector). With KOEO, check for 5 volts on the PCM side of the clipped wire. If 5 volts isn't present, suspect a bad PCM. If 5 volts IS present, repair short in 5 volt reference circuit.Since the reference circuit is a shared circuit, you will need to check all engine sensors that are fed a 5 volt reference. Unplug each sensor one at a time until the reference voltage returns. When it returns the last sensor you plugged in is the shorted sensor. If no sensors are shorted, check the wiring harness for short to voltage on reference circuit.', ''
102', 'P0332', 'P0332 DTC Code', 'Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Low Input (Bank 2)', 'A knock sensor tells the engine computer   when one or more of your engine's cylinders are &quot;knocking&quot;, that is,   exploding the air/fuel mixture in a way that delivers less power and can be   damaging to the engine if prolonged.The computer uses this information to tune   the engine so that it doesn't knock. If your knock   sensor on Bank #2 is generating a low output voltage (perhaps under 0.5V), then it will trigger a P0332 DTC. This P0332 code may show   up intermittently or the Service Engine light may be lit constantly. Other knock sensor related DTC codes include P0325, P0326, P0327, P0328, P0329, P0330, P0331, P0333, and P0334.', 'You may notice drivability problems including fluctation engine RPM, a loss of power, and perhaps some   hesitation. There may also be other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes for a P0332 DTC include (but are not limited to):  The knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring open/short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit  The PCM/ECM has failed', '  The knock sensor is faulty and needs to     be replaced  There is a wiring open/short/fault in the knock     sensor circuit  The PCM/ECM has failed', '  Verify the resistance of the knock sensor     (compare it to factory specs)Inspect for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensorCheck the wiring and connections leading to/from the knock sensor and PCM/ECMVerify proper voltage is reaching the knock sensor (e.g. 5 volts)Verify proper grounding of sensor and circuitReplace the knock sensor  Replace the PCM/ECM', '  Verify the resistance of the knock sensor     (compare it to factory specs)Inspect for broken/frayed wires leading to the sensorCheck the wiring and connections leading to/from the knock sensor and PCM/ECMVerify proper voltage is reaching the knock sensor (e.g. 5 volts)Verify proper grounding of sensor and circuitReplace the knock sensor  Replace the PCM/ECM'
103', 'P0333', 'P0333 Knock Sensor 2 Circuit High Input', 'Knock Sensor 2 Circuit High Input (Bank 2)', 'Knock sensors are used to detect engine pre-detonation (engine knock or ping).The knock sensor (KS) is usually a two wire sensor. A 5 volt reference is supplied to the sensor and there is a signal return from the knock sensor to the PCM (powertrain control module). The sensor signal wire informs the PCM when a knock occurs and in what degree of severity. The PCM will retard the spark timing to avoid pre-detonation. Most PCMs have the ability to learn spark knock trends in the engine during normal operation.A P0333 code is a generic DTC, thus it applies to all makes of vehicles, and refers to a high output voltage of the knock sensor. In many cases, this means the voltage is above 4.5V but that specific value depends on the specific make and model of vehicle. This code refers to the sensor on bank #2 (the side of the engine that doesn't contain cylinder #1).', 'Symptoms of a P0333 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration  Loss of power  Irregular RPM', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Audible knocking from the engine compartment  Pinging from engine under acceleration  Loss of power  Irregular RPM', 'Potential causes of a P0333 code include:  Knock sensor connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Loose knock sensor  Electrical interference in circuit  Low fuel pressure  Incorrect fuel octane  Mechanical engine problem  Failed/faulty PCM', '  Knock sensor connector is damaged  Knock sensor circuit is open or shorted to ground  Knock sensor circuit is shorted to voltage  Knock sensor has failed  Loose knock sensor  Electrical interference in circuit  Low fuel pressure  Incorrect fuel octane  Mechanical engine problem  Failed/faulty PCM', 'If you can hear engine knock (detonation), first fix the source of the mechanical problem and retest. Ensure the correct octane fuel was used (some engines require premium fuel, check the owners manual). Aside from that, for this code, most likely the problem will lie either with the knock sensor itself or the wiring &amp; connectors going from the sensor to the PCM.Realisitcally, for the DIY vehicle owner, the best next steps are to measure the resistance between the two knock sensor wire terminals where they go into the PCM. Also, check the voltage of the same terminals. Compare those numbers to the manufacturer's specifications. Also, check all wiring and connectors leading from the knock sensor back to the PCM. In addition, you should also check the resistance using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) of the knock sensor itself, compare it to the vehicle manufacturers specification. If the knock sensor resistance value is out of spec, then it needs to be replaced.Other knock sensor DTCs include P0324, P0325, P0326, P0327, P0329, P0330, P0331, P0332, P0333, P0334', ''
104', 'P0335', 'P0335 - Crankshaft Position Sensor A Circuit Malfunction', 'Crankshaft Position Sensor A Circuit Malfunction', 'The crankshaft position sensor (CKP) measures crankshaft location and relays this information to the PCM (Powertrain Control Module).Depending on the vehicle, the PCM uses this crankshaft position information to time the spark properly or on some systems it is only for misfire detection and does not control spark timing.  The CKP sensor is stationary and works in harmony with a reluctor ring (or toothed ring) that is attached to the crankshaft.  As this reluctor ring passes in front of the CKP sensor, the magnetic field created by the CKP sensor is interrupted and this creates a square wave voltage signal that the PCM interprets as crankshaft position.  If the PCM detects that there are no crankshaft pulses or if it sees a problem with the pulses on the output circuit, P0335 will set. ', 'NOTE:  If the crank sensor is used only for misfire detection and NOT spark timing (this varies with the vehicle), the vehicle should start and run with MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination.  Also, some vehicles require several key cycles to illuminate the MIL.  If this is the case, there may be no MIL illumination until the problem often enough over time.  If the crank sensor is used for BOTH misfire detection and spark timing, the vehicle may or may not start.   Symptoms may include:  Vehicle may not start (see above)  Vehicle may run rough or misfire  MIL illumination', '  Vehicle may not start (see above)  Vehicle may run rough or misfire  MIL illumination', 'A P0335 &quot;check engine light&quot; code could be caused by:  Damaged CKP sensor connector  Damaged reluctor ring (missing teeth or not turning due to sheared-off keyway)  Sensor output open  Sensor output shorted to ground  Sensor output shorted to voltage  Failed crank sensor  Broken timing belt  Failed PCM', '  Damaged CKP sensor connector  Damaged reluctor ring (missing teeth or not turning due to sheared-off keyway)  Sensor output open  Sensor output shorted to ground  Sensor output shorted to voltage  Failed crank sensor  Broken timing belt  Failed PCM', '  Using a scan tool, check if, when engine is running or cranking, that there is an RPM signal.  If there is no RPM reading, then visually inspect the crank sensor and connector for any damage and repair as necessary.  If there is no visible damage, and you have access to a scope, you could check the CKP 5 Volt square wave pattern.  If you do not, then, obtain a resistance reading of your crank sensor from a repair manual.  (There are so many different types of crank sensors that there's no way to put here which resistance reading is correct).  Then check the resistance of the CKP sensor by disconnecting the sensor and measuring resistance of the sensor.  (It is best to check resistance readings from the PCM connector.  This rules out any wiring problems from the start.  But it does require some mechanical skill and shouldn't be performed if you're not familiar with automobile electrical systems).  Is the sensor within resistance specs?   If not, replace the CKP sensor.  If so, recheck resistance reading from the PCM connector.  Is the reading still okay?   If not, repair open or short in the wiring to the crank sensor and re-check.  If the reading is okay, the problem is intermittent or the PCM may be at fault.  Try reconnecting and checking for RPM signal again.  If there is now an RPM signal, wiggle test the wiring harness to try and induce the fault. This code is basically identical to P0385. This code P0335 refers to Crankshaft Posistion Sensor &quot;A&quot;, whereas P0385 refers to Crankshaft Position Sensor &quot;B&quot;.  Other crank sensor codes include P0016, P0017, P0018, P0019, P0335, P0336, P0337, P0338, P0339, P0385, P0386, P0387, P0388, and P0389.', ''
105', 'P0336', 'P0336 Crankshaft Position Sensor Range/Performance', 'Crankshaft Position Sensor A Circuit Range/Performance', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The crankshaft position sensor (CKP) is usually a two wire sensor: a signal and a ground. The CKP sensor consists of (usually) a permanent magnent sensor that is mounted in front of a reluctor (toothed) wheel mounted to the crankshaft.As the reluctor wheel passes in front of the crank sensor, an A/C signal is produced that varies according to engine speed. The PCM (powertrain control module) uses this A/C signal to interpret engine RPM. Some crank sensors are hall-effect sensors instead of permanent magnent sensors. These are three wire sensors, provided with voltage, ground, and signal. They too have a reluctor wheel with vanes and &quot;windows&quot; that change the voltage signal to the PCM, providing a RPM signal. I will focus on the former, since they are simpler design and more common.The crankshaft reluctor has a specific number of teeth and the PCM can determine the position of the crankshaft using only this sensor's signature pattern. The PCM uses this sensor to also determine cylinder misfires by measuring the reluctor teeth locations in the CKP sensor signal. In conjunction with the Camshaft position sensor (CMP) the PCM can determine timing of spark and fuel injection. If the PCM senses a loss of CKP sensor signal (RPM signal) even momentarily, P0336 may set.', 'Symptoms of a P0336 DTC may include:  Intermittent stalling &amp; no start  No start  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Intermittent misfire', '  Intermittent stalling &amp; no start  No start  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Intermittent misfire', 'Potential causes of a P0336 code include:  Bad crank sensor  Broken reluctor ring (missing teeth, debris lodged in ring)  Reluctor ring dislodged/stripped from it's stationary location  Wiring harness chafing causing short  Wiring open in CKP circuit', '  Bad crank sensor  Broken reluctor ring (missing teeth, debris lodged in ring)  Reluctor ring dislodged/stripped from it's stationary location  Wiring harness chafing causing short  Wiring open in CKP circuit', 'Crankshaft sensor problems are at times intermittent and the vehicle may start and run for some time until problem occurs. Try to reproduce the complaint. When engine stalls or if the engine will not start and continue to run, then crank engine while observing RPM reading. If there is no RPM reading, check for a signal coming out of the crank sensor. Using a scope is best, but since most DIYers don't have access to one you may be able to use a code reader or the tachometer to check for RPM signal.Visually check the CKP harness for damage or cracking in the wiring insulation. Repair as necessary. Make sure the wiring isn't mis-routed near high voltage spark plug wires. Check for loose connection or broken lock at the sensor connector. Repair as necessary. Obtain a resistance spec for the Crank sensor. Remove and check it. If it doesn't pass, replace it. If it checks out okay, check the reluctor ring for damage, broken teeth, or debris lodged in the ring. Make sure the reluctor ring isn't dislodged. It should be stationary on the crankshaft. Carefully repair/replace as necessary. Note: some reluctor rings are located in the bell housing of the transmission or behind the front engine cover and cannot be easily accessed.If the vehicle intermittently stalls and after stalling you have no RPM signal and you have verified the wiring to the CKP sensor is good, then try replacing the sensor. If that doesn't take care of it, and you can't access the reluctor ring, seek help from an automotive professional.', ''
106', 'P0340', 'P0340 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Camshaft Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction', 'This indicates that a problem was detected in the camshaft position sensor   circuit.Since it says circuit, that means the problem could   lie in any part of the circuit - the sensor itself, the wiring, or the PCM.   Don't just replace the CPS (camshaft position sensor) and think that will definitely   fix it.', 'Symptoms can include:  Hard starting or no start  Rough running / misfiring  Loss of engine power', '  Hard starting or no start  Rough running / misfiring  Loss of engine power', 'A code P0340 could mean one or more of the following has happened:   a wire or connector in the circuit could be grounded/shorted/broken  the camshaft position sensor may have failed  the PCM may have failed  there exists an open circuit  the crankshaft position sensor may have failed', '   a wire or connector in the circuit could be grounded/shorted/broken  the camshaft position sensor may have failed  the PCM may have failed  there exists an open circuit  the crankshaft position sensor may have failed', 'With a P0340 OBD-II trouble code, diagnosis can be tricky at times. Here  are some things to try:  Visually inspect all the wiring and connectors in the circuit  Check for continuity in the circuit wiring  Check the operation (voltage) of the camshaft position sensor  Replace the camshaft position sensor as required  Check the crankshaft position circuit as well  Replace circuit wiring and/or connectors as required  Diagnose/replace the PCM as required', '  Visually inspect all the wiring and connectors in the circuit  Check for continuity in the circuit wiring  Check the operation (voltage) of the camshaft position sensor  Replace the camshaft position sensor as required  Check the crankshaft position circuit as well  Replace circuit wiring and/or connectors as required  Diagnose/replace the PCM as required'
107', 'P0341', 'P0341 - Camshaft Position Sensor Circuit Range/Performance', 'Camshaft Position Sensor Circuit Range/Performance', 'This P0341 code basically means that the powertrain control module (PCM) detected   a problem with the camshaft signal.The camshaft position sensor (CPS) sends   a specific signal to the PCM for Top Dead Center on the compression stroke as   well as signals indicating the position of the cam sensor. This is accomplished   through a reluctor wheel attached to the camshaft that passes by the cam sensor.   Any time that the signal to the PCM is inconsistent with what the signal should   be, this code is set. NOTE: this code can also be set by extended cranking periods.', 'The car will likely run with this code set, as it is often intermittent and   also because the PCM can often operate the vehicle in &quot;limp-in/limp-home&quot;   mode even with a cam sensor signal problem. There may be no noticeable symptoms   other than:   Poor fuel economy (if engine runs)  Possible no start condition ', '   Poor fuel economy (if engine runs)  Possible no start condition ', 'A code P0341 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:   Cam sensor wiring routed too close to spark plug wiring (causing interference)   Poor wiring connection at cam sensor   Poor wiring connection at PCM   Bad cam sensor   Damaged reluctor wheel', '   Cam sensor wiring routed too close to spark plug wiring (causing interference)   Poor wiring connection at cam sensor   Poor wiring connection at PCM   Bad cam sensor   Damaged reluctor wheel', 'Often relacing the sensor fixes this code, but not necessarily. Therefore it's   important to check the following:  Check that the wiring isn't routed too close to any secondary ignition components     (coil, spark plug wires, etc.)   Visually inspect the wiring at the sensor for any burn marks, discoloration     indicative of melting or chafing   Visually inspect the cam sensor for damage   Visually inspect the reluctor wheel through the cam sensor port (if possible)     for any missing teeth or any damage   If reluctor isn't visible from outside the engine, visual test can only     be done by removing cam shaft or intake manifold (depending on engine design)   If all checks out okay, then replace the sensor.Related Camshaft Trouble Codes: P0340', '  Check that the wiring isn't routed too close to any secondary ignition components     (coil, spark plug wires, etc.)   Visually inspect the wiring at the sensor for any burn marks, discoloration     indicative of melting or chafing   Visually inspect the cam sensor for damage   Visually inspect the reluctor wheel through the cam sensor port (if possible)     for any missing teeth or any damage   If reluctor isn't visible from outside the engine, visual test can only     be done by removing cam shaft or intake manifold (depending on engine design)   If all checks out okay, then replace the sensor.'
108', 'P0351', 'P0351 Ignition Coil A Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil A Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil number 1, a P0351 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0351 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0351 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #1 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #1 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #1 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #1 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0351 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
109', 'P0352', 'P0352 Ignition Coil B Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil B Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil number 2, a P0352 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0352 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0352 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #2 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #2 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #2 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #2 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0352 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
110', 'P0353', 'P0353 Ignition Coil C Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil C Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil number 3, a P0353 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0353 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0353 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #3 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #3 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #3 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #3 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0353 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
111', 'P0354', 'P0354 Ignition Coil D Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil D Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module) It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #4, a P0354 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0354 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0354 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #4 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #4 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #4 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #4 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0354 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
112', 'P0355', 'P0355 Ignition Coil E Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil E Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #5, a P0355 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0355 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0355 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #5 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #5 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #5 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #5 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0355 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
113', 'P0356', 'P0356 Ignition Coil F Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil F Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #6, a P0356 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0356 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0356 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #6 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #6 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #6 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #6 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0356 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
114', 'P0357', 'P0357 Ignition Coil G Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil G Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module) It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #7, a P0357 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0357 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0357 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #7 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #7 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #7 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #7 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0357 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
115', 'P0358', 'P0358 Ignition Coil H Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil H Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module) It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #8, a P0358 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0358 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0358 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #8 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #8 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #8 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #8 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0358 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
116', 'P0359', 'P0359 Ignition Coil I Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil I Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #9, a P0359 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0359 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0359 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #9 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #9 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #9 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #9 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0359 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
117', 'P0360', 'P0360 Ignition Coil J Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil J Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module) It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #10, a P0360 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0360 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0360 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #10 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #10 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #10 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #10 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0360 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
118', 'P0361', 'P0361 Ignition Coil K Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil K Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #11, a P0361 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0361 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0361 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #11 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #11 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #11 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #11 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0361 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
119', 'P0362', 'P0362 Ignition Coil L Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'Ignition Coil L Primary/Secondary Circuit Malfunction', 'The COP (coil on plug) ignition system is what is used on most modern engines. There is an individual coil for each cylinder that is controlled by the PCM (powertrain control module).It eliminates the need for spark plug wires by putting the coil right above the sparkplug. Two wires are dedicated to each coil. One is a battery feed usually from the power distribution center. The other wire is the coil driver circuit from the PCM. The PCM grounds/ungrounds this circuit to activate or deactivate the coil. The coil driver circuit is monitored by the PCM for faults If an open or a short is detected in the driver circuit for coil #12, a P0362 may set. Also, depending on the vehicle, the PCM may also shut down the fuel injector to the cylinder also.', 'Symptoms of a P0362 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Engine misfire may be present or intermittent', 'Potential causes of a P0362 code include:  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', '  Short to voltage or ground on COP driver circuit  Open on COP driver circuit  Loose connection at coil or broken connector locks  Bad Coil (COP)  Faulty Powertrain Control Module', 'Is the engine misfiring presently? If not, the problem is likely intermittent. Try wiggle testing the wiring at the #12 coil and along the wiring harness to the PCM. If manipulating the wiring causes the misfire to surface, repair the wiring problem. Check for poor connection at the coil connector. Verify the harness isn't misrouted or chafing on anything. Repair as necessary If the engine is misfiring presently, stop the engine and disconnect the #12 coil wiring connector. Then start the engine and check for a driver signal to the #12 coil. Using a scope will give you a visual pattern to observe, but since most people don't have access to one there's an easier way. Use a Voltmeter in AC Hertz scale and see if there's a Hz reading of between 5 and 20 or so that indicates the driver is working. If there is a Hertz signal, then replace the #12 ignition coil. It's likely bad. If you don't detect any frequency signal from the PCM on the ignition coil driver circuit indicating the PCM is grounding/ungrounding the circuit (or there is no visible pattern on the scope if you have one) then leave the coil disconnected and check for DC voltage on the driver circuit at the ignition coil connector. If there is any significant voltage on that wire then there is a short to voltage somewhere. Find the short and repair it.If there is no voltage on the driver circuit, then turn the ignition off. Disconnect the PCM connector and check the continuity of the driver between the PCM and the coil. If there is no continuity repair the open or short to ground in the circuit. If continuity is present, then check for resistance between ground and the ignition coil connector. There should be infinite resistance. If there isn't, repair the short to ground in the coil driver circuit NOTE: If the ignition coil driver signal wire is not open or shorted to voltage or ground and there is no trigger signal to the coil then suspect a faulty PCM coil driver. Also keep in mind that if the PCM driver is at fault, there may be a wiring problem that caused the PCM failure. It's a good idea to do the above check after PCM replacement to verify there won't be a repeat failure. If you find that the engine isn't misfiring, the coil is being triggered properly but P0362 is continually being reset, there is the possibility that the PCM coil monitoring system may be faulty.', ''
120', 'P0385', 'P0385 - Crankshaft Position Sensor B Circuit Malfunction', 'Crankshaft Position Sensor B Circuit Malfunction', 'The crankshaft position sensor (CKP) measures crankshaft location and relays this information to the PCM (Powertrain Control Module). Depending on the vehicle, the PCM uses this crankshaft position information to time the spark properly or on some systems it is only for misfire detection and does not control spark timing.  The CKP sensor is stationary and works in harmony with a reluctor ring (or toothed ring) that is attached to the crankshaft.  As this reluctor ring passes in front of the CKP sensor, the magnetic field created by the CKP sensor is interrupted and this creates a square wave voltage signal that the PCM interprets as crankshaft position.  If the PCM detects that there are no crankshaft pulses or if it sees a problem with the pulses on the output circuit, P0385 will set. ', 'NOTE:  If the crank sensor is used only for misfire detection and NOT spark timing (this varies with the vehicle), the vehicle should start and run with MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination.  Also, some vehicles require several key cycles to illuminate the MIL.  If this is the case, there may be no MIL illumination until the problem often enough over time.  If the crank sensor is used for BOTH misfire detection and spark timing, the vehicle may or may not start.   Symptoms may include:  Vehicle may not start (see above)  Vehicle may run rough or misfire  MIL illumination', '  Vehicle may not start (see above)  Vehicle may run rough or misfire  MIL illumination', 'A P0385 &quot;check engine light&quot; code could be caused by:  Damaged CKP sensor connector  Damaged reluctor ring (missing teeth or not turning due to sheared-off keyway)  Sensor output open  Sensor output shorted to ground  Sensor output shorted to voltage  Failed crank sensor  Failed PCM', '  Damaged CKP sensor connector  Damaged reluctor ring (missing teeth or not turning due to sheared-off keyway)  Sensor output open  Sensor output shorted to ground  Sensor output shorted to voltage  Failed crank sensor  Failed PCM', '  Using a scan tool, check if, when engine is running or cranking, that there is an RPM signal.  If there is no RPM reading, then visually inspect the crank Sensor Bnd connector for any damage and repair as necessary.  If there is no visible damage, and you have access to a scope, you could check the CKP 5 Volt square wave pattern.  If you do not, then, obtain a resistance reading of your crank sensor from a repair manual.  (There are so many different types of crank sensors that there's no way to put here which resistance reading is correct).  Then check the resistance of the CKP sensor by disconnecting the Sensor Bnd measuring resistance of the sensor.  (It is best to check resistance readings from the PCM connector.  This rules out any wiring problems from the start.  But it does require some mechanical skill and shouldn't be performed if you're not familiar with automobile electrical systems).  Is the sensor within resistance specs?   If not, replace the CKP sensor.  If so, recheck resistance reading from the PCM connector.  Is the reading still okay?   If not, repair open or short in the wiring to the crank Sensor Bnd re-check.  If the reading is okay, the problem is intermittent or the PCM may be at fault.  Try reconnecting and checking for RPM signal again.  If there is now an RPM signal, wiggle test the wiring harness to try and induce the fault. This code is basically identical to P0335. This code P0385 refers to Crankshaft Posistion Sensor &quot;B&quot;, whereas P0335 refers to Crankshaft Position Sensor &quot;A&quot;. If you have the code P0385, your vehicle is equipped with two crank sensors (CPS). Other crank sensor codes include P0016, P0017, P0018, P0019, P0335, P0336, P0337, P0338, P0339, P0385, P0386, P0387, P0388, and P0389.', ''
121', 'P0386', 'P0386 Crankshaft Position Sensor Range/Performance', 'Crankshaft Position Sensor B Circuit Range/Performance', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The crankshaft position sensor (CKP) is usually a two wire sensor: a signal and a ground. The CKP sensor consists of (usually) a permanent magnent sensor that is mounted in front of a reluctor (toothed) wheel mounted to the crankshaft.As the reluctor wheel passes in front of the crank sensor, an A/C signal is produced that varies according to engine speed. The PCM (powertrain control module) uses this A/C signal to interpret engine RPM. Some crank sensors are hall-effect sensors instead of permanent magnent sensors. These are three wire sensors, provided with voltage, ground, and signal. They too have a reluctor wheel with vanes and &quot;windows&quot; that change the voltage signal to the PCM, providing a RPM signal. I will focus on the former, since they are simpler design and more common.The crankshaft reluctor has a specific number of teeth and the PCM can determine the position of the crankshaft using only this sensor's signature pattern. The PCM uses this sensor to also determine cylinder misfires by measuring the reluctor teeth locations in the CKP sensor signal. In conjunction with the Camshaft position sensor (CMP) the PCM can determine timing of spark and fuel injection. If the PCM senses a loss of CKP sensor signal (RPM signal) even momentarily, P0386 may set.Note: This DTC refers to the &quot;B&quot; sensor.  Refer to a vehicle specific repair manual to confirm the location of your &quot;B&quot; crankshaft position sensor. In the case of some GM (Cadillac) engines, the &quot;B&quot; sensor is the upper while the &quot;A&quot; sensor is the lower, but check to be sure. This code is basically the same as P0336 but refers to the &quot;B&quot; sensor.', 'Symptoms of a P0386 DTC may include:  Intermittent stalling &amp; no start  No start  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Intermittent misfire', '  Intermittent stalling &amp; no start  No start  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Intermittent misfire', 'Potential causes of a P0386 code include:  Bad crank sensor  Broken reluctor ring (missing teeth, debris lodged in ring)  Reluctor ring dislodged/stripped from it's stationary location  Wiring harness chafing causing short  Wiring open in CKP circuit', '  Bad crank sensor  Broken reluctor ring (missing teeth, debris lodged in ring)  Reluctor ring dislodged/stripped from it's stationary location  Wiring harness chafing causing short  Wiring open in CKP circuit', 'Crankshaft sensor problems are at times intermittent and the vehicle may start and run for some time until problem occurs. Try to reproduce the complaint. When engine stalls or if the engine will not start and continue to run, then crank engine while observing RPM reading. If there is no RPM reading, check for a signal coming out of the crank sensor. Using a scope is best, but since most DIYers don't have access to one you may be able to use a code reader or the tachometer to check for RPM signal.Visually check the CKP harness for damage or cracking in the wiring insulation. Repair as necessary. Make sure the wiring isn't mis-routed near high voltage spark plug wires. Check for loose connection or broken lock at the sensor connector. Repair as necessary. Obtain a resistance spec for the Crank sensor. Remove and check it. If it doesn't pass, replace it. If it checks out okay, check the reluctor ring for damage, broken teeth, or debris lodged in the ring. Make sure the reluctor ring isn't dislodged. It should be stationary on the crankshaft. Carefully repair/replace as necessary. Note: some reluctor rings are located in the bell housing of the transmission or behind the front engine cover and cannot be easily accessed.If the vehicle intermittently stalls and after stalling you have no RPM signal and you have verified the wiring to the CKP sensor is good, then try replacing the sensor. If that doesn't take care of it, and you can't access the reluctor ring, seek help from an automotive professional.', ''
122', 'P0390', 'P0390 Camshaft Position Sensor Trouble Code', 'Camshaft Position Sensor B Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2)', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.This P0390 trouble code indicates that a problem was detected in the camshaft position sensor   circuit of bank 2.Since it says circuit, that means the problem could   lie in any part of the circuit - the sensor itself, the wiring, or the PCM.   Don't just replace the CPS (camshaft position sensor) and think that will definitely   fix it.Note: The camshaft sensor &quot;B&quot; is generally the sensor on the exhaust camshaft. This code is basically identical to P0345, however refer to a vehicle specific repair manual to identify the correct sensor on your vehicle/engine.', 'Symptoms can include:  Hard starting or no start  Rough running / misfiring  Loss of engine power', '  Hard starting or no start  Rough running / misfiring  Loss of engine power', 'A code P0390 could mean one or more of the following has happened:   a wire or connector in the circuit could be grounded/shorted/broken  the camshaft position sensor may have failed  the PCM may have failed  there exists an open circuit  the crankshaft position sensor may have failed', '   a wire or connector in the circuit could be grounded/shorted/broken  the camshaft position sensor may have failed  the PCM may have failed  there exists an open circuit  the crankshaft position sensor may have failed', 'With a P0390 OBD-II trouble code, diagnosis can be tricky at times. Hereare some things to try:  Visually inspect all the wiring and connectors in the circuit  Check for continuity in the circuit wiring  Check the operation (voltage) of the camshaft position sensor  Replace the camshaft position Sensor Bs required  Check the crankshaft position circuit as well  Replace circuit wiring and/or connectors as required  Diagnose/replace the PCM as required', '  Visually inspect all the wiring and connectors in the circuit  Check for continuity in the circuit wiring  Check the operation (voltage) of the camshaft position sensor  Replace the camshaft position Sensor Bs required  Check the crankshaft position circuit as well  Replace circuit wiring and/or connectors as required  Diagnose/replace the PCM as required'
123', 'P0400', 'P0400 - Exhaust Gas Recirculation Flow Malfunction', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Flow Malfunction', 'The exhaust gas recirculation (EGR) valve is vacuum controlled valve that regulates   the amount of exhaust gases that re-enter the cylinders.The powertrain control   module (PCM) determines how much based on engine load, temp, and other conditions.   If the PCM detects that the amount of exhaust gases entering the cylinder were   insufficient or non-existent, this code is set.', 'No symptoms will likely be noticed by the driver other than the MIL (malfunction   indicator lamp). However, non visible symptoms will be increased combustion   temperature and increased Nox emissions.', '', 'A code P0400 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Plugged EGR passage which restricts the flow of exhaust gasses   Faulty EGR solenoid   Faulty EGR solenoid wiring/harness   Vacuum lines damaged/disconnected to the EGR valve solenoid or to the EGR     valve   Faulty EGR valve', '  Plugged EGR passage which restricts the flow of exhaust gasses   Faulty EGR solenoid   Faulty EGR solenoid wiring/harness   Vacuum lines damaged/disconnected to the EGR valve solenoid or to the EGR     valve   Faulty EGR valve', 'Since EGR valve designs are different, no one test will suffice:  Using a scan tool, operate the EGR valve with the engine running. If the     engine stumbles, the problem was likely intermittent wiring problem or intermittent     blockage problem   If engine doesn't stumble, operate the EGR valve manually, if possible.     If engine doesn't stumble and die, the ports are likely plugged. Removal of     valve and cleaning of all ports will be required   Checking of solenoid can only usually be done with a scan tool, because     most solenoids operate with a duty cycle of voltage, rather than constant     voltage  Check all vacuum lines, hoses, etc for any damage  Visually inspect the solenoid harness and the solenoid for damage  Replace EGR valveRelated EGR Articles: P0401 - P0402   - P0403 - EGR System Explained', '  Using a scan tool, operate the EGR valve with the engine running. If the     engine stumbles, the problem was likely intermittent wiring problem or intermittent     blockage problem   If engine doesn't stumble, operate the EGR valve manually, if possible.     If engine doesn't stumble and die, the ports are likely plugged. Removal of     valve and cleaning of all ports will be required   Checking of solenoid can only usually be done with a scan tool, because     most solenoids operate with a duty cycle of voltage, rather than constant     voltage  Check all vacuum lines, hoses, etc for any damage  Visually inspect the solenoid harness and the solenoid for damage  Replace EGR valve'
124', 'P0401', 'P0401 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Insufficient EGR Flow', 'EGR stands for Exhaust Gas Recirculation. It is part of the vehicle emmissions   system, and is used to reduce combustion temperature and pressure to control   Oxides of Nitrogen. There are generally three parts to the EGR system: the EGR   valve, an actuator solenoid, and a differential pressure sensor EGR (DPFE).   These things work together to deliver the correct amount of recirculation based   on engine temperature, load, etc. The P0401 code means that OBD detected an   insufficient amount of EGR.', 'You may notice drivability problems such as pinging (a.k.a. pre-ignition knock) when the engine is under load or the vehicle is at higher speeds. There may also be other symptoms.', '', 'A code P0401 most likely means one or more of the following has happened:  The DPFE (differential pressure feedback EGR) sensor is faulty and needs     to be replaced  There is a blockage in the EGR (tube), most likely carbon buildupThe EGR valve is faultyThe EGR valve may not be opening due to a lack of vaccuum', '  The DPFE (differential pressure feedback EGR) sensor is faulty and needs     to be replaced  There is a blockage in the EGR (tube), most likely carbon buildupThe EGR valve is faultyThe EGR valve may not be opening due to a lack of vaccuum', 'In fixing this code, it is quite common for people to just replace the EGR valve only to have the OBD code return. The EGR valve is not always the culprit.  Use a vacuum pump and pull the EGR valve open while monitoring engine RPM's     &amp; DPFE voltage. There should be a noticable difference in RPM's with the     EGR open   Clean out the EGR valve and/or tubing to remove deposits  Check the voltage at the DPFE, compare to specified values (refer to a repair     manual for your specific model)  Replace the DPFE sensor (with a good quality / OEM one)  Replace the EGR valveRelated EGR Articles: P0400 - P0402   - P0403 - EGR System Explained', '  Use a vacuum pump and pull the EGR valve open while monitoring engine RPM's     &amp; DPFE voltage. There should be a noticable difference in RPM's with the     EGR open   Clean out the EGR valve and/or tubing to remove deposits  Check the voltage at the DPFE, compare to specified values (refer to a repair     manual for your specific model)  Replace the DPFE sensor (with a good quality / OEM one)  Replace the EGR valve'
125', 'P0402', 'P0402 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Flow (EGR) Excessive Detected', 'EGR stands for Exhaust Gas Recirculation. It is part of the vehicle emmissions system, and is used to reduce combustion temperature and pressure to control Oxides of Nitrogen.There are generally three parts to the EGR system: the EGR valve, an actuator solenoid, and a differential pressure sensor (DPF). These things work together to deliver the correct amount of recirculation based on engine temperature, load, etc. The P0402 code means that OBD detected an excessive amount of EGR.', 'You may notice drivability problems such as the engine may surge off idle. There may also be other symptoms.', '', 'A code P0402 most likely means one or more of the following has happened:The DPFE (differential pressure) sensor is faulty and needs to be replacedThere is a blockage in the EGR (most likely carbon buildup)The EGR valve is faultyThe EGR valve may not be opening due to a lack of vaccuum', 'The DPFE (differential pressure) sensor is faulty and needs to be replacedThere is a blockage in the EGR (most likely carbon buildup)The EGR valve is faultyThe EGR valve may not be opening due to a lack of vaccuum', 'With a P0402, it is common for people to replace the EGR valve, only to have the problem return. The most likely solution is to replace the DPFE sensor.Check the voltage at the DPFE sensor both at idle and when the EGR is openReplace the DPFE sensorRelated EGR Articles: P0400 - P0401   - P0403 - EGR System ExplainedMore InformationFordF150.net ForumsCalifornia State University Case Study', 'Check the voltage at the DPFE sensor both at idle and when the EGR is openReplace the DPFE sensor'
126', 'P0403', 'P0403 - Exhaust Gas Recirculation Circuit Malfunction', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Circuit Malfunction', '', 'Usually a fault in the control circuit, will leave no noticeable symptoms other   than the Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination. However, if the EGR   control solenoid is stuck open due to debris, etc. the code may be accompanied   by misfire under acceleration, rough idle, or engine dying altogether.', '', 'The causes for a P0403 EGR code could be any of the following:  Bad EGR solenoid  Excessive resistance in control circuit (PCM controlled ground) due to an     open, chafing or damage to the harness  Poor connection at the EGR solenoid harness (worn or loose pins)   Water intrusion at the EGR solenoid harness   Blockage in EGR control solenoid holding solenoid open or closed causing     excessive resistance   Loss of supply voltage to EGR solenoid   Bad PCM', '  Bad EGR solenoid  Excessive resistance in control circuit (PCM controlled ground) due to an     open, chafing or damage to the harness  Poor connection at the EGR solenoid harness (worn or loose pins)   Water intrusion at the EGR solenoid harness   Blockage in EGR control solenoid holding solenoid open or closed causing     excessive resistance   Loss of supply voltage to EGR solenoid   Bad PCM', 'With the ignition on and engine off, use a scan tool to activate the EGR solenoid.   Listen or feel for a clicking, indicating that the solenoid is operating.If the solenoid does operate, you'll have to check current draw on the ground   circuit. It should be less than one amp. If it is then the problem is intermittent.   If it isn't then there is excessive resistance in the circuit and perform the   following 1. When it's activated see if you can blow lightly through it. IF you can't   there may be a blockage causing excessive resistance. Replace EGR solenoid as   needed. If there is no blockage, disconnect the EGR solenoid and the PCM connector   containing the EGR solenoid control circuit. Using a digital Volt-Ohm meter   (DVOM) check resistence between the control circuit and battery ground. It should   be infinite. If it isn't, then there is a short to ground on the control circuit.   Repair the short to ground and retest as needed. 2. If the solenoid doesn't click as it should, disconnect the EGR solenoid   connector and connect a test light between the two wires. Using the scan tool,   command the EGR solenoid on. The light should light up. If it does, replace   the EGR solenoid. If it does not perform the following: a. Check for 12 Volts   on the ignition supply voltage to the solenoid. If it isn't present, inspect   the supply circuit for an open, or a short due to chafing or breakage and re-test.   b. If it still doesn't operate: then manually ground the EGR solenoid control   circuit. The light should light. If it does, repair open in EGR solenoid control   circuit and re-test. If it doesn't, replace EGR solenoid.Related EGR DTC codes: P0400 - P0401   - P0402 - EGR Systems', ''
127', 'P0404', 'P0404 - Exhaust Gas Recirculation Circuit Range/Performance', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Circuit Range/Performance', 'The EGR (Exhaust Gas Recirculation) system's purpose is to redirect exhaust gasback into the cylinders. Since exhaust gas is inert, it displaces oxygen and fuel,thereby lowering cylinder temps, which, in turn, lowers oxides of nitrogenemissions.   For that reason it needs to be carefully metered into the cylinders(via the EGR valve) so as not to adversely affect the engine's performance. (Toomuch EGR and the engine won't idle).If you have a P0404, then the EGR valve is  likely an electrically controlled EGR valve instead of a vacuum controlled EGR  valve.  Also, the valve will usually have a feedback system built into it that  informs the PCM (Powertrain Control Module) what position the valve is in; open,  closed, or somewhere in between.  The PCM needs to know this to determine whether or  not the valve is operating as needed. If the PCM determines that the valve should be  operating, but the feedback circuit shows that the valve is not open, this code will  set.  Or if the PCM determines the valve should be closed but the feedback signal  indicates that the valve is open, this code will set.', 'There may be no symptoms of a P0404 DTC other than the MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) or checkengine light.  However, Exhaust Gas Recirculation systems are inherently problematicdue to carbon buildup in the intake manifold, etc.  This normal buildup can lodge inan EGR valve, holding it open when it should be closed.  If this is the case, theengine may idle rough, or not at all.  If the valve has failed and is NOT opening,then symptoms would be higher combustion temps and as a result, higher Noxemissions.  But the latter symptoms aren't going to be noticeable to a driver.', '', 'Usually this code points to either carbon buildup or a bad EGR valve.  However thatdoesn't rule out the following:    Open or short in the 5 Volt reference circuit   Open or short in the ground circuit  Open or short in the PCM controlled voltage circuit  Bad PCM (less likely) ', '    Open or short in the 5 Volt reference circuit   Open or short in the ground circuit  Open or short in the PCM controlled voltage circuit  Bad PCM (less likely) ', '  Using a scan tool command the EGR valve to open while watching the actual EGR    position (it will probably be labeled &quot;desired EGR&quot; or something similar).  The    actual EGR position should be very close to the &quot;desired&quot; EGR position.  If it    is, then the problem is likely intermittent.  It may have been a lodged piece of    carbon that has since dislodged, or it could be a bad EGR valve winding that  intermittently opens or shorts as the valve temperature changes.  If the EGR &quot;desired&quot; position is not close to the &quot;actual&quot; position,    then unplug the EGR sensor.  Check for a good 5 Volt reference voltage to the    connector.  If it doesn't show a reference voltage, repair an open or short in the    5 Volt reference circuit.   If there is a 5 volt reference voltage, activate the EGR with the scanner,    monitor the EGR ground circuit with a DVOM (Digital Volt/Ohm meter).  It should    indicate a good ground.  If it doesn't then repair the ground circuit.  If there is a good ground, then check the control circuit.  It should indicate    voltage that varies according to the percentage that the EGR is open.  As it's    open more, the voltage should increase accordingly.   If it does, then replace the    EGR valve.   If the voltage doesn't increase incrementally, then repair open or short in    EGR control circuit. ', ''
128', 'P0405', 'P0405 EGR Sensor A Circuit Low', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Sensor A Circuit Low', 'There are different designs of EGR (Exhaust Gas Recirculation) systems, but they all operate in a similar way. The EGR valve is a PCM (Powertrain Control Module) controlled valve that allows measured amounts of exhaust gasses to pass back into the cylinders to be burned with the air/fuel mixture. Since exhaust gas is an inert gas that displaces oxygen, injecting it back into the cylinder can lower combustion temperatures which helps to improve NOx (oxides of nitrogen) emissions.EGR isn't needed on cold startup or at idle. EGR is commanded on under certain conditions like startup or at idle. EGR is commanded on under certain conditions like partial throttle or decel depending on engine temperature and load, etc. Exhaust gasses are supplied to the EGR valve from an exhaust pipe or the EGR valve may be mounted directly in the exhaust manifold. When needed, the valve is commanded &quot;on&quot; allowing the gasses to pass into the cylinders. Some systems divert exhaust gasses directly into the cylinders while others simply inject it into the intake manifold where it is then pulled into the cylinders. while others simply inject it into the intake manifold where it is then pulled into the cylinders.Some EGR systems are quite simple while others are a little more complicated. Electrically controlled EGR valves are directly controlled by the PCM. A wiring harness plugs into the valve itself and is commanded by the PCM as it sees the need. These can be 4 or 5 wire. Usually 1 or 2 grounds 12 volt ignition feed, a 5 volt reference circuit, and a feedback circuit. Other systems are vacuum controlled. These are quite simple. The PCM controls a vacuum solenoid which when activated, allows vacuum to travel to the EGR valve and open it. There should also be an electrical connector on this type of EGR valve for the feedback circuit. The EGR system feedback circuit allows the PCM to see if the EGR valve pintle is actually moving as it should. If the feedback circuit detects that the voltage is unusually low, or it's position is lower than it's commanded to be, P0405 may set. ', 'Symptoms of a P0405 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', 'Potential causes of a P0405 code include:  Short to ground in EGR signal or Reference circuits  Short to voltage in EGR ground or signal circuits  Bad EGR valve  Bad PCM wiring issues due to chafing or loose terminals', '  Short to ground in EGR signal or Reference circuits  Short to voltage in EGR ground or signal circuits  Bad EGR valve  Bad PCM wiring issues due to chafing or loose terminals', 'If you have access to a scan tool you can command the EGR valve on. If it responds and the feedback indicates the valve is moving properly then the problem may be intermittent. Sometimes in cold weather, moisture can freeze in the valve causing it to stick. After the vehicle warms up the problem may disappear. Carbon or other debris can lodge in a valve causing it to stick also If the EGR valve doesn't respond to your commands with the scan tool, disconnect the EGR harness connector. Turn the key to on position, engine off (KOEO). Using a voltmeter, check for 5 volts on the reference wire to the EGR valve. If there is no 5 volts, is there any voltage at all? If there is 12 volts, then repair short to voltage in the 5 volt reference circuit. If there is no voltage connect a test light to battery voltage and probe the 5 volt reference wire. If the test light illuminates, the 5 volt reference circuit is shorted to ground. Repair as necessary. If the test light doesn't illuminate check for an open in the 5 volt reference circuit. Repair as necessary If there is no apparent problem and there is no 5 volt reference, PCM may be at fault, however other codes will likely be present. If 5 volts are present on the reference circuit, jumper the 5 volts to the EGR signal circuit. Now the EGR position on the scan tool should read 100 percent. If it doesn't connect test light to battery voltage and probe the EGR signal circuit. If it illuminates, then the signal circuit is shorted to ground. Repair as necessary. If the light doesn't illuminate, check for an open on the EGR signal circuit. Repair as necessary.If, after jumpering the 5 volt reference circuit to the EGR signal circuit the scan tool EGR position reads 100 percent, then check for poor terminal tension at the EGR valve connector. If the wiring is okay, replace the EGR valve.', ''
129', 'P0406', 'P0406 Exhaust Gas Recirculation Sensor A Circuit High', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Sensor A Circuit High', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The EGR (Exhaust gas recirculation) system is designed to lower combustion temperatures under certain conditions, thereby reducing oxides of Nitrogen (NOx) emissions. It does this by recirculating inert exhaust gasses back into the cylinder to be burned with the air/fuel mixture. Inert exhaust gas burns slower and lowers the temperatures of combustion. The EGR valve is computer controlled and opens to allow the exhaust gas to flow into the cylinders.The EGR valve may be vacuum operated. If so, a PCM (Powertrain control module) controlled EGR vacuum solenoid is employed to deliver vacuum to the EGR valve. When activated by the PCM, the EGR solenoid opens, allowing engine vacuum to travel to the EGR valve. This engine vacuum opens the valve, allowing exhaust gasses to pass through and into the combustion chamber. Other EGR valves are electronic and directly controlled by the PCM. The PCM will activate solenoid(s) that are integral to the EGR valve. These solenoids will open for varying lengths of time, allowing the exhaust to pass through as needed. The EGR system is continuously monitored for faults. There is a feedback sensor on most EGR valves that informs the computer of the actual EGR position. This sensor usually ranges between .4 and 5 volts If this EGR position sensor has an abnormally high reading for too long, this code may set.', 'Symptoms of a P0406 DTC may include:  Increase in combustion temperatures (and NOx emissions)  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination   Possible surging while driving  Possible intermittent stall', '  Increase in combustion temperatures (and NOx emissions)  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination   Possible surging while driving  Possible intermittent stall', 'Potential causes of a P0406 code include:  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to B+ (battery voltage)  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to the 5 volt reference circuit to EGR  EGR sensor ground circuit open  EGR sensor signal circuit open  Bad EGR (internal failure on EGR sensor or solenoid)  Debris caught in valve and holding it open or closed', '  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to B+ (battery voltage)  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to the 5 volt reference circuit to EGR  EGR sensor ground circuit open  EGR sensor signal circuit open  Bad EGR (internal failure on EGR sensor or solenoid)  Debris caught in valve and holding it open or closed', 'If the vehicle starts and stalls or will not run with this code present, try unplugging the EGR valve and then restarting. If this makes no difference, remove the EGR valve and inspect for debris. Clean and reinstall. If this still doesn't fix the problem, block off EGR port and attempt to start the engine. If this allows the engine to start, the EGR valve is stuck open and needs replaced. If unplugging the PCM controlled EGR valve allowed the engine to restart then there is likely a wiring problem, possibly a short holding a solenoid open.Using a scan tool, view the EGR position on the datastream with the Key on Engine running and compare with the EGR desired position. If it reads normal, suspect an intermittent problem. If it shows 5 volts or higher, check the EGR sensor signal circuit for a short to the 5 volt reference wire or to B+. Repair as needed. Also check that there is a good ground path on the ground circuit. Repair any opens or shorts on ground circuit On a vacuum controlled EGR valve with EGR solenoid: if unplugging the EGR valve vacuum source allows the engine to start, then suspect a bad EGR solenoid allowing vacuum to the EGR valve all the time. Replace the EGR solenoid as needed. If this code is present and your engine starts and runs just fine, suspect an open in the wiring. Inspect and repair any wiring problems. If the wiring checks out, replace the EGR valve. If the wiring to and from the EGR valveP0406 Diagnosis VideoNote: We are not affiliated with the producers of the following video. We are including it here as an additional troubleshooting tool, it may or may not apply to your vehicle issue.', ''
130', 'P0407', 'P0407 EGR Sensor B Circuit Low', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Sensor B Circuit Low', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.There are different designs of EGR (Exhaust Gas Recirculation) systems, but they all operate in a similar way. The EGR valve is a PCM (Powertrain Control Module) controlled valve that allows measured amounts of exhaust gasses to pass back into the cylinders to be burned with the air/fuel mixture. Since exhaust gas is an inert gas that displaces oxygen, injecting it back into the cylinder can lower combustion temperatures which helps to improve NOx (oxides of nitrogen) emissions.EGR isn't needed on cold startup or at idle. EGR is commanded on under certain conditions like startup or at idle. EGR is commanded on under certain conditions like partial throttle or decel depending on engine temperature and load, etc. Exhaust gasses are supplied to the EGR valve from an exhaust pipe or the EGR valve may be mounted directly in the exhaust manifold. When needed, the valve is commanded &quot;on&quot; allowing the gasses to pass into the cylinders. Some systems divert exhaust gasses directly into the cylinders while others simply inject it into the intake manifold where it is then pulled into the cylinders. while others simply inject it into the intake manifold where it is then pulled into the cylinders.Some EGR systems are quite simple while others are a little more complicated. Electrically controlled EGR valves are directly controlled by the PCM. A wiring harness plugs into the valve itself and is commanded by the PCM as it sees the need. These can be 4 or 5 wire. Usually 1 or 2 grounds 12 volt ignition feed, a 5 volt reference circuit, and a feedback circuit. Other systems are vacuum controlled. These are quite simple. The PCM controls a vacuum solenoid which when activated, allows vacuum to travel to the EGR valve and open it. There should also be an electrical connector on this type of EGR valve for the feedback circuit. The EGR system feedback circuit allows the PCM to see if the EGR valve pintle is actually moving as it should.If the feedback circuit detects that the voltage is unusually low, or it's position is lower than it's commanded to be, P0407 may set. Note: This code is basically identical to p0405. The difference here is the p0405 DTC refers to the &quot;A&quot; sensor, and P0407 refers to the EGR &quot;B&quot; sensor. Refer to a vehicle specific repair manual for the location of your &quot;A&quot; and &quot;B&quot; sensors.', 'Symptoms of a P0407 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', 'Potential causes of a P0407 code include:  Short to ground in EGR signal or Reference circuits  Short to voltage in EGR ground or signal circuits  Bad EGR valve  Bad PCM wiring issues due to chafing or loose terminals', '  Short to ground in EGR signal or Reference circuits  Short to voltage in EGR ground or signal circuits  Bad EGR valve  Bad PCM wiring issues due to chafing or loose terminals', 'If you have access to a scan tool you can command the EGR valve on. If it responds and the feedback indicates the valve is moving properly then the problem may be intermittent. Sometimes in cold weather, moisture can freeze in the valve causing it to stick. After the vehicle warms up the problem may disappear. Carbon or other debris can lodge in a valve causing it to stick also If the EGR valve doesn't respond to your commands with the scan tool, disconnect the EGR harness connector. Turn the key to on position, engine off (KOEO). Using a voltmeter, check for 5 volts on the reference wire to the EGR valve. If there is no 5 volts, is there any voltage at all? If there is 12 volts, then repair short to voltage in the 5 volt reference circuit. If there is no voltage connect a test light to battery voltage and probe the 5 volt reference wire. If the test light illuminates, the 5 volt reference circuit is shorted to ground. Repair as necessary. If the test light doesn't illuminate check for an open in the 5 volt reference circuit. Repair as necessary If there is no apparent problem and there is no 5 volt reference, PCM may be at fault, however other codes will likely be present. If 5 volts are present on the reference circuit, jumper the 5 volts to the EGR signal circuit. Now the EGR position on the scan tool should read 100 percent. If it doesn't connect test light to battery voltage and probe the EGR signal circuit. If it illuminates, then the signal circuit is shorted to ground. Repair as necessary. If the light doesn't illuminate, check for an open on the EGR signal circuit. Repair as necessary.If, after jumpering the 5 volt reference circuit to the EGR signal circuit the scan tool EGR position reads 100 percent, then check for poor terminal tension at the EGR valve connector. If the wiring is okay, replace the EGR valve.', ''
131', 'P0408', 'P0408 Exhaust Gas Recirculation Sensor B Circuit High', 'Exhaust Gas Recirculation Sensor B Circuit High', 'The EGR (Exhaust gas recirculation) system is designed to lower combustion temperatures under certain conditions, thereby reducing oxides of Nitrogen (NOx) emissions. It does this by recirculating inert exhaust gasses back into the cylinder to be burned with the air/fuel mixture. Inert exhaust gas burns slower and lowers the temperatures of combustion. The EGR valve is computer controlled and opens to allow the exhaust gas to flow into the cylinders.The EGR valve may be vacuum operated. If so, a PCM (Powertrain control module) controlled EGR vacuum solenoid is employed to deliver vacuum to the EGR valve. When activated by the PCM, the EGR solenoid opens, allowing engine vacuum to travel to the EGR valve. This engine vacuum opens the valve, allowing exhaust gasses to pass through and into the combustion chamber. Other EGR valves are electronic and directly controlled by the PCM. The PCM will activate solenoid(s) that are integral to the EGR valve. These solenoids will open for varying lengths of time, allowing the exhaust to pass through as needed. The EGR system is continuously monitored for faults. There is a feedback sensor on most EGR valves that informs the computer of the actual EGR position. This sensor usually ranges between .4 and 5 volts If this EGR position sensor has an abnormally high reading for too long, this code may set.Note: This code is basically identical to P0406. The difference here is the p0406 DTC refers to the &quot;A&quot; circuit, and P0408 refers to the EGR &quot;B&quot; circuit. Refer to a vehicle specific repair manual for the location of your &quot;A&quot; and &quot;B&quot; circuits.This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.', 'Symptoms of a P0408 DTC may include:  Increase in combustion temperatures (and NOx emissions)  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination   Possible surging while driving  Possible intermittent stall', '  Increase in combustion temperatures (and NOx emissions)  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination   Possible surging while driving  Possible intermittent stall', 'Potential causes of a P0408 code include:  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to B+ (battery voltage)  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to the 5 volt reference circuit to EGR  EGR sensor ground circuit open  EGR sensor signal circuit open  Bad EGR (internal failure on EGR sensor or solenoid)  Debris caught in valve and holding it open or closed', '  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to B+ (battery voltage)  EGR sensor signal circuit shorted to the 5 volt reference circuit to EGR  EGR sensor ground circuit open  EGR sensor signal circuit open  Bad EGR (internal failure on EGR sensor or solenoid)  Debris caught in valve and holding it open or closed', 'If the vehicle starts and stalls or will not run with this code present, try unplugging the EGR valve and then restarting. If this makes no difference, remove the EGR valve and inspect for debris. Clean and reinstall. If this still doesn't fix the problem, block off EGR port and attempt to start the engine. If this allows the engine to start, the EGR valve is stuck open and needs replaced. If unplugging the PCM controlled EGR valve allowed the engine to restart then there is likely a wiring problem, possibly a short holding a solenoid open.Using a scan tool, view the EGR position on the datastream with the Key on Engine running and compare with the EGR desired position. If it reads normal, suspect an intermittent problem. If it shows 5 volts or higher, check the EGR sensor signal circuit for a short to the 5 volt reference wire or to B+. Repair as needed. Also check that there is a good ground path on the ground circuit. Repair any opens or shorts on ground circuit On a vacuum controlled EGR valve with EGR solenoid: if unplugging the EGR valve vacuum source allows the engine to start, then suspect a bad EGR solenoid allowing vacuum to the EGR valve all the time. Replace the EGR solenoid as needed. If this code is present and your engine starts and runs just fine, suspect an open in the wiring. Inspect and repair any wiring problems. If the wiring checks out, replace the EGR valve. If the wiring to and from the EGR valveP0408 Diagnosis VideoNote: We are not affiliated with the producers of the following video. We are including it here as an additional troubleshooting tool, it may or may not apply to your vehicle issue.', ''
132', 'P0410', 'P0410 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Secondary Air Injection System Malfunction', 'The P0410 code refers to the emissions system. The AIR pump puts air to the   exhaust to lower emissions. It takes in outside air and pumps it through two   one-way check valves into each bank of the exhaust.About 90% of the time that this code is set, the one-way check valves have   worn out or failed and allow water (which occurs naturally in the exhaust) back   into the pump. In any cold climate, especially in climates with higher humidity,   this water may be more excessive. The water partially fills the AIR pump, it   can then freeze. When the PCM commands the pump on, if the pump is frozen it   cannot turn, thus overloading the circuit and &quot;popping&quot; the fuse.', 'Possibly symptoms include:  MIL illumination obviously  Hesitation on acceleration  Noise from a bad/stuck AIR pump', '  MIL illumination obviously  Hesitation on acceleration  Noise from a bad/stuck AIR pump', 'A code P0410 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  Water may have collected in the AIR pump or the vent solenoid and frozen     or corroded the pump  Blown AIR pump fuse due to freezing up', '  Water may have collected in the AIR pump or the vent solenoid and frozen     or corroded the pump  Blown AIR pump fuse due to freezing up', 'Note: There is a technical service bulletin (TSB) regarding this code for a   number of GM models. The TSB calls for the replacement of the AIR pump and the   installation of a new secondary injection hose. The TSB can be found on this   ACDelco site.Additionally, if you simply replace the AIR pump the problem may return again   (and again). If you replace the pump, also clean out the hoses and replace the   one-way check valve. If this is on a GM model that the TSB applies to, follow   those instructions in the link above. In a few cases, people have put a small   hole in the rubber cover on the pump which allows any water to drain out.Also, please note that this may be covered under the emissions warranty on   the vehicle. If your vehicle is out of bumper-to-bumper warranty, check if the   emissions warranty is still valid!  Replace the AIR pump AND one-way check valve  Test and clean the AIR pump AND test and replace the one-way air check valve  Replace the AIR pump inlet hose  Replace the AIR pump fuse (found under the hood)Sources: GM-Forums   thread', '  Replace the AIR pump AND one-way check valve  Test and clean the AIR pump AND test and replace the one-way air check valve  Replace the AIR pump inlet hose  Replace the AIR pump fuse (found under the hood)'
133', 'P0411', 'P0411 Secondary Air Injection System Incorrect Flow Detected', 'Secondary Air Injection System Incorrect Flow Detected', 'Secondary Air Injection is an emission control that uses an air pump (either electric or turned by the drive belt) to move fresh air into the exhaust manifold(s) or exhaust ports when the engine is in open loop and pre-catalytic converter when in closed loop. This reduces hydrocarbon emissions (HC), Carbon Monoxide (CO), and oxides of Nitrogen (NOx). This fresh air helps convert Carbon Monoxide (CO) into Carbon Dioxide (CO2) and Hydrocarbons (HC) into water vapor (H20).A check valve is located in the air supply line to keep exhaust gasses from flowing into the pump. A cutoff valve that controls the airflow may be vacuum controlled or electrically controlled. When the powertrain control module (PCM) activates the valve, vacuum travels to the cutoff valve to open it and allow fresh air to flow. Some systems may have only a check valve and the flow may be regulated by a electromagnetic clutch on the air pump (similar to an A/C clutch).Under hard acceleration, the air pump will be deactivated to prevent backfiring in the exhaust. To self-check, the AIR system will be activated by the PCM and fresh air would be routed into the exhaust system. The oxygen sensors would sense this fresh air as a lean condition and the short term fuel trims would begin to move in the positive direction to compensate. The PCM expects to see this happen within just a few seconds during the self test. If it does not see the short term fuel trims rise, then the PCM interprets this as a malfunction in the AIR system and a code will be recorded.', 'Symptoms of a P0411 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Backfiring in the exhaust under hard acceleration  Engine running rich (This is counter-intuitive. See explanation below)  Squealing belt', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Backfiring in the exhaust under hard acceleration  Engine running rich (This is counter-intuitive. See explanation below)  Squealing belt', 'Potential causes of a P0411 code include:  Damaged or missing check valve  AIR pump intake port plugged/damaged  AIR pump clutch malfunction  Holes or damage to exhaust components', '  Damaged or missing check valve  AIR pump intake port plugged/damaged  AIR pump clutch malfunction  Holes or damage to exhaust components', 'If you have access to a scan tool, with KOEO (Key on engine off) command the AIR pump on. It should activate. If it doesn't, remove and inspect the AIR pump relay for discoloration/melting due to heat. Repair as necessary.With the ignition on (engine off) check for battery voltage at the switched battery feed to the relay and the relay control circuit. If either of these isn't present, inspect circuit for blown fuse or open/short in the wiring. Repair cause of short and retest. If they are both present, jumper the battery feed to AIR pump feed circuit using a fused jumper. The pump should activate. If not, check for power and ground present at the AIR pump when jumpered. If there is no voltage/ground present at pump repair open in wiring harness. If voltage and ground is present, but pump still does not run, suspect a bad AIR pump. If after jumpering the AIR pump feed circuit the pump activates then the problem is likely the AIR pump relay. Replace and retest.If the scan tool activates the AIR pump, with KOER (Key on engine running) activate the AIR pump solenoid valve on and see if there is vacuum to the cutoff valve. It should have vacuum present to open the valve. If there is no vacuum present, check the AIR pump's vacuum solenoid valve for vacuum supply from the manifold. If there is vacuum present then the vacuum solenoid is likely bad. Replace it. If there is no vacuum present at the supply to the vacuum solenoid, check for a plugged or damaged vacuum line or plugged vacuum port. But if there is vacuum present at the cut-off valve, shut the engine off and using a vacuum pump, apply vacuum to the cut-off valve and see if it holds a vacuum and that air flows through it when vacuum is applied. If it doesn't hold vacuum or the valve doesn't flow when vacuum is applied, replace the cut-off valve. If the cut-off valve works properly, inspect the check valve for obstruction or to see if it's missing. Replace as necessary.Check the steel line to the exhaust catalyst as well as the exhaust ports for damage or holes that could give a false reading.', ''
134', 'P0412', 'P0412 Secondary Air Injection System Switching Valve A Circuit Malfunction', 'Secondary Air Injection System Switching Valve A Circuit Malfunction', 'The Secondary Air Injection System (AIR) Switching Valve is the computer controlled valve that controls the air injection into the exhaust system of the engine (this valve may be integral to the AIR pump). This code deals with a problem on the circuit of the SOLENOID, not the operation of the AIR pump itself.The AIR injection system reduces hydrocarbon emissions (HC) Carbon Monoxide (CO) and oxides of Nitrogen (NOx) by injecting fresh air into the exhaust ports of a cold engine or catalytic converter of a warm engine. This helps convert hydrocarbons into water vapor (H20) and Carbon Monoxide to Carbon Dioxide (CO2).Generally the electric air pump is the most common type, although there may be belt driven air pumps with an electric clutch. The electric air pump is controlled by the PCM (Powertrain control module) which grounds the AIR pump relay control circuit and provides voltage to the AIR pump and solenoid valve (which may control a vacuum operated shut off valve or directly control air flow). There is a check-valve in the fresh air supply tube which prevents exhaust gasses from backing up into the AIR pump. The PCM monitors the driver that activates the AIR pump for faults. When the PCM commands the AIR pump relay on, the voltage of the control circuit would naturally be pulled close to zero. When the relay is commanded off, the control circuit would have battery voltage present. If the PCM sees a voltage that isn't what is expected, P0412 will set.', 'Symptoms of a P0412 DTC may include:  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination   Increase in tailpipe emissions  Engine running rich', '  MIL (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination   Increase in tailpipe emissions  Engine running rich', 'Potential causes of a P0412 code include:  Short to ground on control circuit  Short to voltage on control circuit  Control circuit open due to damage, etc.  Open or short on battery feed circuit to solenoid  Open or short on battery feed to relay control circuit', '  Short to ground on control circuit  Short to voltage on control circuit  Control circuit open due to damage, etc.  Open or short on battery feed circuit to solenoid  Open or short on battery feed to relay control circuit', 'If you have access to a scan tool, with KOEO (Key on engine off) command the AIR pump solenoid on and off. If the solenoid doesn't operate then unplug the solenoid and using a voltmeter, check for voltage being supplied to the solenoid when commanded on and also for good ground. If there is voltage being supplied and a good ground check for a good connection at the solenoid wiring harness connector. If the connection is good then replace the solenoid. If there is no voltage supplied to the connector when commanding the solenoid on, then find the AIR pump relay and verify that there is fused battery voltage present at the switched side of the circuit that is feeding voltage to the AIR pump.If not, check for blown fuse or open in the wiring. Repair and retest.If battery voltage is present at the voltage feed side of the relay, then a fast way to check for proper solenoid and AIR pump operation is to use a fused jumper and manually activate it. Do this by jumpering battery voltage to switched AIR pump voltage feed. Usually this is terminals 30 and 87 of the relay schematic (not always). If the solenoid (and possibly the AIR pump) operates, then you know your wiring and solenoid are okay. If it doesn't activate, open the wiring harness and find the open or short in the voltage feed to the AIR pump solenoid and fix it. If jumpering the solenoid to battery voltage activates the solenoid, then it's time to check for voltage present with KOEO on the PCM controlled side of the relay. If there is none, again repair open or short in the circuit and retest.To check the PCM wiring of the AIR pump solenoid, grounding the control circuit that is normally operated by the PCM will tell you if the wiring is intact. Grounding the circuit at the PCM connector with KOEO should activate the AIR pump relay, which in turn should activate the AIR pump &amp; solenoid. If this doesn't work, then there is an open or short in the PCM control circuit. If grounding the control circuit operates the AIR pump and solenoid, verify the PCM has good ground paths and no damage to the connector or water intrusion. If that checks out, suspect an open driver in the PCM.', ''
135', 'P0420', 'P0420 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Catalyst System Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 1)', 'The catalytic converter is a part of the exhaust system that looks kind of like a muffler, although it's job is very different from that of a muffler. A catalytic converter's job is to reduce emmissions from the exhaust.The catalytic converter has an oxygen sensor in front and behind it. When the   vehicle is warm and running in closed loop mode, the upstream oxygen sensor   waveform reading should fluctuate. The downstream O2 sensor reading should be   fairly steady. Typically the P0420 code triggers the Check   Engine Light if the readings of the two sensors are similar.This is indicative   of (among other things) a converter that is not working as efficiently as it   should be (according to specs). Catalytic converters are not normally a &quot;wear&quot; type item, that is they are not deisgned to wear out and need replacement. If they have failed, it is likely due to something else that caused it to fail.', 'The main symptom to the driver is the illumination of the MIL (malfunction indicator lamp). You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms. For example, if the substance inside the catalytic converter is broken or failed, it may be restricting the exhaust which will result in a feeling of reduced power output from the vehicle.', '', 'A code P0420 may mean that one or more of the following   has happened:  Leaded fuel was used where unleaded was called for  A damaged or failed oxygen sensor (HO2S)  Downstream oxygen sensor (HO2S) wiring damaged or connected improperly  The engine coolant temperature sensor is not working properly  Damaged or leaking exhaust manifold / catalytic converter / muffler / exhaust pipe  Retarded spark timing  The oxygen sensors in front and behind the converter are reporting too similar     of readings  Leaking fuel injector or high fuel pressure  Cylinder misfire  Oil contamination', '  Leaded fuel was used where unleaded was called for  A damaged or failed oxygen sensor (HO2S)  Downstream oxygen sensor (HO2S) wiring damaged or connected improperly  The engine coolant temperature sensor is not working properly  Damaged or leaking exhaust manifold / catalytic converter / muffler / exhaust pipe  Retarded spark timing  The oxygen sensors in front and behind the converter are reporting too similar     of readings  Leaking fuel injector or high fuel pressure  Cylinder misfire  Oil contamination', 'Some suggested steps for troubleshooting a P0420 error   code include:  Check for exhaust leaks at the manifold, pipes, catalytic converter. Repair     as required.  Use a scope to diagnose the oxygen sensor operation (Tip: The oxygen sensor     in front of the catalytic converter normally has a fluctuating waveform. The     waveform of the sensor behind the converter should be more steady).  Inspect the downstream heated oxygen sensor (HO2S), replace if necessary  Replace the catalytic converterOverall probably the biggest mistake vehicles owners make when they have a P0420 code is to simply replace an oxygen sensor (H02S). It is important to do proper diagnosis so you're not wasting money replacing parts unnecessarily.We strongly recommend that if you need to replace the catalytic converter that you replace it with an OEM unit. Second choice would be a high-quality replacement part. There are many stories in our forums where folks replaced the cat with a cheaper aftermarket one only to have the code return shortly thereafter.One thing to note is that many vehicle manufacturers offer a longer warranty   on emissions-related parts. So if you have a newer car but it's out of it's   bumper-to-bumper warranty, there still may be warranty on this type of problem.   Many manufacturers give a five year, unlimited mileage warranty on these items.   It's worth checking into.See also: P0420.com - P0420 Help', '  Check for exhaust leaks at the manifold, pipes, catalytic converter. Repair     as required.  Use a scope to diagnose the oxygen sensor operation (Tip: The oxygen sensor     in front of the catalytic converter normally has a fluctuating waveform. The     waveform of the sensor behind the converter should be more steady).  Inspect the downstream heated oxygen sensor (HO2S), replace if necessary  Replace the catalytic converter'
136', 'P0421', 'P0421 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Warm Up Catalyst Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 1)', 'Basically this means that the oxygen sensor downstream of the catalytic converter   on bank 1 is detecting that the converter is not working as efficiently as it   should be (according to specs). It is part of the vehicle emissions system.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms. The code may be more likely to occur after the engine has had numerous   cold starts in the past 1-2 days.', '', 'A code P0421 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The catalytic converter is no longer functioning properly  An oxygen sensor is not reading (functioning) properly  A sparkplug is fouled up', '  The catalytic converter is no longer functioning properly  An oxygen sensor is not reading (functioning) properly  A sparkplug is fouled up', 'Measure the voltage at the oxygen sensor on Bank 1 (the rear sensor, or the   sensor after the converter). In fact, it would be a good idea to test each oxygen   O2 sensor while you're at it.One thing to note is that many vehicle manufacturers offer a longer warranty   on emissions-related parts. So if you have a newer car but it's out of it's   bumper-to-bumper warranty, there still may be warranty on this type of problem.   Many manufacturers give a five year, unlimited mileage warranty on these items.   It's worth checking into.', ''
137', 'P0422', 'P0422 Main Catalyst Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 1)', 'Main Catalyst Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 1)', 'A vehicles' catalytic converter (catalyst) helps improve tailpipe emissions by oxygenating the exhaust gasses. It helps convert hydrocarbons (HC), Carbon Monoxide (CO), and oxides of Nitrogen (NOx) into water vapor (H20), Carbon Dioxide (CO2), and Nitrogen (N).The PCM (Powertrain control module) monitors the catalyst efficiency by means of a post-catalyst Oxygen sensor. This sensor is used primarily for this purpose. It should switch much slower than the front oxygen sensors. If at any point the PCM detects that the post-catalyst o2 sensor is switching too rapidly (indicating no change between the inlet and outlet of the catalytic converter) it interprets this as a catalyst that isn't functioning properly.Bank 1 is the side of the engine that has cylinder #1.', 'Symptoms of a P0422 DTC may include:  Increased tailpipe emissions  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', '  Increased tailpipe emissions  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', 'Potential causes of a P0422 code include:  Bad or non-functional catalyst  Engine operating out of optimal air:fuel ratio', '  Bad or non-functional catalyst  Engine operating out of optimal air:fuel ratio', 'Catalytic converters contain precious metals like platinum, palladium, rhodium among others. Basically, the cheaper the cat, the less precious metals used. It should be noted that there are some automobile makes that are very finicky when it comes to catalytic converters and the logic that the PCM uses to monitor them. Just because the parts guy says it will work doesn't mean that it will. The reason is that the engineering of the vehicle was done with a high quality catalyst in mind and it can't be replaced with a low cost catalyst. There are also different kinds of catalysts. Some makes will allow for a cheaper catalyst while others simply will not. Toyotas &amp; Subarus are the most notorious for this. Subarus require CARB certified catalysts to keep the check engine light off and won't tolerate an aftermarket catalyst, no matter how expensive.So basically if you have a recurrence of this code after replacing the catalyst with an aftermarket catalyst, this may be your problem. If you have this code and haven't replaced the cat, there's basically two likely causes: The catalyst is no good, or the engine is running out of optimal air:fuel ratio. A tune up or engine repair may correct it. Otherwise you'll need to replace the catalyst.', ''
138', 'P0430', 'P0430 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Catalyst System Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 2)', 'Basically this means that the oxygen sensor downstream of the catalytic converter   on bank 2 is detecting   that the converter is not working as efficiently as it should be (according   to specs). It is part of the vehicle emissions system.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms such as a rough/hard idle when cold.', '', 'A code P0430 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The catalytic converter is no longer functioning properly  An oxygen sensor is not reading (functioning) properly  There is an exhaust leak', '  The catalytic converter is no longer functioning properly  An oxygen sensor is not reading (functioning) properly  There is an exhaust leak', 'First, inspect for exhaust leaks.Next step is to measure the voltage at the oxygen sensor on Bank 2. In fact,   it would be a good idea to test each oxygen O2 sensor while you're at it.One thing to note is that many vehicle manufacturers offer a longer warranty   on emissions-related parts. So if you have a newer car but it's out of it's   bumper-to-bumper warranty, there still may be warranty on this type of problem.   Many manufacturers give a five year, unlimited mileage warranty on these items.   It's worth checking into.', ''
139', 'P0431', 'P0431 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Warm Up Catalyst Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 2)', 'Basically this means that the oxygen sensor downstream of the catalytic converter   on bank 2 is detecting   that the converter is not working as efficiently as it should be (according   to specs). It is part of the vehicle emissions system.', 'You will likely not notice any drivability problems, although there may be   symptoms such as a rough/hard idle when cold.', '', 'A code P0431 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The catalytic converter is no longer functioning properly  An oxygen sensor is not reading (functioning) properly  There is an exhaust leak', '  The catalytic converter is no longer functioning properly  An oxygen sensor is not reading (functioning) properly  There is an exhaust leak', 'Inspect for exhaust leaks. Next step is to measure the voltage at the oxygen   sensor on Bank 2. In fact, it would be a good idea to test each oxygen O2 sensor   while you're at it.One thing to note is that many vehicle manufacturers offer a longer warranty   on emissions-related parts. So if you have a newer car but it's out of it's   bumper-to-bumper warranty, there still may be warranty on this type of problem.   Many manufacturers give a five year, unlimited mileage warranty on these items.   It's worth checking into.', ''
140', 'P0432', 'P0432 Main Catalyst Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 2)', 'Main Catalyst Efficiency Below Threshold (Bank 2)', 'A vehicles' catalytic converter (catalyst) helps improve tailpipe emissions by oxygenating the exhaust gasses. It helps convert hydrocarbons (HC), Carbon Monoxide (CO), and oxides of Nitrogen (NOx) into water vapor (H20), Carbon Dioxide (CO2), and Nitrogen (N).The PCM (Powertrain control module) monitors the catalyst efficiency by means of a post-catalyst Oxygen sensor. This sensor is used primarily for this purpose. It should switch much slower than the front oxygen sensors. If at any point the PCM detects that the post-catalyst o2 sensor is switching too rapidly (indicating no change between the inlet and outlet of the catalytic converter) it interprets this as a catalyst that isn't functioning properly.Bank 2 is the side of the engine that does *not* contain cylinder #1.', 'Symptoms of a P0432 DTC may include:  Increased tailpipe emissions  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', '  Increased tailpipe emissions  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination', 'Potential causes of a P0432 code include:  Bad or non-functional catalyst  Engine operating out of optimal air:fuel ratio', '  Bad or non-functional catalyst  Engine operating out of optimal air:fuel ratio', 'Catalytic converters contain precious metals like platinum, palladium, rhodium among others. Basically, the cheaper the cat, the less precious metals used. It should be noted that there are some automobile makes that are very finicky when it comes to catalytic converters and the logic that the PCM uses to monitor them. Just because the parts guy says it will work doesn't mean that it will. The reason is that the engineering of the vehicle was done with a high quality catalyst in mind and it can't be replaced with a low cost catalyst. There are also different kinds of catalysts. Some makes will allow for a cheaper catalyst while others simply will not. Toyotas &amp; Subarus are the most notorious for this. Subarus require CARB certified catalysts to keep the check engine light off and won't tolerate an aftermarket catalyst, no matter how expensive.So basically if you have a recurrence of this code after replacing the catalyst with an aftermarket catalyst, this may be your problem. If you have this code and haven't replaced the cat, there's basically two likely causes: The catalyst is no good, or the engine is running out of optimal air:fuel ratio. A tune up or engine repair may correct it. Otherwise you'll need to replace the catalyst.', ''
141', 'P0440', 'P0440 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Malfunction', 'This indicates that a part of the EVAPcontrol system is no longer fuctioning correctly. The EVAP system consistsof many parts, including (but not limited to) the gas cap, fuel lines, carboncanister, purge valve, and other hosesThe (EVAP) emission  control system prevents the escape of fuel vapors from a vehicle's fuel system. Fuel vapors are routed  by hoses  to a charcoal canister for storage. Later, when the engine is running a purge  control valve opens allowing intake vacuum to siphon the fuel vapors into  the  engine.', 'You likely won't notice any drivability problems.', '', 'A code P0440 could mean one or more of the following has happened:  The gas cap is not installed or working properly  The purge solenoid has failed  The canister is plugged and not working properly', '  The gas cap is not installed or working properly  The purge solenoid has failed  The canister is plugged and not working properly', 'With a P0440 OBD-II trouble code, diagnosis can be tricky at times. Here  are some things to try:  Remove and reinstall the gas cap, clear the code, and drive for a day and     see if the codes come back.  Inspect the EVAP system for cuts/holes in tubes/hoses  Inspect for damaged or disconnected hoses around the Evap purge solenoid  Check and/or replace the sensor  Check and/or replace the purge valve  Have a professional use a smoke machine to detect leaksP0440 Repair VideoWe are not affiliated with the producers of this diagnostic video, however we found it to be of excellent quality and worth sharing!Other EVAP DTCs: P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', '  Remove and reinstall the gas cap, clear the code, and drive for a day and     see if the codes come back.  Inspect the EVAP system for cuts/holes in tubes/hoses  Inspect for damaged or disconnected hoses around the Evap purge solenoid  Check and/or replace the sensor  Check and/or replace the purge valve  Have a professional use a smoke machine to detect leaks'
142', 'P0441', 'P0441 Evaporative Emission Control System Incorrect Purge Flow', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Incorrect Purge Flow', 'This indicates that a part of the EVAP   control system is no longer functioning correctly. The EVAP system consists   of many parts, including (but not limited to) the gas cap, fuel lines, carbon   canister, purge valve, and other hoses. The (EVAP) emission control system prevents   the escape of fuel vapors from a vehicle's fuel system. Fuel vapors are routed   by hoses to a charcoal canister for storage. Later, when the engine is running   a purge control valve opens allowing intake vacuum to siphon the fuel vapors   into the engine.EVAP emission canister purge is controlled by a valve which allows engine vacuum   to pull stored fuel vapors from fuel tank into the engine to be burned, rather   than be vented to atmosphere. A vacuum switch is used to detect when flow exists.   If the PCM commands purge and sees that the switch is closed (indicating no   detected purge flow) P0441 is set.', 'Likely, no symptoms will be discernible to the driver, other than the illuminated   Check Engine Light.', '', 'A code P0441 could mean one or more of the following has happened:  Bad vacuum switch  Broken or damaged EVAP line or canister  Open in PCM purge command circuit  Open or short in Voltage feed circuit to Purge Solenoid  Faulty purge solenoid  Restriction in EVAP solenoid, line or canister  Corrosion or resistance in purge connector  Bad PCM', '  Bad vacuum switch  Broken or damaged EVAP line or canister  Open in PCM purge command circuit  Open or short in Voltage feed circuit to Purge Solenoid  Faulty purge solenoid  Restriction in EVAP solenoid, line or canister  Corrosion or resistance in purge connector  Bad PCM', 'With a P0441 OBD-II trouble code, diagnosis can be tricky at times. Here  are some things to try:  Common Chrysler fix - Replace Leak Detection Pump / LDP  Repair damaged EVAP lines or canister  Repair open or short in voltage feed circuit to Purge Solenoid  Repair open in PCM purge command circuit  Replace purge Solenoid   Replace vacuum switch  Repair restriction in Evap line or canister or solenoid   Repair resistance in purge connector  Replace PCMOther EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', '  Common Chrysler fix - Replace Leak Detection Pump / LDP  Repair damaged EVAP lines or canister  Repair open or short in voltage feed circuit to Purge Solenoid  Repair open in PCM purge command circuit  Replace purge Solenoid   Replace vacuum switch  Repair restriction in Evap line or canister or solenoid   Repair resistance in purge connector  Replace PCM'
143', 'P0442', 'P0442 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Leak Detected (small leak)', 'The vehicle's PCM (powertrain control module) tests the evaporative emissions (EVAP) system for large and small leaks among other conditions. In the case of this DTC, it indicates a fuel vapor leak in the EVAP control system. It means a very   small leak has been detected. In fact, the leak can be from a hole as small   as 0.04&quot; in diameter. The (EVAP) emission control system prevents the escape of fuel vapors from a vehicle's fuel system.Fuel vapors are routed by hoses   to a charcoal canister for storage. Later, when the engine is running a purge   control valve opens allowing intake vacuum to siphon the fuel vapors into the   engine.', 'The only thing you will notice is the Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) a.k.a. Check Engine Light will be illuminated. You likely won't notice any drivability problems although sometimes a fuel odor may be noticed.', '', 'A code P0442 most likely means one or more of the following has happened:  A loose or improperly affixed gas cap  A non-conforming gas cap (i.e. not factory/original brand)  A small leak/hole in a fuel vapor hose/tube  Other small leak in EVAP system  Faulty vent o-ring seal  Defective vent valve  Defective purge valve  Defective leak detection pump', '  A loose or improperly affixed gas cap  A non-conforming gas cap (i.e. not factory/original brand)  A small leak/hole in a fuel vapor hose/tube  Other small leak in EVAP system  Faulty vent o-ring seal  Defective vent valve  Defective purge valve  Defective leak detection pump', 'With a P0442, the most common repair is to:  Remove and reinstall the gas cap, clear the codes, and drive for a day and     see if the codes come back.  Otherwise, replace the gas cap (we recommend an OEM not aftermarket part), or  Inspect the EVAP system for cuts/holes in tubes/hosesMore advanced troubleshooting steps include:  Using an advanced scan tool, perform an EVAP leak test  Verify operation of the EVAP purge solenoid / valve  Perform a smoke test to see where the leak isGenerally there are vehicle and model specific procedures for proper diagnosis of this DTC.Sources: About.comOther EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 -P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', '  Remove and reinstall the gas cap, clear the codes, and drive for a day and     see if the codes come back.  Otherwise, replace the gas cap (we recommend an OEM not aftermarket part), or  Inspect the EVAP system for cuts/holes in tubes/hoses'
144', 'P0443', 'P0443 - Evaporative Emission Control System Purge Control Valve Circuit', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Purge Control Valve Circuit', '', 'P0443 trouble code symptoms could be just an malfunction indicator lamp (MIL)   illumination. There may be no drivability problems at all. But, it's also possible   to have a lean condition or a rough running engine if the purge valve is stuck   open. Usually though, these symptoms are accompanied by other EVAP codes. Another   symptom may be excessive pressure in the gas tank in the form of a &quot;whooshing&quot;   sound when the cap is removed, indicating a purge valve that isn't working at   all or stuck closed.', '', 'To cause a P0443, there has to be a problem with the purge control CIRCUIT,   not necessarily the valve. Usually they are a unit housing the valve and the   solenoid as an assembly. Or it could be comprised of a separate solenoid with   vacuum lines to a purge valve. That said, it could be any of the following:   Bad purge solenoid (internal short or open)   Wiring harness chafing or rubbing another component causing short or open     on control circuit   Connector worn, broken or shorted due to water intrusion   Driver circuit inside powertrain control module (PCM) is bad', '   Bad purge solenoid (internal short or open)   Wiring harness chafing or rubbing another component causing short or open     on control circuit   Connector worn, broken or shorted due to water intrusion   Driver circuit inside powertrain control module (PCM) is bad', '1. Using a scan tool, command the purge solenoid to activate. Listen or feel   for a clicking coming from the purge solenoid. It should click once, or on some   models it may click repeatedly.2. If it doesn't click with scan tool activation, unplug the connector and   examing the solenoid and connector for damage, water, etc. Then check for battery   voltage on the feed wire with the key on. If you have battery voltage, then   ground the control side manually using a jumper wire and see if the valve clicks.   If it does, then you know the solenoid is working properly but there is a problem   with the control circuit. If it doesn't click when you manually ground it, replace   the purge solenoid.3. To check for a problem on the control circuit (if the solenoid tests okay   and you have voltage to the solenoid) plug the solenoid back in and remove the   control circuit (ground) wire from the ECM connector (If you're unsure how to   do this, do not attempt). With the ground wire removed from the ECM, turn the   key on and then manually ground the Purge valve control wire. The solenoid should   click. If it does, then you know there is no problem with the control wire to   the solenoid and there is a problem with the ECM purge solenoid driver circuit   in the ECM. You'll need a new ECM. However if it doesn't click, then there must   be an open in the wiring between the ECM and and the solenoid. You must find   it and repair it.Other EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', ''
145', 'P0444', 'P0444 Evap. Purge Control Valve Circuit Open', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Purge Control Valve Circuit Open', 'On vehicles equipped with Evaporative emission control systems also known as EVAP, the engine  draws in excessive fuel vapors from the gas tank that would otherwise be vented into the  atmosphere.The fuel vapor is routed through a vacuum line to the engine's intake and the  purge valve/solenoid meters the desired amount of fuel vapors, controlled by the vehicles  powertrain control module (PCM) or engine control module (ECM).  The PCM/ECM monitors the  voltage to the purge control valve and has detected no voltage change with the purge valve  commanded on.Note: This code is similar to codes P0443 and P0445.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
146', 'P0445', 'P0445 Evap. Purge Control Valve Circuit Shorted', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Purge Control Valve Circuit Shorted', 'On vehicles equipped with Evaporative emission control systems also known as EVAP, the engine  draws in excessive fuel vapors from the gas tank that would otherwise be vented into the  atmosphere.The fuel vapor is routed through a vacuum line to the engine's intake and the  purge valve/solenoid meters the desired amount of fuel vapors, controlled by the vehicles  powertrain control module (PCM) or engine control module (ECM).  The PCM/ECM monitors the  voltage to the purge control valve and has detected a lower voltage than expected.Note: This code is similar to codes P0443 and P0444.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
147', 'P0446', 'P0446 Evaporative Emmission Control System Vent Control Circuit', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Control Circuit Malfunction', 'Evap vent valve has only one purpose. It closes in order to seal the vent so   the EVAP system can pressurize and ensure there are no leaks. Evap vent valve   is usually supplied Batt. voltage with key on.The ECM's driver controls the   ground, and when grounded, activates the valve (closing it). If the ECM detects   a short to ground, and open,or a short to battery voltage on the control circuit,   P0446 will set. Code also may refer to ECM detecting that EVAP system is unable   to achieve or maintain vacuum during test. ', 'There will be no obvious symptoms to driver, other than Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination.', '', 'A code P0446 could mean one or more of the following has happened:  Faulty vent valve  Open, short or excessive resistance on Vent valve control circuit   Blockage of vent valve  Bad PCM', '  Faulty vent valve  Open, short or excessive resistance on Vent valve control circuit   Blockage of vent valve  Bad PCM', 'With a P0446 OBD-II trouble code, here are some things to try:  Replace Vent valve  Repair open, short, or resistance problem in control circuit  Repair open, or short, or resistance problem in power circuit  Replace PCMOther EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', '  Replace Vent valve  Repair open, short, or resistance problem in control circuit  Repair open, or short, or resistance problem in power circuit  Replace PCM'
148', 'P0447', 'P0447 Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Valve/Solenoid Circuit Open', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Valve/Solenoid Circuit Open', 'The Powertrain Control Module (PCM) has detected an open within the circuit that controls the vent valve or solenoid for evaporative emission systems vapor. As fuel sits in the tank it lets out fuel vapor, while driving this vent opens and allows the vapors to be circulated into the engine intake manifold, a charcoal canister or into the atmosphere, depending on the vehicle. This vent valve is apart of the simple, yet complicated evaporative emissions system. ', 'Symptoms of a P0447 DTC will include Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination, you will likely not notice any other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes may include:  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM fault', '  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM fault', 'Some steps to take to diagnose and repair this trouble code include the following:Check your fuses, there may be a fuse that powers the vent solenoid.Check for a rubbed-through or chafed wiring harness. Check both wires to see if they are Open to each other, to ground or power.Visually inspect the vent valve for cracks or damage.Trace the wires to and from the PCM and check for continuity continuity using a digital volt ohm meter (DVOM).If you have access to an advanced level scan tool, actuate the valve while reading power and ground at the connector or by simply using a bulb wired to both terminals, it will light up if power and ground are OK.Using a DVOM, check the resistance of the vent, in most cases the resistance reading should be low, refer to the manufacturer&rsquo;s specification or compare it to a new one. Too high or low a value indicates a faulty coil inside the valve, thusly meaning replacement is necessary.  This code seems to be prevalent on Dodge, Chrsyler, and Jeep products. In those cases the vent valve was bad. With GM products (specifically pickups), GM has released a new updated valve assembly.Finally, remove the valve, you may be able to access the pintle inside and it simply could just be sticking from fuel residue. Clean it and retest. Other EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', ''
149', 'P0448', 'P0448 Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Valve/Solenoid Circuit Shorted', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Valve/Solenoid Circuit Shorted', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may vary depending on the model.The Powertrain Control Module (PCM) has detected that the circuit is shorted together that controls the vent valve or solenoid for evaporative emission systems vapor. In this case the code will also be thrown when the valve is stuck closed.As fuel sits in the tank it lets out fuel vapor, while driving this vent opens and allows the vapors to be circulated into the engine intake manifold, a charcoal canister or into the atmosphere, depending on the vehicle. This vent valve is apart of the simple, yet complicated evaporative emissions system. ', 'Symptoms of a P0448 DTC will include Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination, you will likely not notice any other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes may include:  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM fault', '  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM fault', 'Some steps to take to diagnose and repair this trouble code include the following:Check your fuses, there may be a fuse that powers the vent solenoid.Check for a rubbed-through or chafed wiring harness. Check both wires to see if they are shorted to each other, to ground or power.Visually inspect the vent valve for cracks or damage.Trace the wires to and from the PCM and check for continuity continuity using a digital volt ohm meter (DVOM).If you have access to an advanced level scan tool, actuate the valve while reading power and ground at the connector or by simply using a bulb wired to both terminals, it will light up if power and ground are OK.Using a DVOM, check the resistance of the vent, in most cases the resistance reading should be low, refer to the manufacturer&rsquo;s specification or compare it to a new one. Too high or low a value indicates a faulty coil inside the valve, thusly meaning replacement is necessary.  This code seems to be prevalent on Dodge, Chrsyler, and Jeep products. In those cases the vent valve was bad. With GM products (specifically pickups), GM has released a new updated valve assembly.Finally, remove the valve, you may be able to access the pintle inside and it simply could just be sticking from fuel residue. Clean it and retest. Other EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', ''
150', 'P0449', 'P0449 Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Valve/Solenoid Circuit Malfunction', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Vent Valve/Solenoid Circuit Malfunction', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may vary depending on the model.The Powertrain Control Module (PCM) / Engine Management Computer (EMC) / Engine Control Module (ECM) has detected a fault with the circuit that controls the vent for evaporative emission systems vapor.As fuel sits in the tank it lets out fuel vapor, while driving this vent opens and allows the vapors to be circulated into the engine intake manifold, a charcoal canister or into the atmosphere, depending on the vehicle. This vent valve is apart of the simple, yet complicated evaporative emissions system. ', 'Symptoms of a P0449 DTC will include Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination, you will likely not notice any other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes may include:  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM/EMC/ECM fault', '  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM/EMC/ECM fault', 'Some steps to take to diagnose and repair this trouble code include the following:Check your fuses, there may be a fuse that powers the vent solenoid.Check for a rubbed-through or chafed wiring harness. Check both wires to see if they are shorted to each other, to ground or power.Visually inspect the vent valve for cracks or damage.Trace the wires to and from the PCM/EMC/ECM and check for continuity continuity using a digital volt ohm meter (DVOM).If you have access to an advanced level scan tool, actuate the valve while reading power and ground at the connector or by simply using a bulb wired to both terminals, it will light up if power and ground are OK.Using a DVOM, check the resistance of the vent, in most cases the resistance reading should be low, refer to the manufacturer's specification or compare it to a new one. Too high or low a value indicates a faulty coil inside the valve, thusly meaning replacement is necessary.  This code seems to be prevalent on Dodge, Chrsyler, and Jeep products. In those cases the vent valve was bad. With GM products (specifically pickups), GM has released a new updated valve assembly.Finally, remove the valve, you may be able to access the pintle inside and it simply could just be sticking from fuel residue. Clean it and retest. Other EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0452 - P0453 - P0455 - P0456', ''
151', 'P0452', 'P0452 EVAP Pressure Sensor/Switch Low', 'Generic: Evaporative Emission System Pressure Sensor/Switch Low  Ford: FTP Sensor Circuit Low Conditions  GM: Fuel Tank Pressure Sensor Circuit Low Input Conditions  Nissan: Evaporative emission (EVAP) canister purge system - pressure sensor malfunction', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The DTC P0452 is relates to an emission system malfunction. Your PCM or powertrain management computer relies on a fuel tank pressure sensor to detect fluctuations in the tanks internal pressure. Depending on the make of your car, the sensor could be located in the fuel purge line coming off the fuel module on the top of the fuel tank or in the top of the tank itself. The PCM has determined that the system pressure is unusually low indicating a problem in the system, not necessarily just at the sensor. This sensor is used primarily for emission control strategy only. Your fuel tank will have a tendency to build fuel vapor pressure when the temperatures are high and a vacuum when under a load. The sensor sends a voltage to the computer for analysis, the value of the current is dependent on the pressure or vacuum. The code relates to all vehicles, however they differ in the sensor output. For instance, Buick's sensor produces about 0.1 volt with positive pressure in the tank and up to 5 volts with negative pressure, as in a vacuum. A Honda's sensor increases the voltage signal as positive pressure builds in the tank. Either way, the sensors serve the same purpose. They all convert pressure to a voltage that increases or decreases with pressure or vacuum decay. ', 'The only symptom you will notice with a P0452 code is the  service engine soon or check engine light will illuminate. In rare cases you may smell a noticeable fuel vapor.', '', '', '', '', ''
152', 'P0453', 'P0453 - Evaporative Emissions Control System Pressure Sensor High Input', 'Evaporative Emissions Control System Pressure Sensor High Input', '', 'There will likely be no noticeable symptoms along with this code other than   the MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp), commonly known as Check Engine Light illumination.   However, there may be noticeable fuel odors in some cases.', '', 'A P0453 DTC trouble code may be caused by one or more of the following:  Open on FTP sensor signal wire   Short to voltage on FTP sensor signal wire  Bad FTP sensor   Abnormally high pressure in fuel tank due to blockage in EVAP purge hoses     or overfilled tank   Loose/damaged FTP sensor connector   Loss of ground to the sensor ', '  Open on <a href="/faq/fuel-tank-pressure-ftp-sensor.php">FTP sensor signal wire   Short to voltage on <a href="/faq/fuel-tank-pressure-ftp-sensor.php">FTP sensor signal wire  Bad FTP sensor   Abnormally high pressure in fuel tank due to blockage in EVAP purge hoses     or overfilled tank   Loose/damaged <a href="/faq/fuel-tank-pressure-ftp-sensor.php">FTP sensor connector   Loss of ground to the sensor ', 'Using an scan tool access FTP sensor value with Key on Engine off (KOEO). Normal   value is usually somewhere near 2.5 Volts at atmospheric pressure (may fluctuate   some due to altitude). It shouldn't ever be above 4.5 Volts.1) If it is close to 2.7V with the gas cap off, the problem is likely intermittent.   Using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter, measure the voltage on the signal wire while   trying to induce the problem by wiggle testing all the wiring at the FTP sensor.   If the voltage fluctuates when wiggle testing, check for connector problems;   i.e. water in the connector, broken or chafed wiring.2) If the value shown on the scan tool is above 4.5V, unplug the sensor (if   possible) and check for voltage again. If the high voltage is still present   when unplugged, inspect wiring harness for a short to voltage on the signal   wire. If the high voltage disappears when unplugging the sensor, check for a   good ground to the sensor and proper reference voltage. If you have a good ground   and 5 Volts reference voltage, replace the FTP sensor since it's likely shorted   out. Other EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0455 - P0456', ''
153', 'P0455', 'P0455 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Evaporative Emission Control System Leak Detected (no purge flow   or large leak)', 'This indicates a fuel vapor leak or lack of purge flow in the EVAP control   system. It means a large leak has been detected.The (EVAP) emission control   system prevents the escape of fuel vapors from a vehicle's fuel system. Fuel   vapors are routed by hoses to a charcoal canister for storage. Later, when the   engine is running a purge control valve opens allowing intake vacuum to siphon   the fuel vapors into the engine.', 'You likely won't notice any drivability problems.', '', 'A code p0455 most likely means one or more of the following has happened:  A loose or improperly affixed gas cap  A non-conforming gas cap (i.e. not factory/original brand)  Other leak or damaged piece in EVAP system', '  A loose or improperly affixed gas cap  A non-conforming gas cap (i.e. not factory/original brand)  Other leak or damaged piece in EVAP system', 'With a p0455, the most common repair is to:  Remove and reinstall the gas cap, clear the codes, and drive for a day and     see if the codes come back.  Otherwise, replace the gas cap, and/or  Inspect the EVAP system for cuts/holes in tubes/hoses (you may hear a vacuum     noise or smell fuel), repair if necessarySources: B.   LongoSee also: P0455.com Other EVAP DTCs: P0440 - P0441 - P0442 - P0443 - P0444 - P0445 - P0446 - P0447 - P0448 - P0449 - P0452 - P0453 - P0456', '  Remove and reinstall the gas cap, clear the codes, and drive for a day and     see if the codes come back.  Otherwise, replace the gas cap, and/or  Inspect the EVAP system for cuts/holes in tubes/hoses (you may hear a vacuum     noise or smell fuel), repair if necessary'
154', 'P0463', 'P0463 Fuel Level Sensor Circuit High Input', 'Fuel Level Sensor Circuit High Input', 'The fuel level sensor (sender) is located in the fuel tank usually integral to the fuel pump module. Usually they cannot be replaced without replacing the fuel pump module, though there are exceptions. There is a float attached to an arm that travels along a resistor which is grounded to the tank, frame or has a dedicated ground circuit. Voltage is supplied to the sender and the ground path changes according to fuel level. How much voltage depends on the system but 5 volts isn't uncommon.As the fuel level changes, the float moves the arm and changes the resistance to ground which varies the voltage signal. This signal may travel to a fuel pump computer module or directly to the instrument cluster module. Depending on the system, the fuel pump computer module may only monitor the resistance to ground and then relay the fuel level information to the instrument panel. If the fuel level signal to the fuel pump module (or instrument cluster module or PCM (powertrain control module)) goes above 5 volts for a specific amount of time, then the module that is monitoring the fuel level circuit will record this fault code.', 'Symptoms of a P0463 DTC may include:  Mil (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Fuel level gauge may fluctuate abnormally or read empty or full  Fuel light may illuminate and sound alarm', '  Mil (Malfunction indicator lamp) illumination  Fuel level gauge may fluctuate abnormally or read empty or full  Fuel light may illuminate and sound alarm', 'Potential causes of a P0463 code include:  The signal circuit to the fuel sender is open or shorted to B+ (Battery voltage)  The ground circuit is open, or ground path may have high resistance due to rust or missing ground strap on fuel tank  Damage to the fuel tank could cause problem in fuel level circuit  There's an open in the fuel lever sensor's resistor to ground  Possibly faulty instrument cluster  Less likely is the possibility that the PCM, BCM, or Fuel pump computer module has failed', '  The signal circuit to the fuel sender is open or shorted to B+ (Battery voltage)  The ground circuit is open, or ground path may have high resistance due to rust or missing ground strap on fuel tank  Damage to the fuel tank could cause problem in fuel level circuit  There's an open in the fuel lever sensor's resistor to ground  Possibly faulty instrument cluster  Less likely is the possibility that the PCM, BCM, or Fuel pump computer module has failed', 'Fuel pump senders normally last the life of the fuel pump. So if you have this code present, do a visual inspection of the fuel tank and wiring harness. Look for damage to the tank indicating impact that may have damaged the fuel pump or sender. Look for missing ground strap or a rusty ground where the fuel tank is grounded to the frame. Check for damage to the wiring harness connector. Repair as needed. Find out what kind of system you have and verify that voltage to the fuel level sensor is present at the fuel pump wiring harness. If not, repair the open or short in the wiring.Doing a voltage drop test on the ground circuit can determine if there is a high resistance path in the ground circuit. You can perform this by using a voltmeter and connecting one lead to the battery ground post and the other to the fuel level sensor ground at the tank. Turn the key on (preferably the engine should be running). Ideally it should be 100 millivolts or less (.1 volts). Anything close to 1 volt indicates a current problem or a developing problem. Repair/clean the fuel level sensor ground as needed. It's not impossible that the instrument cluster has failed internally or on the printed circuit board (if applicable). These are very difficult for the layman to test. But if you have access to a wiring diagram you may be able to remove the cluster and see the damaged circuit if it's located on the printed circuit board, but otherwise you'll need a scan tool that will communicate with the instrument cluster.A simple way to test the fuel level circuit is to provide a good ground to the fuel level sensor at the fuel tank connector. With the key on the fuel gauge should go to one extreme or the other. Removing the ground path completely should cause the gauge to do the opposite. If the gauge responds, you know the wiring that supplies voltage and ground to the fuel level sensor is good and that the instrument cluster is likely okay. The likely suspect would be the fuel level sensor itself. The fuel tank may need removal to gain access to the fuel pump module in the tank. A PCM or BCM (Body control module) failure isn't impossible but highly unlikely. Don't suspect this first.', ''
155', 'P0498', 'P0498 Evaporative Emission System Vent Valve Control Circuit Low', 'Evaporative Emission System Vent Valve Control Circuit Low', 'The Powertrain Control Module (PCM) / Engine Management Computer (EMC) / Engine Control Module (ECM) has detected a fault with the circuit that controls the vent for evaporative emission systems vapor.As fuel sits in the tank it lets out fuel vapor, while driving this vent opens and allows the vapors to be circulated into the engine intake manifold, a charcoal canister or into the atmosphere, depending on the vehicle. This vent valve is apart of the simple, yet complicated evaporative emissions system. ', 'Symptoms of a P0498 DTC will include Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination, you will likely not notice any other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes may include:  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM/EMC/ECM fault', '  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM/EMC/ECM fault', 'Some steps to take to diagnose and repair this trouble code include the following:Check your fuses, there may be a fuse that powers the vent solenoid.Check for a rubbed-through or chafed wiring harness. Check both wires to see if they are shorted to each other, to ground or power.Visually inspect the vent valve for cracks or damage.Trace the wires to and from the PCM/EMC/ECM and check for continuity continuity using a digital volt ohm meter (DVOM).If you have access to an advanced level scan tool, actuate the valve while reading power and ground at the connector or by simply using a bulb wired to both terminals, it will light up if power and ground are OK.Using a DVOM, check the resistance of the vent, in most cases the resistance reading should be low, refer to the manufacturer&rsquo;s specification or compare it to a new one. Too Low or low a value indicates a faulty coil inside the valve, thusly meaning replacement is necessary.  This code seems to be prevalent on Dodge, Chrsyler, and Jeep products. In those cases the vent valve was bad. With GM products (specifically pickups), GM has released a new updated valve assembly.Finally, remove the valve, you may be able to access the pintle inside and it simply could just be sticking from fuel residue. Clean it and retest. ', ''
156', 'P0499', 'P0499 Evaporative Emission System Vent Valve Control Circuit High', 'Evaporative Emission System Vent Valve Control Circuit High', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may vary depending on the model.The Powertrain Control Module (PCM) / Engine Management Computer (EMC) / Engine Control Module (ECM) has detected a fault with the circuit that controls the vent for evaporative emission systems vapor.As fuel sits in the tank it lets out fuel vapor, while driving this vent opens and allows the vapors to be circulated into the engine intake manifold, a charcoal canister or into the atmosphere, depending on the vehicle. This vent valve is apart of the simple, yet complicated evaporative emissions system. ', 'Symptoms of a P0499 DTC will include Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination, you will likely not notice any other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes may include:  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM/EMC/ECM fault', '  Faulty vent valve  Wire/circuit issue  PCM/EMC/ECM fault', 'Some steps to take to diagnose and repair this trouble code include the following:Check your fuses, there may be a fuse that powers the vent solenoid.Check for a rubbed-through or chafed wiring harness. Check both wires to see if they are shorted to each other, to ground or power.Visually inspect the vent valve for cracks or damage.Trace the wires to and from the PCM/EMC/ECM and check for continuity continuity using a digital volt ohm meter (DVOM).If you have access to an advanced level scan tool, actuate the valve while reading power and ground at the connector or by simply using a bulb wired to both terminals, it will light up if power and ground are OK.Using a DVOM, check the resistance of the vent, in most cases the resistance reading should be low, refer to the manufacturer&rsquo;s specification or compare it to a new one. Too high or low a value indicates a faulty coil inside the valve, thusly meaning replacement is necessary.  This code seems to be prevalent on Dodge, Chrsyler, and Jeep products. In those cases the vent valve was bad. With GM products (specifically pickups), GM has released a new updated valve assembly.Finally, remove the valve, you may be able to access the pintle inside and it simply could just be sticking from fuel residue. Clean it and retest. ', ''
157', 'P0500', 'P0500 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Vehicle Speed Sensor Malfunction', 'Basically this means that the vehicle's speed as read by the Vehicle   Speed Sensor (VSS) is not working properly.', 'Symptoms of a P0500 DTC may include:   loss of anti-lock brakes  the &quot;anti-lock&quot; or &quot;brake&quot; warning lamps on the dash     may be lit  the speedometer or odometer may not work properly (or at all)  your vehicle's RPM limiter may be decreased  the shifting of an automatic transmission may become erratic  other symptoms may also be present', '  loss of anti-lock brakes  the &quot;anti-lock&quot; or &quot;brake&quot; warning lamps on the dash     may be lit  the speedometer or odometer may not work properly (or at all)  your vehicle's RPM limiter may be decreased  the shifting of an automatic transmission may become erratic  other symptoms may also be present', 'A code P0500 may mean that one or more of the following has happened:  The Vehicle Speed Sensor (VSS) is not reading (functioning) properly  There is a broken/frayed wire leading to the vehicle speed sensor  The vehicle's PCM is not correctly configured for the actual tire size on     the vehicle', '  The Vehicle Speed Sensor (VSS) is not reading (functioning) properly  There is a broken/frayed wire leading to the vehicle speed sensor  The vehicle's PCM is not correctly configured for the actual tire size on     the vehicle', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.Next, check all wiring and connectors that lead to the speed sensor. The location   of the sensor depends on your vehicle. The sensor could be on the rear axle,   transmission, or perhaps the wheel hub (brake) assembly.If the wiring and connectors are OK, then check the voltage at the speed sensor.   Again, the exact procedure wil depend on your make and model of vehicle.If everything looks OK, replace the sensor.Further Reading  Vehicle     Speed Sensor (VSS) Description and OperationOther related VSS DTCs: P0501 - P0502 - P0503', '  <a href="http://www.engine-light-help.com/speed-sensor.html" target="_blank">Vehicle     Speed Sensor (VSS) Description and Operation'
158', 'P0501', 'P0501 - Vehicle Speed Sensor Range/Performance', 'Vehicle Speed Sensor Range/Performance', '', 'This code is different from the P0500 code in the fact   that it may not trigger the malfunction indicator light (MIL). Potential symptoms   are basically the same as the P0500 VSS code:  loss of anti-lock brakes  the &quot;anti-lock&quot; or &quot;brake&quot; warning lamps on the dash     may be lit  the speedometer or odometer may not work properly (or at all)  your vehicle's RPM limiter may be decreased  the shifting of an automatic transmission may become erratic  other symptoms may also be present', '  loss of anti-lock brakes  the &quot;anti-lock&quot; or &quot;brake&quot; warning lamps on the dash     may be lit  the speedometer or odometer may not work properly (or at all)  your vehicle's RPM limiter may be decreased  the shifting of an automatic transmission may become erratic  other symptoms may also be present', 'A P0501 DTC trouble code may be caused by one or more of the following:  The Vehicle Speed Sensor (VSS) is not reading (functioning) properly  There is a broken/frayed wire leading to the vehicle speed sensor  The vehicle's PCM is not correctly configured for the actual tire size on     the vehicle', '  The Vehicle Speed Sensor (VSS) is not reading (functioning) properly  There is a broken/frayed wire leading to the vehicle speed sensor  The vehicle's PCM is not correctly configured for the actual tire size on     the vehicle', 'The simplest thing to do is to reset the code and see if it comes back.Next, check all wiring and connectors that lead to the speed sensor. The location   of the sensor depends on your vehicle. The sensor could be on the rear axle,   transmission, or perhaps the wheel hub (brake) assembly.If the wiring and connectors are OK, then check the voltage at the speed sensor.   Again, the exact procedure wil depend on your make and model of vehicle.If everything looks OK, replace the sensor.Further Reading  Vehicle     Speed Sensor (VSS) Description and OperationOther related VSS DTCs: P0500 - P0502 - P0503', '  <a href="http://www.engine-light-help.com/speed-sensor.html" target="_blank">Vehicle     Speed Sensor (VSS) Description and Operation'
159', 'P0504', 'P0504 Brake Switch A/B Correlation Code', 'Brake Switch A/B Correlation', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.Your vehicle's powertrain control module (PCM) has set this P0504 code in response to a recognized failure in the brake light circuit. The vehicle's computer monitors all circuits for abnormalities such as lack of voltage or an out of range condition.The brake light switch is tied into several circuits all of which can result in a hazardous situation. The brake switch itself consists of two signal outputs and if there is a malfunction in the switch, it is detected and sets this code. This is not an expensive proposition in terms of the cost of the part or the labor involved in the replacement. The safety factor demands a repair as soon as possible.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
160', 'P0505', 'P0505 IAC Malfunction', 'IAC (Idle Air Control) System Malfunction', 'The IAC (Idle Air Control) valve controls the idle speed of the engine. At idle the throttle plate is closed, of course. The IAC is computer controlled and allows only a certain amount of air around the throttle plate. This metered air controls the idle speed. The IAC has a &quot;plunger&quot; or &quot;shutter&quot; that moves to open or close the bypass air passageway.The more air the IAC allows around the throttle plate, the higher the idle. The PCM (Powertrain Control Module) uses the IAC valve to keep the idle speed correct with varying engine demands. Can be a three or four wire sensor depending on the model.The PCM monitors voltages of the IAC circuits and if it detects an incorrect voltage on one or more of the IAC motor circuits it will set P0505. NOTE: Problems with the IAC would only be noticeable at idle or when throttle is closed.', 'Symptoms may include:  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine stalls and may not idle unless throttle is depressed  Intermittently stalls when letting off the throttle  Engine may idle too high', '  MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) illumination  Engine stalls and may not idle unless throttle is depressed  Intermittently stalls when letting off the throttle  Engine may idle too high', 'Potential causes of an P0505 code include:  IAC motor connector is damaged (check connector and pins for damage, and moisture)  One or more IAC circuits open or shorted to ground  One or more IAC circuits are shorted to voltage  IAC has failed  PCM has failed', '  IAC motor connector is damaged (check connector and pins for damage, and moisture)  One or more IAC circuits open or shorted to ground  One or more IAC circuits are shorted to voltage  IAC has failed  PCM has failed', 'This should be a fairly straightforward diagnosis. Start by clearing the fault codes. Then unplug the IAC and start the engine (This may cause other IAC codes to set. Just ignore them for now). If the P0505 code doesn't reset, replace the IAC. It is internally shorting one of the IAC circuits. If the code DOES return after unplugging the IAC and starting the engine, then you know it isn't the IAC motor. Visually check the wiring harness all the way back to the PCM. You may need to visually inspect the harness by removing all the insulation off the wires. It is possible that the wires could be shorting to eachother or to other wires in the harness. If there are no wiring problems, and the code keeps returning with the IAC unplugged, you can check the PCM by removing the IAC wires from the PCM connector (or clipping the wires in a location where they can be repaired easily) and then start the engine (If you're not sure, don't do it. Take it to a qualified professional). Now if the code doesn't reset there is a problem with the wiring. Check for continuity on all the IAC wires. Any resistance points to a problem. Check for voltage on any(At this point there shouldn't be any voltages on the wires because they're clipped at one end and unplugged at the IAC). Repair as necessary. But if the P0505 code DOES reset after removing the IAC wires from the PCM connector (or clipping them), replace the PCM, there's a problem internally on the IAC control circuit. Other related DTCs: P0506, P0507', ''
161', 'P0506', 'P0506 - Idle Air Control System RPM Lower Than Expected', 'Idle Air Control (IAC) System RPM Lower Than Expected', '', 'Most likely the only thing you'll notice is the idle speed is lower than normal   so it will likely be rougher. There are potentially other symptoms as well.   Of course, when trouble codes are set, the MIL (malfunction indicator lamp,   a.k.a. the check engine light) illuminates.', '', 'A P0506 DTC trouble code may be caused by one or more of the following:   A vacuum leak   An air restriction in the intake air path or exhuast  A faulty positive crankcase ventilation (PCV) valve  Damaged/failed/dirty throttle body  Internal engine problem  Failed PCM', '   A vacuum leak   An air restriction in the intake air path or exhuast  A faulty positive crankcase ventilation (PCV) valve  Damaged/failed/dirty throttle body  Internal engine problem  Failed PCM', 'This DTC is more of an informational code, so if there are any other codes   set, diagnose them first. If there are no other codes, inspect for vacuum leaks,   restrictions, and damage. If there are no symptoms other than the DTC itself,   just clear the code and see whether it returns.Other related DTCs: P0505, P0507', ''
162', 'P0507', 'P0507 - Idle Air Control System RPM Higher Than Expected', 'Idle Air Control (IAC) System RPM Higher Than Expected', '', 'Most likely you'll notice the idle speed is higher than normal. There are potentially   other symptoms as well. Of course, when trouble codes are set, the MIL (malfunction   indicator lamp, a.k.a. the check engine light) illuminates.', '', 'A P0507 DTC trouble code may be caused by one or more of the following:  A vacuum leak   Leaking air intake after the throttle body  EGR valve leaking vacuum  A faulty positive crankcase ventilation (PCV) valve  Damaged/failed/dirty throttle body  Failed EVAP system  Failed IAC (idle air controller) or faulty IAC circuit', '  A vacuum leak   Leaking air intake after the throttle body  EGR valve leaking vacuum  A faulty positive crankcase ventilation (PCV) valve  Damaged/failed/dirty throttle body  Failed EVAP system  Failed IAC (idle air controller) or faulty IAC circuit', 'This DTC is more of an informational code, so if there are any other codes   set, diagnose them first. If there are no other codes, inspect the intake air   system for air or vacuum leaks and damage. If there are no symptoms other than   the DTC itself, just clear the code and see whether it returns.If you have an advanced scan tool that can interact with the car, command the   idle higher and lower to see if the engine responds appropriately. Also check   the PCV valve to see if it's blocked and needs to be replaced. Check the IAC   (idle air controller) if equipped, verify it's operation. If available, try   swapping in a new throttle body to see if that fixes the problem. On Nissan   Altimas and possibly other vehicles the problem may be fixed by having the dealer   perform an idle air relearn procedure, or other relearn procedures.Further Reading  Nissan     Idle Relearn Procedures @ NissanForums.com  Mitsubishi     Montero P0507 Code Information  Chevy     Blazer P0506/P0507 DTC Info @ BlazerForum.comOther related DTCs: P0505, P0506', '  <a href="http://www.nissanforums.com/l31-2002-2006/91035-my-3-5se-has-p0507-code.html" target="_blank">Nissan     Idle Relearn Procedures @ NissanForums.com  <a href="http://autorepair.about.com/library/a/1i/bl833i.htm" target="_blank">Mitsubishi     Montero P0507 Code Information  <a href="http://www.blazerforum.com/m_166446/tm.htm" target="_blank">Chevy     Blazer P0506/P0507 DTC Info @ BlazerForum.com'
163', 'P0510', 'P0510 Closed Throttle Position Switch Malfunction', 'Closed Throttle Position Switch Malfunction', 'The throttle body or linkage on certain vehicles may contain a switch that indicates to the Powertrain Control Module (PCM) or Engine Control Module (ECM) when the throttle body is in the closed position.  When the throttle body is shut, the switch will be depressed or in the closed position.  The PCM uses this switch so the engine will stay at idle in conjunction with the idle air control valve and/or go into a fuel cut mode while coasting. There may also be a Wide Open Throttle (WOT) switch.  If either the WOT or closed throttle switch are not engaged, the PCM or ECM may assume the throttle is partly open which could affect the air/fuel ratio. Note:  If more than one trouble code is present, such as P0120 (TPS/Pedal Position Sensor A circuit Malfunction) - there may be an open in the ground circuit or bad connection at the Throttle Position Sensor TPS).', 'Symptoms of a P0510 DTC will include illumination of the Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL), you will likely not notice any other symptoms.', '', 'Potential causes of a P0510 code include:  Wiring harness open circuit or loose/dirty connection  Faulty closed throttle position switch  Throttle body idle set screw tampered with  Faulty ECM', '  Wiring harness open circuit or loose/dirty connection  Faulty closed throttle position switch  Throttle body idle set screw tampered with  Faulty ECM', 'Wiring Harness - Disconnect wiring harness connector at Throttle Position Sensor (TPS) or closed throttle position switch and harness connector at PCM/ECM.  Using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) set to ohms scale, connect leads to each end of the same wire using a wiring diagram for reference to test for continuity between the switch and the PCM/ECM.  Resistance should be present in the wiring between the switch and PCM/ECM, an infinite reading would indicate an open circuit. Repair open in wiring or replace wire harness assembly.Closed Throttle Position Switch - Disconnect wiring harness connector at TPS or closed throttle position switch and test for continuity using the DVOM with the leads on the two pins at the closed throttle position switch or the throttle position sensor, depending on the vehicle.  Resistance should be present when the throttle body is in the closed position.  If the throttle body linkage is not touching or fully closing switch, there may have been an adjustment made to the idle set screw. Re-adjust idle set screw to specifications using factory procedure.', ''
164', 'P0601', 'P0601 OBD-II Trouble Code', 'Internal Control Module Memory Check Sum Error', 'Basically that means that there is an interal fault in the Powertrain Control   Module (PCM). There have been many reported PCM failures on Chrysler/Dodge products   although it is possible for this to happen on any vehicle.In Dodge/Chrysler   products, a P0601 trouble code means that a serial communication failed inside   the computer at least 6 times. ', 'Likely, no symptoms will be discernible to the driver, other than the illuminated   Check Engine Light. Typically the engine runs fine, gauges work, etc.', '', 'A code P0601 in most cases means the PCM has gone bad. This is possibly due   to a short-circuit inside the PCM. Or, if you disconnect the wires/connector   from the PCM while the battery is still connected, that may also cause this   code. ', '', 'With a P0601 OBD-II trouble code, the most common fix is to replace and reprogram   the PCM. In a few cases the dealer may be able to reflash the PCM and get it   working. But more than likely the PCM will need to be replaced and reprogrammed   (we recommend you take it to a dealership for this). The good news is it *may*   be covered under your emmissions warranty. So even if you're out of bumper-to-bumper   warranty or powertrain warranty, check your warranty guide or dealer to see   if this is covered.Other people have reported that they cleared the code only for it to return   again and again. Keep in mind that most shops can replace the PCM but not all   can program it.Source: Dakota   ForumsOther PCM / ECM Codes: P0602, P0603, P0604, P0605, P0606, P0607, P0608, P0609, P0610.', ''
165', 'P0603', 'P0603 Internal Control Module Keep Alive Memory (KAM) Error', 'Internal Control Module Keep Alive Memory (KAM) Error', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.The keep alive memory is the memory that is stored in the powertrain control module (PCM) in regards to drive cycles. This memory is ever changing based on driving inputs and sensor inputs. When you disconnect your battery this memory is erased and the computer goes into &quot;dumb&quot; mode as it is using the built in parameters to run the engine and not the learned values based on driving inputs and habits as well as what the engine sensors see.This is different than &quot;limp&quot; mode as the PCM is not seeing a fault. The PCM memory hasn&rsquo;t adapted to the needed engine parameters. As stated this is NOT the hard programmed values but the ever-changing values that help for fuel economy, smooth running, easier starts, etc. This data is an adaptive formula used by the PCM to improve engine performance, shift fuel, fuel trims, etc.', 'Symptoms of a P0603 DTC will include MIL (malfunction indicator lamp) illumination, although there may be other symptoms including but not limited to engine stall, various warning lights on dash, module communication codes, no start conditions.', '', 'Potential causes may include:  Battery terminal corrosion or loose connections  Keep Alive Power (KAPWR) circuit wire routing  Open wire in the KAPWR circuit  Damaged PCM, water intrusion / internal fault  Charging system fault  Ignition system fault causing secondary ignition voltage inference  Internal PCM program fault', '  Battery terminal corrosion or loose connections  Keep Alive Power (KAPWR) circuit wire routing  Open wire in the KAPWR circuit  Damaged PCM, water intrusion / internal fault  Charging system fault  Ignition system fault causing secondary ignition voltage inference  Internal PCM program fault', 'This is quite a difficult problem to isolate. In my experience it has been both a wire issue and a PCM issue. It could be interference from a component that fried the PCM.Inspect the battery cables. It may be as simply as a highly corroded terminal or loose connection. Also check all grounds and fuse box and PCM connections.Check the charging system. Run the car with the alternator disconnected. There may be interference coming from the alternator. Does the code come back with the alternator disconnected?Inspect wire harnesses that run close to the ignition system. Interference from these components may be being &quot;thrown&quot; into the circuit. Also check spark plug wires, coil for cracks or anywhere where ignition voltage can &quot;leak&quot;.Using a voltmeter find the power supply circuits to the PCM. Monitor voltages while wiggling, bending, shaking the harness all around the engine and fuse boxes.In many vehicles the PCM is located in a secluded spot. Meaning there&rsquo;s a chance that water may have gotten into the PCM case. Also a chance for vibration transfer.  If no faults are found there may be an issue with the PCM itself.Finally, if your vehicle has an aftermarket chip or program in the vehicle, this may be the issue. Also, many manufacturers constantly update the software that is available for your computer, the code may be corrected with a reflash.', ''
166', 'P0605', 'P0605 - Internal Control Module Read Only Memory (ROM) Error', 'Internal Control Module Read Only Memory (ROM) Error', 'This trouble code basically means that the PCM/ECM (powertrain/engine control module) has detected an internal control module fault in the ROM (read only memory) in the PCM. The PCM is basically the vehicle's &quot;electronic brain&quot; that controls functions such as fuel injection, ignition, etc. When self-checks fail in the ROM, this DTC is set.This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model. A cursory search on the 'net shows this DTC to be more commonly found in Ford and Nissan vehicles.', '', '', '', '', 'In some cases, &quot;flashing&quot; the PCM with an updated software can fix this DTC. You will need acess to make &amp; model specific information such as Technical Service Bulletins (TSBs).If there are no PCM flash updates, the next step would be to check some wiring. Inspect and check for proper voltage and ground to the PCM and throughout the associated circuits. If there are problems with them, repair and retest.If the wiring checks out OK, the next step is to replace the PCM, which is the most likely repair for this code. This is generally not a &quot;do-it-yourself&quot; task, although in some cases it may be. We strongly recommend you have a qualified repair shop / technician do the work, one that has the capability to reprogram the new PCM. Installing the new PCM may involve using special tools to program the vehicle's VIN (vehicle identification number) and/or anti-theft information (PATS, etc.).As an alternative to replacing the PCM, some specialized shops may actually be able to repair the PCM. That may involve removing the PCM, shipping it off to them for repair, and re-installing it. That's not always an option for daily drivers.NOTE: This repair may be covered under the emissions warranty so be sure to check with your dealer as this may be covered beyond the bumper-to-bumper or powertrain warranty period.Other PCM DTC codes: P0600, P0601, P0602, P0603, P0604, P0606, P0607, P0608, P0609, P0610.', ''
167', 'P0606', 'P0606 - PCM / ECM Processor Fault', 'PCM / ECM Processor Fault ', 'This code is a fairly simple one. It basically means that the PCM/ECM (powertrain/engine control module) has detected an internal integrity fault in the PCM.When this code is activated it should store freeze-frame data that helps someone with an advanced code scanning tool to get information on exactly what was going on with the vehicle when the P0606 code was triggered.', 'Most likely the only symptom of a P0606 DTC code is the illumination of the &quot;Check Engine Light&quot; a.k.a. MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp).', '', 'In all likelyhood the PCM / ECM has failed.', '', 'As a vehicle owner there is little you can do to fix this code. The most common fix for a P0606 code is to replace the PCM, although in some cases re-flashing the PCM with updated software could possibly fix this. Be sure to check for TSB's on your vehicle (Technical Service Bulletins).In all likelyhood the fix is to replace the PCM. This is generally not a &quot;do-it-yourself&quot; task, although in some cases it may be. We strongly recommend you have a qualified repair shop / technician do the work, one that has the capability to reprogram the new PCM. Installing the new PCM may involve using special tools to program the vehicle's VIN (vehicle identification number) and/or anti-theft information (PATS, etc.).NOTE: This repair may be covered under the emissions warranty so be sure to check with your dealer as this may be covered beyond the bumper-to-bumper or powertrain warranty period.Other PCM DTC codes: P0600, P0601, P0602, P0603, P0604, P0605, P0607, P0608, P0609, P0610.', ''
168', 'P0607', 'P0607 - Control Module Performance', 'Control Module Performance', 'This code basically means that the programming of the PCM/ECM (powertrain/engine control module) has failed. This can be a more serious code and may also be refered to as &quot;ECM Internal Circuit Malfunction&quot;.', 'The P0607 code will illuminate the MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp). Other potential symptoms of a P0607 include:  vehicle may also go into &quot;limp-home&quot; mode where it runs under reduced power  No Start condition (cranks but does not start)  may  stop running while driving', '  vehicle may also go into &quot;limp-home&quot; mode where it runs under reduced power  No Start condition (cranks but does not start)  may  stop running while driving', 'A P0607 could be caused by one or more of the following:  Loose ground terminal on PCM/ECM  Dead or defective (12V main) battery  An open or short in the power or ground circuit  Loose or corroded battery terminals  Failed PCM/ECM', '  Loose ground terminal on PCM/ECM  Dead or defective (12V main) battery  An open or short in the power or ground circuit  Loose or corroded battery terminals  Failed PCM/ECM', 'As a vehicle owner there isn't a whole lot you can do yourself to diagnose this DTC. The first thing to check is the battery, check the voltage, inspect for loose/corroded terminals, etc., do a load test on it too. Also inspect the grounds/wiring at the PCM. If that's good the other common fixes for a P0607 Control Module Performance DTC seem to be either replace the PCM or update (re-flash) the PCM with updated software. Be sure to check for TSB's on your vehicle (Technical Service Bulletins) as there are known TSB's for this P0607 code for some Toyota and Ford vehicles.If the PCM needs replacement, we strongly recommend you have a qualified repair shop / technician do the work, one that has the capability to reprogram the new PCM. Installing the new PCM may involve using special tools to program the vehicle's VIN (vehicle identification number) and/or anti-theft information (PATS, etc.).NOTE: This repair may be covered under the emissions warranty so be sure to check with your dealer as this may be covered beyond the bumper-to-bumper or powertrain warranty period.Other PCM DTC codes: P0600, P0601, P0602, P0603, P0604, P0605, P0606, P0608, P0609, P0610.', ''
169', 'P0650', 'P0650 Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) Control Circuit', 'Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) Control Circuit', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is set when the vehicle's Powertrain Control Module  detects a fault with the Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) electrical circuit.The MIL is commonly referred to as the &quot;Check Engine Light&quot; or &quot;Service Engine Soon&quot; light. MIL is the correct term, however. Basically what happens on some vehicles is the vehicles' PCM senses too high or low, or no voltage present through the M.I. lamp. The PCM controls the lamp by monitoring the ground circuit of the lamp and checks the voltage on that ground circuit.Note: It is normal operation for the malfunction indicator lamp to illuminate for a few seconds and then go out when the ignition is turned on or the car is started.', 'Symptoms of a P0650 DTC may include:  Malfunction indicator lamp NOT illuminating when it should (check engine light or service engine soon light)  MIL being illuminated all the time', '  Malfunction indicator lamp NOT illuminating when it should (check engine light or service engine soon light)  MIL being illuminated all the time', '', '', '', ''
170', 'P0700', 'P0700 Transmission Control System Malfunction', 'Transmission Control System TCS Malfunction', 'Many vehicles have a control module for the automatic transmission called a transmission control module (TCM). The engine control module (ECM) communicates with the TCM to monitor the automatic transmission for faults. If the TCM detects a fault in the automatic transmission and sets a transmission related fault code, the ECM is informed of this also and sets a P0700 in the ECM memory.This illuminates the Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) to let the driver know there is a problem. If this code is present and the MIL (Malfunction Indicator Lamp) is illuminated that basically means there is at least one transmission code set in the TCM's memory. P0700 is an informational code only. It doesn't point to a direct fault in the engine, only a general fault in the transmission. More diagnosis is necessary to identify what the transmission fault is. This requires a scan tool that will communicate with the transmission module.', 'Symptoms of a P0700 DTC may include:  Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination  The transmission may exhibit drivability problems like slipping, etc.', '  Malfunction Indicator Lamp (MIL) illumination  The transmission may exhibit drivability problems like slipping, etc.', 'More often then not, the cause of this code is that there is a transmission problem of some kind. The TCM detected the problem and set a code. P0700 means that a fault code is stored in the TCM. However this doesn't rule out the possibility of a failed PCM or TCM (unlikely).', '', 'For a P0700 the only real solution is to acquire a scan tool that will communicate with the transmission control module. Extracting this code from the TCM will be the first step in repairing the fault in the transmission.If the TCM compatible scan tool will not communicate with the Transmission Control Module then that is a good indication that there may be a fault with the TCM itself.', ''
171', 'P0705', 'P0705 Transmission Range Sensor TRS Circuit Malfunction', 'Transmission Range Sensor Circuit Malfunction (PRNDL input)', 'This is a generic powertrain code, which means it covers all makes/models, 1996-newer. However, specific troubleshooting steps will vary depending on the vehicle.The P0705 diagnostic trouble code (DTC)  refers to a switch either external or internal on the transmission whose function is to signal the Powertrain Control Module (PCM) or the Transmission Control Module (TCM) as to the gear shift position -- P, R,N and D positions (park, reverse, neutral, and drive). The backup lights may also function through the Transmission Range Sensor (TRS) if it is an external component. The code is telling you that the computer has recognized a failure in the TRS sensor. The sensor is either sending an erroneous or no signal at all to the computer identifying the gear position. The computer receives signals from the vehicle speed sensor as well as the TRS.When the vehicle is moving and there are contradictory signals being received by the computer, such as the TRS signal indicates that the vehicle is in park, however the speed sensor indicates that it is moving, the code P0705 is set. External TRS failure is common as age and mileage accumulates. It's exposed to the weather and elements, and as with any printed circuit tends to corrode over time. The upside to this is they are not an expensive repair and easy to replace with little automotive repair experience. Example of an external Transmission Range Sensor (TRS):TRS image from DormanLater models with the transmission range sensor located in the valve body are a different ball game. The range sensor is separate from the neutral safety switch and reverse backup light switch. Its mission is the same, but it's replacement has now become a more serious matter both in difficulty and expense. The easiest method for determining which type is used on your vehicle is to look up the part on your local auto parts website. If it is not listed it's internal. ', '', '', '', '', '', ''
172', 'P0720', 'P0720 Output Speed Sensor Circuit Malfunction', 'Output Speed Sensor Circuit Malfunction', 'This diagnostic trouble code (DTC) is a generic OBD-II powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may vary depending on the model.On electronically controlled transmissions, the Output Shaft Speed Sensor (OSS) is located on  the end of the transmission before the drive axles or driveshaft to read the speed of the  output shaft which may be used to determine shift scheduling, torque converter engagement  schedule and Electronic Pressure Control (EPC) inside the transmission.  The Powertrain  control module / Engine control module (PCM/ECM) has determined there is a malfunction with  the OSS sensor.  The PCM/ECM may substitute values based on other sensors to determine shift  timing, torque converter operation and EPC pressure if the OSS sensor information is  unavailable.  The OSS sensor is also commonly used for the speedometer.Note:  On some vehicles, the OSS sensor is inline with the Transmission Fluid Temperature  (TFT) sensor, if there is a failure with the TFT sensor or associated wiring, the OSS sensor  may malfunction as well.  If there is another code associated with the TFT sensor as well as  the OSS sensor, suspect a possible problem with either sensor, or the wiring in between This code is similar to codes P0721, P0722 and P0723', '', '', '', '', '', ''
173', 'P0740', 'P0740 Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Malfunction', 'Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Malfunction', 'Modern vehicles equipped with automatic transmissions / transaxles use a torque converter  between the engine and transmission to increase the engine torque output and drive the rear  wheels. The engine and transmission are actually connected by a fluid coupling mechanism  inside of the torque converter which is what multiplies the torque until the speeds equalize  and create a &quot;stall&quot; speed where the difference in actual engine RPM and transmission input  RPM is around 90% efficient.  Torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoids commanded by the  Powertrain control module/Engine control module (PCM/ECM) or the Transmission control module  (TCM) to direct hydraulic fluid and engage the torque converter clutch to create a solid  coupling and increase efficiency.The transmission control module has detected a fault with  the circuit that operates the torque converter clutch solenoid.  We will consider the TCM the  controller for the sake of this article although it may be controlled through the PCM/ECM,  consult factory wiring diagrams to determine which system is being used.Note: This code is similar to codes P0741, P0742, P0743 and P0744.There may be other diagnostic trouble codes associated with the transmission control module that can only be  accessed by using an advanced scan tool.  If any additional transmission related DTC's appear  in addition to the P0740, an electrical failure is likely.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
174', 'P0741', 'P0741 Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Performance or Stuck Off', 'Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Performance or Stuck Off', 'Modern vehicles equipped with automatic transmissions / transaxles use a torque converter  between the engine and transmission to increase the engine torque output and drive the rear  wheels. The engine and transmission are actually connected by a fluid coupling mechanism  inside of the torque converter which is what multiplies the torque until the speeds equalize  and create a &quot;stall&quot; speed where the difference in actual engine RPM and transmission input  RPM is around 90% efficient.  Torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoids commanded by the  Powertrain control module/Engine control module (PCM/ECM) or the Transmission control module  (TCM) to direct hydraulic fluid and engage the torque converter clutch to create a solid  coupling and increase efficiency.The transmission control module has detected a fault with  the circuit that operates the torque converter clutch solenoid.Note: This code is similar to codes P0740, P0742, P0743 and P0744.There may be other diagnostic trouble codes associated with the transmission control module that can only be  accessed by using an advanced scan tool.  If any additional transmission related DTC's appear  in addition to the P0741, an electrical failure is likely.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
175', 'P0742', 'P0742 Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Stuck On', 'Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Stuck On', 'Modern vehicles equipped with automatic transmissions / transaxles use a torque converter  between the engine and transmission to increase the engine torque output and drive the rear  wheels. The engine and transmission are actually connected by a fluid coupling mechanism  inside of the torque converter which is what multiplies the torque until the speeds equalize  and create a &quot;stall&quot; speed where the difference in actual engine RPM and transmission input  RPM is around 90% efficient.  Torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoids commanded by the  Powertrain control module/Engine control module (PCM/ECM) or the Transmission control module  (TCM) to direct hydraulic fluid and engage the torque converter clutch to create a solid  coupling and increase efficiency.The transmission control module has detected a fault with  the circuit that operates the torque converter clutch solenoid.Note: This code is similar to codes P0740, P0741, P0743 and P0744.There may be other diagnostic trouble codes associated with the transmission control module that can only be  accessed by using an advanced scan tool.  If any additional transmission related DTC's appear  in addition to the P0742, an electrical failure is likely.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
176', 'P0743', 'P0743 Torque Converter Clutch (TCC) Solenoid Circuit Electrical', 'Torque Converter Clutch (TCC) Solenoid Circuit Electrical', 'This code is a generic powertrain code. It is considered generic because it applies to all makes and models of vehicles (1996-newer), although specific repair steps may be slightly different depending on the model.This diagnostic trouble code is set when the Engine Management Computer (EMC) also known as the Powertrain Control Module (PCM) and also known as the Engine Control Module (ECM) detects a fault with the torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoid electrical circuit, which is contained inside the transmission.An automatic transmission is not 100% efficient because it is a fluid coupling that connects the engine to the rest of the internal transmission parts. The torque convertor transfers power using hydraulic force and it is internal to the transmission assembly. With that transfer of power comes excessive heat. The lockup torque converter was designed to make the transmission more efficient at highway speeds and to control heat.  The torque convertor clutch is what lockups the convertor.  Heat kills transmissions. That is why you hear that stop and go traffic is hard on a automatic transmission The converter clucth does not lockup at these low speeds therefore heat is generated. This clutch is controlled by an electrical solenoid. The torque convertor clutch is locked changing the fluid coupling to a mechanical one. This solenoid uses power and ground sent through a coil of wires which creates a magnetic field to pull or push a central metal rod. When the solenoid is energized or de-energized, it directs fluid flow through the valve body of the transmission.', 'Symptoms of a P0743 DTC may include:  Malfunction indicator illumination (check engine light or service engine soon light)  Stalling when coming to a stop after cruising speeds  Shudder on take off  Shudder when coming to a stop', '  Malfunction indicator illumination (check engine light or service engine soon light)  Stalling when coming to a stop after cruising speeds  Shudder on take off  Shudder when coming to a stop', 'Potential causes may include:  Low or dirty transmission fluid  Wire/circuit issue shorted to power or ground  Failed torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoid  Failed TCC assembly in the torque converter  Failed PCM/ECM/EMCNote: This may well be an intermittent condition and may not show up again, so clear the code and keep monitoring.', '  Low or dirty transmission fluid  Wire/circuit issue shorted to power or ground  Failed torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoid  Failed TCC assembly in the torque converter  Failed PCM/ECM/EMC', 'First you need to gather some tools together or borrow some (a rare occurrence with mechanics as our tools are our livelihood and we don't like to lend out our tools):  On Board Diagnostic (OBD-II) scan tool - to pull the code; can be found at many parts stores, online, or many parts stores will pull the code for free  Multimeter that has a resistance (or OHM) reading  Self powered test light/probe (a Power Probe III works wonders here). If you don&rsquo;t have a Power Probe, a simple set of fused jumper wires and a test light will suffice  Wire diagrams will be very helpful - you can get these in a Haynes manual or if your friendly with the dealer or your local mechanic, they may be able to run off a photocopyTIP: Remember in most cases there&rsquo;s an internal transmission harness that connects the TCC solenoid and shift solenoids, so the wire fault may only happen when the transmission is hot or cold. Or, when the vehicle is driven above bumps or when making a turn. Make every attempt to recreate it!  TIP: Before addressing any transmission issue make sure the engine is running in tip top shape! Address any other sensor codes or lean/rich codes first. There are a lot of sensors that are networked together that determine transmission shift scheduling. If one is &quot;offline/faulty&quot; then the ECM/PCM/EMC may be throwing this code through the fault it sees at another sensor.TIP: Many times a simple fluid and filter change will take care of minor transmission issues. There&rsquo;s nothing to lose with a fluid and filter change. Notice I say change and not a fluid flush. A fluid flush on a high mileage transmission may cause further damage. Also, for a transmission that is slipping I recommend Lucas Oil Transmission Fix. I am not endorsing the product nor am I getting paid to use the name. But it works!  First verify the condition/concern. In most cases the TCC solenoid applies in overdrive when commanded by the PCM. Locking of the TCC helps with fuel economy and lowers transmission fluid temperature due to the fact the converter is locked (research TCC operation to get an in depth look as the theory and operation is difficult to explain without getting too technical. With that explanation one may have the deer in the headlights look).  In my case my vehicle stumbled and almost stalled stopping at a light. When verified we can begin diagnosis.  Do an overall fluid condition and level check if all is OK. Also, does the transmission shift correctly? Is the engine running correctly? Most transmissions problems are misdiagnosed due to a poor running engine. Remember, the power flow starts at the engine and goes through the transmission then out to the drivetrain.  Next, check the external transmission harness and connectors. Also check your fuses and make sure the transmission case is grounded to the body AND the battery.  Proceed with finding the appropriate wires that correspond to the torque converter clutch. In most cases, it will be two wires; one for a ground and one for power. Apply power and ground and listen for the solenoid to click.  If the solenoid does not click, proceed with checking continuity across the solenoid and continuity to and from the corresponding wires to and from the sensor. The solenoid should have a 	low ohm (.02 to .05) reading, this will vary with manufacturers so verify your reading with a factory service manual or equivalent. The wires should also have a low ohm reading. Also, make sure neither wire are shorted to ground or power.  If the wires check out and the solenoid clicks. There may be a PCM issue, but I 	advise one to pull the transmission pan and closely examine the TCC solenoid for debris. Any small amount of debris will cause the solenoid to &quot;short&quot; and trick the computer into thinking it is applied. Or, if it&rsquo;s metallic debris, it will attach itself to the solenoid and prevent it from disengaging. This was the problem in my case.  Also I would advise one to get the latest calibration for your vehicles&rsquo; computer (PCM) from your dealer. Manufacturers are constantly releasing new and improved software. There may be a revised calibration to address this code. Especially if it&rsquo;s intermittent.  Finally if all checks out OK and you go ahead and replace the PCM, remember it needs to be programmed to the vehicle. In many cases there is an antitheft device in the key and with that the keys need to be programmed. Think dealer or mechanic.  If all else fails and your are at wits end, there may be an issue with the clutch assembly in the torque converter. This will most likely be evident if you feel a slip when the transmission goes into lockup in overdrive. Also the fluid may smell burnt or be totally black. Look into a rebuilt transmission or a replacement.  Good luck! In my case, I am a Ford trained technician and due to experience I simply pulled the transmission pan and took a look at the solenoid and found my problem right off the bat. This is a common issue on higher mileage transmissions.', '  <a href="/store/">On Board Diagnostic (OBD-II) scan tool - to pull the code; can be found at many parts stores, online, or many parts stores will pull the code for free  Multimeter that has a resistance (or OHM) reading  Self powered test light/probe (a <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B000KPU8MK/ref=as_li_ss_tl?ie=UTF8&tag=obd-codes-20&linkCode=as2&camp=1789&creative=390957&creativeASIN=B000KPU8MK" target="_blank">Power Probe III works wonders here). If you don&rsquo;t have a Power Probe, a simple set of fused jumper wires and a test light will suffice  Wire diagrams will be very helpful - you can get these in a Haynes manual or if your friendly with the dealer or your local mechanic, they may be able to run off a photocopy'
177', 'P0744', 'P0744 Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Intermittent', 'Torque Converter Clutch Circuit Intermittent', 'Modern vehicles equipped with automatic transmissions / transaxles use a torque converter  between the engine and transmission to increase the engine torque output and drive the rear  wheels. The engine and transmission are actually connected by a fluid coupling mechanism  inside of the torque converter which is what multiplies the torque until the speeds equalize  and create a &quot;stall&quot; speed where the difference in actual engine RPM and transmission input  RPM is around 90% efficient.  Torque converter clutch (TCC) solenoids commanded by the  Powertrain control module/Engine control module (PCM/ECM) or the Transmission control module  (TCM) to direct hydraulic fluid and engage the torque converter clutch to create a solid  coupling and increase efficiency.The transmission control module has detected a fault with  the circuit that operates the torque converter clutch solenoid.Note: This code is similar to codes P0740, P0741, P0742 and P0743.There may be other diagnostic trouble codes associated with the transmission control module that can only be  accessed by using an advanced scan tool.  If any additional transmission related DTC's appear  in addition to the P0744, an electrical failure is likely.', '', '', '', '', '', ''
178', 'P0781', 'P0781 1-2 Shift Malfunction', '1-2 Shift Malfunction', 'On vehicles with electronically controlled automatic transmissions, the 1-2 shift solenoid is responsible for actuating the hydraulic circuits to activate clutches or bands that change gears inside the automatic transmission. The shift solenoids are controlled by either a Transmission Control Module (TCM), or the Engine Control Unit / Powertrain Control Module (ECU / PCM).  The control circuit may be power or ground side controlled depending on the application.Some vehicles self-test the circuit even when the gear is not in use, the 1-2 shift solenoid may be an on / off solenoid, or duty cycle controlled.  The PCM or TCM looks for an inductive kick to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly even when not in use.  This brief activation is too fast for the solenoid to actually cause a shift in the transmission.  When the solenoid is activated and turned off, the magnetic field collapses sending a slightly higher voltage to the PCM which is used to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly.   Note: This DTC is nearly identical to P0782, P0783, and P0784.', 'Symptoms of a P0781 DTC may include:  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 1st to 2nd gearThis condition may illuminate a check engine light and possibly shut down the transmission controls altogether resulting in a &quot;failsafe&quot; mode that will only allow one default gear depending on the vehicles state with all solenoids off.', '  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 1st to 2nd gear', 'Potential causes of a P0781 code include:  1-2 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', '  1-2 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', 'Disconnect PCM or TCM wiring harness, depending on the application and using an electrical diagram as reference, check for excessive resistance or an open in the control circuit.  Using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) set to the Ohms scale, check for resistance on the 1-2 solenoid power and ground sources to determine if there is an open circuit or excessive resistance in the 1-2 solenoid.  Visually inspect for for any pinched, disconnected or loose wires on the harness connectors.Short to power: Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between power source and solenoid circuit wiring in key on / engine off (KOEO) position as well as the key off position.Short to ground:  Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between 1-2 solenoid power source and a known good ground.TCM or PCM failure:  Using an advanced scan tool capable of controlling solenoids, manually activate the 1-2 shift solenoid.  It may be necessary to manually activate transmission control relay on some vehicles if power is not present at the transmission wiring harness connector.  If a scan tool is not available, it will be necessary to monitor the 1-2 solenoid circuit to determine if the TCM or PCM is sending a power or ground signal to the 1-2 solenoid during vehicle operation.', ''
179', 'P0782', 'P0782 2-3 Shift Malfunction', '2-3 Shift Malfunction', 'On vehicles with electronically controlled automatic transmissions, the 2-3 shift solenoid is responsible for actuating the hydraulic circuits to activate clutches or bands that change gears inside the automatic transmission. The shift solenoids are controlled by either a Transmission Control Module (TCM), or the Engine Control Unit / Powertrain Control Module (ECU / PCM).  The control circuit may be power or ground side controlled depending on the application.Some vehicles self-test the circuit even when the gear is not in use, the 2-3 shift solenoid may be an on / off solenoid, or duty cycle controlled.  The PCM or TCM looks for an inductive kick to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly even when not in use.  This brief activation is too fast for the solenoid to actually cause a shift in the transmission.  When the solenoid is activated and turned off, the magnetic field collapses sending a slightly higher voltage to the PCM which is used to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly.   Note: This DTC is nearly identical to P0781, P0783, and P0784.', 'Symptoms of a P0782 DTC may include:  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 2nd to 3rd gearThis condition may illuminate a check engine light and possibly shut down the transmission controls altogether resulting in a &quot;failsafe&quot; mode that will only allow one default gear depending on the vehicles state with all solenoids off.', '  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 2nd to 3rd gear', 'Potential causes of a P0782 code include:  2-3 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', '  2-3 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', 'Disconnect PCM or TCM wiring harness, depending on the application and using an electrical diagram as reference, check for excessive resistance or an open in the control circuit.  Using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) set to the Ohms scale, check for resistance on the 2-3 solenoid power and ground sources to determine if there is an open circuit or excessive resistance in the 2-3 solenoid.  Visually inspect for for any pinched, disconnected or loose wires on the harness connectors.Short to power: Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between power source and solenoid circuit wiring in key on / engine off (KOEO) position as well as the key off position.Short to ground:  Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between 2-3 solenoid power source and a known good ground.TCM or PCM failure:  Using an advanced scan tool capable of controlling solenoids, manually activate the 2-3 shift solenoid.  It may be necessary to manually activate transmission control relay on some vehicles if power is not present at the transmission wiring harness connector.  If a scan tool is not available, it will be necessary to monitor the 2-3 solenoid circuit to determine if the TCM or PCM is sending a power or ground signal to the 2-3 solenoid during vehicle operation.', ''
180', 'P0783', 'P0783 3-4 Shift Malfunction', '3-4 Shift Malfunction', 'On vehicles with electronically controlled automatic transmissions, the 3-4 shift solenoid is responsible for actuating the hydraulic circuits to activate clutches or bands that change gears inside the automatic transmission. The shift solenoids are controlled by either a Transmission Control Module (TCM), or the Engine Control Unit / Powertrain Control Module (ECU / PCM).  The control circuit may be power or ground side controlled depending on the application.Some vehicles self-test the circuit even when the gear is not in use, the 3-4 shift solenoid may be an on / off solenoid, or duty cycle controlled.  The PCM or TCM looks for an inductive kick to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly even when not in use.  This brief activation is too fast for the solenoid to actually cause a shift in the transmission.  When the solenoid is activated and turned off, the magnetic field collapses sending a slightly higher voltage to the PCM which is used to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly.   Note: This DTC is nearly identical to P0781, P0782, and P0784.', 'Symptoms of a P0783 DTC may include:  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 3rd to 4th gearThis condition may illuminate a check engine light and possibly shut down the transmission controls altogether resulting in a &quot;failsafe&quot; mode that will only allow one default gear depending on the vehicles state with all solenoids off.', '  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 3rd to 4th gear', 'Potential causes of a P0783 code include:  3-4 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', '  3-4 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', 'Disconnect PCM or TCM wiring harness, depending on the application and using an electrical diagram as reference, check for excessive resistance or an open in the control circuit.  Using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) set to the Ohms scale, check for resistance on the 3-4 solenoid power and ground sources to determine if there is an open circuit or excessive resistance in the 3-4 solenoid.  Visually inspect for for any pinched, disconnected or loose wires on the harness connectors.Short to power: Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between power source and solenoid circuit wiring in key on / engine off (KOEO) position as well as the key off position.Short to ground:  Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between 3-4 solenoid power source and a known good ground.TCM or PCM failure:  Using an advanced scan tool capable of controlling solenoids, manually activate the 3-4 shift solenoid.  It may be necessary to manually activate transmission control relay on some vehicles if power is not present at the transmission wiring harness connector.  If a scan tool is not available, it will be necessary to monitor the 3-4 solenoid circuit to determine if the TCM or PCM is sending a power or ground signal to the 3-4 solenoid during vehicle operation.', ''
181', 'P0784', 'P0784 4-5 Shift Malfunction', '4-5 Shift Malfunction', 'On vehicles with electronically controlled automatic transmissions, the 4-5 shift solenoid is responsible for actuating the hydraulic circuits to activate clutches or bands that change gears inside the automatic transmission. The shift solenoids are controlled by either a Transmission Control Module (TCM), or the Engine Control Unit / Powertrain Control Module (ECU / PCM).  The control circuit may be power or ground side controlled depending on the application. Some vehicles self-test the circuit even when the gear is not in use, the 4-5 shift solenoid may be an on / off solenoid, or duty cycle controlled.  The PCM or TCM looks for an inductive kick to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly even when not in use.  This brief activation is too fast for the solenoid to actually cause a shift in the transmission.  When the solenoid is activated and turned off, the magnetic field collapses sending a slightly higher voltage to the PCM which is used to determine if the solenoid is functioning properly.   Note: This DTC is nearly identical to P0781, P0782, and P0783.', 'Symptoms of a P0784 DTC may include:  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 4th to 5th gearThis condition may illuminate a check engine light and possibly shut down the transmission controls altogether resulting in a &quot;failsafe&quot; mode that will only allow one default gear depending on the vehicles state with all solenoids off.', '  Check engine light illuminated (Malfunction Indicator Lamp / MIL)  Vehicle will not shift from 4th to 5th gear', 'Potential causes of a P0784 code include:  4-5 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', '  4-5 shift solenoid failure  Electrical short to power - pinched wires  Electrical short to ground - pinched wires  Open in power or ground circuit wiring - disconnected or loose connections  TCM or PCM internal failure', 'Disconnect PCM or TCM wiring harness, depending on the application and using an electrical diagram as reference, check for excessive resistance or an open in the control circuit.  Using a Digital Volt Ohm Meter (DVOM) set to the Ohms scale, check for resistance on the 4-5 solenoid power and ground sources to determine if there is an open circuit or excessive resistance in the 4-5 solenoid.  Visually inspect for for any pinched, disconnected or loose wires on the harness connectors.Short to power: Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between power source and solenoid circuit wiring in key on / engine off (KOEO) position as well as the key off position.Short to ground:  Disconnect battery positive cable and wiring harness connector at transmission and check for continuity using the DVOM between 4-5 solenoid power source and a known good ground.TCM or PCM failure:  Using an advanced scan tool capable of controlling solenoids, manually activate the 4-5 shift solenoid.  It may be necessary to manually activate transmission control relay on some vehicles if power is not present at the transmission wiring harness connector.  If a scan tool is not available, it will be necessary to monitor the 4-5 solenoid circuit to determine if the TCM or PCM is sending a power or ground signal to the 4-5 solenoid during vehicle operation.', ''
182', 'P1000', 'P1000 OBD-II DTC', 'Ford P1000: OBDII Monitor Testing Not Complete  Jaguar P1000: Engine control module (ECM) - internal error  Kia P1000: System diagnosis incomplete  Land Rover P1000: Engine control module (ECM) memory erased - no codes stored  Mazda P1000: OBDII Drive Cycle Malfunction', 'The P1000 DTC code is a manufacturer specific code. In the case of Ford vehicles, it simply means that the OBD-II monitor testing is not complete. It is a similar meaning for Mazda, which is OBD-II drive cycle malfunction. If an OBD-II monitor does not carry out their full diagnostic check, this DTC may be set also.', '', '', '', '', 'Although this may be considered a common Ford DTC, it's very minor. You in fact can safely ignore this code and it should go away as part of normal driving, you do not need to clear this code (as it may not actually turn off the MIL). If you want to the code to clear itself, faster, run through the Ford Drive Cycle.However, if you have other trouble codes, the MIL will stay on as there are other issues.', ''
